<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89323-0035 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.3-23-89.f2.A1034</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 55 / Thursday, March 23, 1989/ Proposed Rules <ITAG tagnum="52">SMALL BUSINESS ADMINISTRATION </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">13 CFR Part 124 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Minority Small Business and Capital Ownership Development Program</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Small Business Administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Proposed rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY:</T2> The Small Business Administration (SBA) Proposes to amendits regulations governing the Minority Small Business and Capital OwnershipDevelopment Program authorized by sections 7 (j)(10) and 8(a) of the SmallBusiness Act (15 U.S.C. 636(j)(10), 637(a)). In most instances the Proposedrevisions would implement changes required by the Business OpportunityDevelopment Reform Act of 1988 (Pub. L. 100-656), enacted November 15,1988. Some Provisions, however, would incorporate into the regulationsexisting Agency Policy while others would implement proposed policy changes.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE: </T2>Comments will be accepted until April 24, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Written comments should be addressed to Joseph O. Montes,Associate Administrator for Minority Small Business and Capital OwnershipDevelopment, 1441 L Street NW., Room 602, Washington, DC 20416.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Patricia R. Forbes at (202) 653-6573,or John W. Klein at (202) 653-6377. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>On November 15, 1988, the enactmentof the Business Opportunity Development Reform Act of 1988 (Reform Act)required SBA to substantially revise the Minority Small Business and CapitalOwnership Development Program (MSBandamp;COD Program or 8(a) Program), asauthorized by sections 7 (j)(10) and 8(a) of the Small Business Act (Act)(15 U.S.C. 636(j)(10) and 637(a)). The 8(a) program was established inthe late 1960's under the general authority of the Small Business Act,and was established by statute (Pub. L. 95-507) in 1978. Under Pub. L.95-507, the stated purposes of the MSBandamp;COD program are ``* * * to (A)foster business ownership by individuals who are both socially and economicallydisadvantaged; (B) promote the competitiveness of such firms by providingsuch available contract, financial, technical and management assistanceas may be necessary; and, (C) clarify and expand the program for the procurementby the United States of articles, equipment, supplies, services, material,and construction work from small business concerns owned by socially andeconomically disadvantaged individuals.'' By subsequent statutory amendments,the assistance provided to these individuals was extended to concerns ownedand controlled by economically disadvantaged Indian tribes, Alaska NativeCorporations and Native Hawaiian Organizations. Although in the ReformAct Congress found that the program remains a primary tool for improvingthe opportunities of such concerns in the Federal procurement process andfor bringing such concerns into the nation's economic mainstream, Congressalso found that the program must be substantially reformed in order topromote the statutorily required business development objectives and purposes.It is SBA's intent to implement these congressional mandates through therevisions to its regulations as proposed here as well as through changesto the Agency's forms and standard operating procedures. In preparing this proposed rule, SBA held two public meetings in December1988 to receive public comment on the nature and extent of the regulationsneeded to implement the Reform Act. The first was held in San Francisco,California on December 9, 1988, and was attended by approximately 75 membersof the public. The second was held in Washington, DC on December 19, 1988,and was attended by approximately 325 members of the public. All commentsreceived have been considered in the preparation of this proposed rule.SBA welcomes public comment on these proposed rules. However, since theReform Act requires SBA to publish final implementing regulations by June15, 1989, SBA is able to provide only a 30-day comment period on theseregulations. In order to facilitate public comment as soon as possibleafter publication, SBA will have copies of the proposed rule availableat its regional, district and branch offices. SBA invites public comments on certain proposed sections in particular.In andSection; 124.105 SBA proposes to define Asian Pacific Americans andSubcontinent Asian Americans. Public comment on the appropriateness ofsuch definitions is invited. Section 124.106 would require individuals claiming disadvantaged statuswho are married to submit their own and their spouses' financial statements.The purpose of this proposed section would be to prevent such individualfrom creating an unwarranted appearance of economic disadvantage by placinghis/her assets in his/her spouse's name. In addition, SBA invites comments on the effect of community property lawson such requirements. Section 124.102 would impose new restrictions on disadvantaged and nondisadvantagedownership. Section 124.109 would deem Franchises ineligible for 8(a) participation.SBA requests comments on these provisions in particular. SBA invites public comment on proposed andSection; 124.311 especially fromprocuring agencies. SBA is interested in news on whether 8(a) competitioncan be practically implemented by procuring agencies.It should be noted that, although the numbering scheme is similar to thatused in SBA's MSBandamp;COD program regulations, published October 8, 1986(51 FR 36132, <T3>et seq.</T3>), some sections have been renumbered or combined withother sections to accommodate new provisions required by the Reform Act.Proposed andSection;andSection; 124.1 through 124.7 address issues which pertainto the program in general. Proposed andSection; 124.100 sets forth definitionsof key terms used in the regulations. Some of these definitions are identicalto those now included in SBA's existing regulations. A list of new andamended definitions will be provided in the section-by-section review portionof this explanatory information. Some of these definitions will be highlighted.Proposed andSection;andSection; 124.101 through 124.113 address matters relatingto program eligibility requirements both for admission to the program andfor continued participation in the program. Proposed andSection;andSection;124.201 through 124.205 set forth information concerning the applicationprocess. Proposed andSection;andSection;124.206 through 124.211 set forth proceduresrelating to the Agency review of applications, program graduations, programterminations and suspensions as well as procedures relating to administrativeappeal rights the Reform Act affords Program applicants and participants.Proposed andSection;andSection; 124.300 through 124.320 address requirementsrelating to business development and contracting. Proposed andSection;andSection;124.401 through 124.403 relate to special methods  of contract financing:advance payments and business development expense. At this time, SBA proposesto make no changes to existing andSection;andSection; 124.501 and 124.502,concerning the Development Assistance Program authorized by the Small Businessand Capital Ownership Development Program. Proposed andSection; 124.601 wouldbe a new section setting forth miscellaneous reporting requirements forcurrent and former 8(a) Program Participants. The Reform Act also contains provisions imposing new requirements relatingto standards of conduct for certain SBA employees who have 8(a) programresponsibilities and authorizing a loan program for 8(a) Program Participants.SBA intends to publish separate proposed rules amending Parts 105 and 120of this Title, respectively, to implement these Reform Act requirements.In addition to andSection;andSection; 124.206 through 124.211, SBA intendsto implement the administrative hearing requirements of the Reform Actby proposing conforming amendments to its administrative hearing proceduresfound in Part 134 of this Title. <ITAG tagnum="84">Section-by-Section Review </ITAG>Section 124.1 proposes to describe the scope of these regulations. If adoptedin final form, these rules would apply to participants in the MSBandamp;CODprogram, as authorized by sections 7(j)(10) and 8(a) of the Small BusinessAct (15 U.S.C. 636(j)(10) and 637(a)). Certain sections of these rules relating to social and economic disadvantaged status would apply to otherFederal programs for which social and economic disadvantaged status isa requirement of program eligibility. Such programs include, among others,the Small Disadvantaged Business (SDB) Set-aside and Bid Preference programsauthorized by section 1207(a) of Pub. L. 99-661, and the section 8(d) SubcontractingProgram, authorized by section 8(d) of the Small Business Act (15 U.S.C.637(d)). Sections 124.2 and 124.3 describe statutorily mandated changes to 8(a)program administration. The position of the Associate Administrator forMinority Small Business and Capital Ownership Development (AA/MSBandamp;COD)is required to be a career civil service position as opposed to a non-careerappointee. The Reform Act requires SBA to establish a Division of ProgramCertification and Eligibility, which is to be headed by a Director. Onceestablished, the Division would be responsible for handling matters relatingto 8(a) program eligibility, termination and graduation, and certificationsof disadvantaged status for purposes of any program or activity conductedunder the authority of section 8(d) of the Small Business Act or any Federallaw that references such section. Section 124.4 describes the Commission on Minority Business Developmentwhich was authorized by section 505 of the Reform Act. The purpose of theCommission is to review all Federal programs designed to promote the developmentof  minority owned businesses in order to ascertain whether the congressionallydescribed goals and purposes of such programs are being realized. Proposed andSection; 124.5 would repeat existing andSection; 124.3 which describesthe effect of an 8(a) program applicant's willful violation of any of SBA'sregulations governing its other programs. Proposed andSection; 124.6 would give notice to 8(a) program applicants andparticipants of the range and severity of penalties which could resultfrom making misrepresentations or false statements in relation to the 8(a)program. Section 124.7 would set forth restrictions on fees for applicant and 8(a)participant representatives. This proposed section would prohibit the applicantconcerned or Program Participant from paying any fee to such representativeswhich would be contingent on program certification or on specific 8(a)contract award(s). SBA is proposing to amend andSection; 124.100 to include a number of newand changed definitions for terms used throughout this Title. In addition,SBA is proposing to eliminate those definitions which are no longer relevantor which are defined in the body of the regulations. SBA would include. the following new definition paragraphs: (a), ``AlaskaNative;'' (b), ``Alaska Native Corporation;'' (c), ``Application'' or ``8(a)Application;'' (d), ``Business Opportunity Specialist;'' (g), ``Concern;''(h),  ``Descendant of an Alaska Native;'' (j), ``Fixed Program ParticipationTerm'' or ``FPPT,'' (k), ``Graduation;'' (1), ``Immediate family member;''(m), ``Indian Tribe;'' (n), ``Joint venture agreement;'' (r), ``NativeHawaiian;'' (s), ``Native Hawaiian Organization;'' (u), ``Nondisadvantagedindividual;'' (v), ``Non-8(a) business activity target;'' (x), ``Operationalcontrol;'' (y), ``Personal net worth;'' (aa), ``Principal place of business;''(bb), ``Program Participant'' or ``Participant;'' (cc), ``Program Suspension;''(dd), ``Program year;'' (ff), ``Requirement;'' (gg), ``Same or similarline of business;'' (ii), ``Termination;'' (jj), ``Tribally-owned concern;''and (kk), ``Unconditional ownership.'' In addition, SBA is proposing to amend these current definition paragraphs:(f), ``Certification of SBA's competency;'' (o), ``Local buy item;'' (dd),``Regular dealer;'' and, (hh), ``Self-marketing.'' Proposed paragraphs (a), (b) and (h) would provide definitions for ``AlaskaNative,'' ``Alaska Native Corporation'' and ``Descendant of an Alaska Native,''respectively. Proposed paragraphs (m) and (jj) would provide definitionsfor ``Indian tribe'' and ``Tribally owned concern.'' These definitionsare necessary in conjunction with new proposed andSection; 124.112 whichwould set forth the eligibility criteria for concerns owned by Indian tribesand Alaska Native Corporations. Section 8(a) of the Small Business Act, as amended by Pub. L. 100-656,makes business concerns owned by Native  Hawaiian Organizations eligiblefor 8(a) program participation. In accordance with this program change,SBA would adopt the definition for ``Native Hawaiian'' as contained inthe Carl D. Perkins Vocational Act (20 U.S.C. 2313(a)(1)(B)) at paragraph(r). At paragraph (s), SBA would define ``Native Hawaiian Organization.''SBA is also proposing to include as paragraph (j) a definition for ``FixedProgram Participation Term (FPPT).'' This definition would be providedin conjunction with andSection; 124.110 which deals with the ``grandfathering''of firms which were program participants as of September 1, 1988, and whichhad been subject to terms established in accordance with the provisionsof the Small Business Act, as amended by Pub. L. 96-481. In proposed paragraph (u) SBA would define ``Nondisadvantaged individual.''This definition would make clear that an individual will be regarded asnondisadvantaged if he/she does not claim disadvantaged status, is notfound by SBA to be disadvantaged, or whose disadvantaged status is notrelied upon by SBA in qualifyinq a concern for program participation. Thisdefinition would also clarify that once an individual has used his/herdisadvantaged status to qualify a concern for program participation, thatindividual would be considered as nondisadvantaged for all other 8(a) programpurposes.  SBA is proposing to include a definition for ``Non-8(a) business activitytarget'' at paragraph (w). This definition would be used in conjunctionwith the requirement of the section 8(a) of the Small Business Act, asamended by Pub. L. 100-656, that a concern in the transitional stage ofthe 8(a) program must meet appropriate targets for the mix of 8(a) andnon-8(a) revenues. SBA is proposing to amend its definition of ``Principal place of business''at paragraph (aa). The new definition would require SBA to determine aconcern's principal place of business based on two factors: the locationof the concern's books and records, and the location at which the individualwho manages the concern s day-to-day operations spends the majority ofhis/her working hours. Proposed paragraph (kk) would define ``Unconditional ownership.'' Thisdefinition would make clear that any arrangement which would serve to allowthe benefits of program participation to accrue to nondisadvantaged individualswould not be considered to be unconditional for purposes of these regulations.Unconditional ownership of a business concern by a disadvantaged individualis required as a condition of program eligibility in accordance with andSection;124.103. Proposed andSection; 124.101 would describe the process for determining 8(a)program eligibility. Except for concerns owned by Indian tribes, AlaskaNative Corporations and Native Hawaiian Organizations, addressed by andSection;andSection;124.112 and 124.113, respectively, each applicant concern must meet therequirements set forth in andSection;andSection; 124.102 through 124.110. Underthe proposed procedure, the AA/MSBandamp;COD would approve or decline eachapplication in writing setting forth the basis of his or her determination.If an application were denied based on a negative finding of social disadvantage,economic disadvantage, ownership or control, the applicant would be entitledto appeal to SBA's Office of Hearings and Appeals (OHA) under andSection;124.210 and Part 134 of this Title. The written decision of OHA would bethe final agency action on the matter. Under these regulations, Program Participants would be required to continueto meet the eligibility criteria of andSection;andSection; 124.102 through124.110. Failure to do so would be grounds for termination from the 8(a)program. Proposed paragraph (c) of andSection; 124.101 would describe  SBA's intentto continue to ensure that the benefits of the 8(a) program accrue onlyto eligible individuals and concerns. It is also SBA's intent to preventfraud and abuse in the 8(a) program. Towards these ends, paragraph (c)proposes to detail grounds for which SBA would review the eligibility ofany applicant concern or Program Participant. Proposed andSection; 124.102 discusses the requirement that 8(a) applicantconcerns and Program Participants qualify as small businesses under andSection;121.4 of Title 13, Code of Federal Regulations. Proposed paragraphs (a),(c), and (d) restate the requirements of existing paragraphs (a) and (b)of andSection; 124.102 and have been reorganized as proposed paragraphs (a),(c) and (d) for greater clarity. Proposed paragraph (d) would also referencean exemption from the size requirement authorized by Pub. L. 100-656 andset forth in proposed andSection; 124.321 for contracts awarded to jointventures controlled by eligible Indian tribes. Contrary to past programpolicy, any such Program Participant would not be required to certify itssmall business size status under the applicable size standard for each8(a) contract which it is awarded. Proposed paragraph (b) of andSection; 124.102 would permit the Division ofProgram Certification and Eligibility to deny a concern's application forprogram admission or to request a formal size determination from the appropriateregional office in instances where the Division is unable to determinethat an applicant concern qualifies as a small business. The provisionwould also permit an applicant concern whose application has been so deniedto seek a formal size determination from the appropriate SBA regional officeand to appeal a negative regional size determination to SBA's Office ofHearings and Appeals, pursuant to SBA's size regulations (andSection;andSection;121.8 and 121.11 of this Title). Proposed andSection; 124.103 describes the ownership requirements of the8(a) program for applicant and participating concerns, other than thoseowned by Indian tribes, Alaska Native Corporations and Native HawaiianOrganizations. Ownership requirements for applicant and participating concernsowned by Indian tribes and Alaska Native Corporations are set forth inproposed andSection; 124.112 and for such concerns owned by Native HawaiianOrganizations in andSection; 124.113. The proposed ownership provisions generally reflect the requirements ofexisting 8(a) program regulations, the Reform Act or Agency policy as ithas developed since the last revision of 8(a) program regulations, whichwas published in 1986. This proposed section implements a provision ofthe legislative history of the Reform Act that would require disadvantagedowners to hold unconditional interests in their 8(a) concerns of at least51 percent. SBA proposes to define unconditional ownership in andSection;124.100(kk). This proposed section would also require that, for two years prior to programentry, 51 percent of each applicant concern must be owned by the disadvantagedindividuals upon whom 8(a) program eligibility is sought to be based. Inunusual cases, SBA is proposing to permit an exception to this rule ifit can be demonstrated that the recent transfer of ownership to the disadvantagedindividual(s) upon whom eligibility is to be based was an arms length transaction.Proposed paragraph (a) of andSection; 124.103 would require an applicantconcern which is a partnership to reflect the ownership interest of thedisadvantaged owner in the concern's partnership agreement. In the caseof any applicant concern which is a corporation, proposed paragraph (b)would require that 51 percent of each class of voting stock be owned bythe disadvantaged owner(s) and that 51 percent of the aggregate of allclasses of stock be owned by the disadvantaged owner(s). Existing paragraph(c) imposes the 51 percent ownership requirement only on voting stock.SBA is proposing to change this requirement to reflect existing programprocedures and to ensure that the statutorily required ownership interestsare not diluted by issuances of other classes of stock. SBA also proposes to include in andSection; 124.103 some additional requirementsrelating to stock and stock options which are intended to prevent circumventionof the statutory requirements regarding 51 percent ownership by one ormore disadvantaged individuals. Proposed paragraph (d) would state Agencypolicy that, in evaluating the ownership interest held by the disadvantagedindividual(s), SBA would treat as exercised options to purchase stock orto convert non-voting stock or debentures held by nondisadvantaged individualsor entities not in the same or similar line of business. Proposed paragraph(e) would require that the disadvantaged individual(s) receive at least51 percent of any dividends of a corporate applicant concern, includingdistributions upon liquidation. The provision would also require that thedisadvantaged individuals upon whom program eligibility is based be entitledto receive 100 percent of the value of each share of stock if sold. Paragraphs (f) and (g) would restrict disadvantaged and nondisadvantagedowners of one 8(a) concern from simultaneously owning another 8(a) concern.Paragraph (h) would preclude a non-8(a) concern from having an ownershipinterest in an 8(a) concern. Paragraph (j) would exempt from the ownershiplimitations of paragraphs (g), (h), and (i) of this section and andSection;124.104(a)(5) individual ownership interests of less than 5 percent.Proposed andSection; 124.104 would restate the existing requirements forcontrol and management of an 8(a) concern and would add examples to therequirements for clarity. Paragraph (a) would impose restrictions on nondisadvantaged individualswho are involved in the management of an applicant or participating concern.This paragraph would prohibit management participation by any such individualor any immediate family member who resides in his/her household who isa former employer of the disadvantaged owner(s) of the applicant or 8(a)concern, or who was an owner, stockholder, partner, officer, director ormanager of another concern in the same or similar line of business as theapplicant or 8(a) concern. In addition, such individuals would be prohibitedfrom exercising actual control or having the power to control the applicantor 8(a) concern, from receiving excessive compensation for personal servicesas directors or employees of the applicant or 8(a) concern, or from havingan ownership interest in another 8(a) concern. As noted in the previoussection, this ownership restriction would not apply to ownership interestsof less than 5 percent. This section would permit written exceptions bythe AA/MSBandamp;COD to the former employer prohibition, the excessive compensationprohibition and the prohibition of ownership of 5 percent or more of another8(a) concern. Paragraph (e) of andSection; 124.104 would adopt a current procedural requirementthat the socially and economically disadvantaged individual(s) upon whom8(a) eligibility is based control the concern's Board of Directors. Proposed andSection; 124.105 would set forth regulatory requirements relatingto social disadvantage. Much of this proposed section would be identicalto existing regulations. The word ``considered'' has been changed to ``presumed''to more precisely state the agency's policy and practice in administeringthe program. SBA also proposes to expand the definition of Asian PacificAmericans to include individuals with origins from Burma, Thailand, Malaysia,Indonesia, Singapore, Brunei, Japan, China, Taiwan, Kampuchea, Vietnam,Korea, the Philippines, Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands (Republicof Palau, Republic of the Marshall Islands, Federated States of Micronesia,the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands, Guam, and Samoa). Inaddition, SBA proposes to include in regulation for the first time a definitionof Subcontinent Asian Americans. This definition would reflect currentprogram policy and would include individuals with origins from India, Pakistan,Bangladesh, Sri Lanka. SBA also proposes to add to the definition of SubcontinentAsians, individuals with origins from Bhutan and Nepal. SBA considers thatindividuals with origins in these countries share similar culture, heritageand physical characteristics. SBA invites public comment on these definitions.SBA is proposing to amend andSection; 124.106 to reflect the mandates ofthe Small Business Act as amended by Public Law 100-656, to incorporatecurrent program policy regarding economic disadvantage, and to providemore definitive criteria for determining economic disadvantage. In paragraph(a) of this section, SBA is proposing to set forth the criteria to be usedin determining economic disadvantage for purposes of 8(a) program eligibility.In paragraph (b) of this section, SBA is proposing to set forth the criteriato be used in determining economic disadvantage for the subcontractingprogram authorized under section 8(d) of the Small Business Act, the SmallDisadvantaged Business Set-Aside and Evaluation Preference Programs ofthe Department of Defense authorized by section 1207 of Public Law 99-661,and for any other Federal procurement programs which require SBA to determinedisadvantaged status as a condition of eligibility. For purposes of 8(a) program eligibility for applicant and Participantconcerns, SBA is proposing to determine economic disadvantage by analyzingfactors in three general categories: the personal financial condition ofthe individual(s) claiming disadvantaged status, including the individual'saccess to credit and capital; the financial condition of the applicantconcern; and the applicant concern's access to credit and capital. In accordancewith current program policy, SBA is proposing to include in its considerationthe personal net worth of an individual and his/her spouse, if married.The requirement of a joint financial statement would not apply if the individualis separated from his/her spouse, and there has been a separation of theassets of the spouses recognized by a court of competent jurisdiction.In accordance with section 8(a)(6) of the Small Business Act as amendedby Pub. L. 100-656, SBA is proposing to exclude from its calculations ofpersonal net worth the individual's ownership interest in the applicantor participating 8(a) concern, and the equity in his/her primary personalresidence. However, SBA would include any portion of such equity in theprimary residence which is attributable to excessive withdrawals from thebusiness concern. SBA is also proposing to list in this section those assetswhich it will exclude from consideration when calculating the personalnet worth of an individual claiming to be an Alaska Native. In analyzing the business financial condition of an applicant or Participantconcern, SBA is proposing to compare the concern to other firms in thesame or similar line of business utilizing standard industry averages.In making this comparison SBA will consider a number of factors, including,among others: business assets, revenues, pre-tax profit, business net worth,return on assets, return on investments, return on sales, current ratio,ratio of sales to officers' compensation, and debt to net worth. Finally, SBA is proposing to continue to measure a concern's access tocredit and capital by considering the concern's access to long-term financing,working capital financing, equipment trade credit, raw materials and/orsupplier trade credit, and its bonding capability, if required. For purposes of the section 8(d) Subcontracting Program and other programsrequiring SBA to determine disadvantaged status as a condition of eligibility,SBA is proposing to consider the same factors set forth in andSection; 124.106(a)for determining economic disadvantage. SBA would, however, apply thesestandards to take into account the intent of Congress that partial or completeachievement of a concern's 8(a) program business development goals wouldnot necessarily preclude the concern from participation in other Federalprograms designated for socially and economically disadvantaged concerns.SBA is proposing to amend andSection; 124.107 to incorporate existing programpolicy, to provide clarification of existing regulation, and to implementsection 7(j)(11) of the Small Business Act as amended by Pub. L. 100-656.SBA is proposing to include in this section current policy which requiresthat SBA look at a number of factors when determining an applicant concern'spotential for success. These factors include the technical and managerialexperience and competency of the individual(s) upon whom eligibility isbased, the financial capacity of the applicant concern and the concern'srecord for performance on previous Federal and private sector contractsin the primary industry classification in which the concern is seeking8(a) certification. Further, in accordance with SBA's current policy, it would generally findthat potential for success exists if the applicant concern has been inbusiness in the primary industry classification in which it seeks 8(a)certification for two full years, has a proven performance record and isfinancially sound. If adopted, this section would also set forth the limitedcircumstances under which a concern which has not been in business fortwo years would be found to possess potential for success. SBA is proposing to include the new requirement of the Reform Act thatwith two exceptions, SBA cannot deny an applicant concern program admissiondue solely to a determination that specific contract opportunities arenot available for it. SBA would be authorized to deny program admissionif the Government does not procure the types of products or services offeredby the concern, or the Government's purchase of such products or servicesis not in sufficient quantities to support the applicant concern's 8(a)program participation in addition to that of current program participantsproviding similar products or services. SBA is proposing to leave paragraph (a) of andSection; 124.108 regardingindividual character reviews for 8(a) eligibility purposes essentiallythe same. SBA is proposing to amend paragraph (b) of this section to includespecific reference to the prohibition imposed by section 8(a) of the SmallBusiness Act as amended by Pub. L. 100-656 against SBA employees and formeremployees holding an ownership interest in an 8(a) concern. In accordance with the provisions of section 7(j)(11) of the Small BusinessAct, as amended by Pub. L. 100-656, SBA is also proposing to amend paragraph(c) of this section to provide that an individual or a business concernmay only use his/her or its eligibility one time to qualify a concern for8(a) program participation. The existing exceptions under which a concerncould be reinstated for program participation would be eliminated. SBAis also proposing that an individual or concern would be deemed to haveused his/her or its eligibility effective upon the date of the concern'sapproval for program participation. In this section SBA would state thatan individual who has used his/her eligibility to qualify a concern forprogram participation which has exited the 8(a) program is not precludedfrom holding an ownership interest in another 8(a) concern, but that he/shewill be regarded as a nondisadvantaged owner of the second concern. In this section, SBA is proposing to implement section 7(j)(11) of theSmall Business Act, as amended by Pub. L. 100-656 which provides that thetransfer of ownership and control of an 8(a) concern to a new individual(s)does not necessarily terminate a concern's 8(a) eligibility. However, inorder for the firm to be found eligible for continued participation, SBAwould have to find the new individual(s) to be socially and economicallydisadvantaged. If continued eligibility were found, the Program Term ofthe firm would continue without change. SBA is proposing to amend paragraph (d) of andSection; 124.108 to requirethat at the time of program application, a program applicant whose primaryindustry classification is in the fields of manufacturing or supply mustmeet the Walsh-Healey definition for a manufacturer or supplier, and tostate that this requirement is in no way affected by the Walsh-Healey exemptionsallowed by section 301(b)(C) of Pub. L. 100-656 to a Program Participantin the development stage. Finally, SBA is proposing to add a new paragraph (e) to andSection; 124.108which would amend existing SBA policy to allow immediate family membersof a disadvantaged owner who reside in the same household to qualify morethan one 8(a) concern at the same time so long as the concerns are in separatelines of business, and are separately owned, managed and controlled. SBA is not proposing to change existing paragraph (a) of andSection; 124.109which states that brokers and packagers are ineligible for 8(a) participation.Existing paragraph (b) which states that debarred or suspended personsor concerns are ineligible for 8(a) participation would also remain essentiallyunchanged, but would be proposed as new paragraph (d). SBA is also proposing to make ineligible for 8(a) program participationnew applicant concerns which are franchises. SBA is proposing to excludefranchises from program eligibility because the franchisor-franchisee arrangement,by its nature, gives the franchisor some degree of control over the management,daily business operations and business development of the franchisee. SBAspecifically invites public comment on this proposed change from currentpolicy. SBA is also proposing to specify that non-profit organizations, becausethey do not meet SBA's definition of small business, do not qualify for8(a) program participation. Finally, SBA is proposing to revise the regulationsto include current program policy which provides that a concern which isowned in whole or in part by another business concern and which relieson such ownership to qualify it as disadvantaged, is ineligible for programparticipation. Such applicant concern is ineligible because it does notmeet SBA's requirement that a concern be at least 51 percent owned by adisadvantaged person(s). SBA is proposing to amend andSection; 124.110 to reflect the Program Termmandated by section 7(j) of the Small Business Act, as amended by Pub.L. 100-656. SBA is proposing to delete in their entireties existing andSection;andSection;124.110(a)-(j) and 124.111, ``Fixed program participation term,'' and ``Mechanicsfor extension of a fixed program participation term,'' respectively, andto substitute a new andSection; 124.110 titled ``Program Term,'' to reflectthe legislated changes. This new Program Term would replace the conceptof Fixed Program Participation Term (FPPT) which was established in section7(j) of the Small Business Act as amended by Pub. L. 96-481. Under theFPPT system, all firms participating in the 8(a) program as of April 21,1982, and all firms approved for the program subsequent to that date wereeligible to negotiate an original FPPT of up to five years. These firmswere also eligible to receive one extension not to exceed the differencebetween the original term and seven years. In accordance with the new provisions of section 7(j) of the Small BusinessAct, as amended by Pub. L. 100-656, any concern which was in the programas of September 1, 1988, and did not withdraw or was not terminated orgraduated between that date and November 15, 1988, received a new ProgramTerm which was the greater of nine years less the number of years sincethe award of the concern's first 8(a) contract, or the concern's originalFixed Program Participation Term (FPPT), plus extension, if any, plus eighteenmonths. It is SBA's interpretation that concerns which had been approvedfor program participation prior to November 15, 1988, but which had receivedno 8(a) contract awards as of that date, should be treated as if they wereapproved on November 15, 1988, and receive a nine year Program Term beginningon that date. SBA is proposing to add a new andSection; 124.111 to implement section 8(a)of the Small Business Act, as amended by Pub. L. 100-656, which requireseach Program Participant to make certain annual submissions to SBA. SBAwould be required to examine each Program Participant based on its annualsubmissions, or on information received by other sources, to determinewhether the Participant and its disadvantaged owners continue to meet alleligibility standards, including the standards established for determiningeconomic disadvantage. In accordance with the provisions of the statute,SBA is proposing to provide in andSection; 124.110 that a concern's continuedprogram participation is contingent upon its continuing compliance withthe eligibility criteria set forth in andSection;andSection; 124.101 through124.109. Failure to continue to meet the standards of eligibility wouldresult in SBA's initiation of termination or graduation proceedings againstthe firm.In this section, SBA is also proposing to implement the statutory provisionthat SBA examine information provided annually by each Program Participant,and from other sources, to determine whether an excessive amount of fundsor other assets has been withdrawn from the Participant for the personalbenefit of the disadvantaged owner(s) or that of any person or entity affiliatedwith such owner(s) to the detriment of the achievement of the targets,objectives, and goals of the concern's business plan. In accordance withthe statute, if SBA found such excessive withdrawals, the Agency wouldinitiate termination proceedings against the concern, or require an appropriatereinvestment of funds or other assets and such other actions as the Agencymay deem necessary to counteract the detrimental withdrawals.  Proposed andSection; 124.112 would address 8(a) program eligibility requirementsfor concerns owned by Indian tribes. The term Indian tribe includes AlaskaNative corporations organized pursuant to the Alaska Native Claims SettlementAct, as amended (43 U.S.C. 1601, <T3>et seq.</T3>) (see andSection; 124.100(m)). Because tribal ownershipis significantly different from ownership by disadvantaged individuals,SBA proposes to establish some separate application requirements for tribally-ownedentities. Although tribally-owned entities have been eligible for the 8(a)program for a number of years and most of the separate requirements havebeen required as a matter of Agency policy and procedure, this is the firsttime SBA has included such requirements in its regulations.  In addition, where the requirements for concerns owned by Alaska NativeCorporations differ from those applicable to tribally-owned entities ingeneral, this section would set them forth separately. These separate requirementsare dictated by the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act, as amended (43U.S.C. 1601, <T3>et seq.</T3>).  This regulation would require that an Indian tribe meet the following criteriain order to qualify a concern for 8(a) program participation. Once an Indiantribe has established its disadvantaged status, it would not normally berequired to reestablish such status in order to have other businesses thatit owns certified for 8(a) program participation. However, the AA/MSBandamp;CODis authorized to require such demonstration of disadvantaged status atany time.  Absent evidence to the contrary, an Indian tribe meeting the definitionfound in andSection; 124.100(m) would be deemed to be socially disadvantaged.The Indian tribe would also be required to demonstrate that the tribe itselfis economically disadvantaged by complying with andSection; 124.105 and bysubmitting for SBA's consideration the following information: the numberof tribal members, the present tribal unemployment rate, the per capitaincome of tribal members (excluding judgment awards), the percentage ofthe local Indian population below the poverty level, the tribe's accessto capital markets, a list of all enterprises which are wholly or partiallyowned by the tribe and the primary industry classification of each, a listof members of the tribe which manage or control tribally-owned enterprisesor serve as their officers or directors, and the tribal assets as disclosedin a current tribal financial statement. Such financial statement shouldinclude all assets, even those which are encumbered or held in trust, andshould specifically note which assets are so encumbered or held in trust. In addition, an Indian tribe must submit as part of its application a copyof its governing document(s) such as its constitution or business charter,evidence of its recognition as a tribe eligible for special programs andservices provided by the United States or its state of residence, and copiesof its articles of incorporation and by-laws or similar documents as filedwith the organizing or chartering authority.  In order to qualify for 8(a) program certification, a concern owned byan eligible Indian tribe must be organized for profit and must waive anysovereign immunity which may attach by reason of tribal ownership. Suchconcern must also qualify as a small business concern in its primary industryclassification as defined for purposes of Government procurement in Part121 of this Title. Tribal ownership will not, in and of itself, cause theconcern to be considered to be affiliated with the tribe or with otherentities owned by the tribe. However, two tribally-owned firms may be affiliatedon other grounds described in Part 121 of this Title.  Proposed paragraph (c)(2)(iii) would implement the Reform Act provisionwhich permits a tribally-owned participant to be a party to a joint venturewhich exceeds the applicable size standard on up to two 8(a) contracts.In order to qualify for such exception to the normal size requirements,the joint venture would be required to be 51 percent or more owned andcontrolled by the tribally-owned Participant, located on the tribe's reservationor tribally-owned land, must perform most of its activities on such reservationor tribally-owned land, and must employ members of the tribe for at least50 percent of its total workforce. This exception is limited to two 8(a)contracts.  The ownership requirements for tribally-owned entities would be generallythe same as those set forth in andSection; 124.103; however, the tribe wouldbe permitted to own more than one 8(a) Participant provided that the Participantsare not in the same or similar line of business.  While many of the management and control requirements for tribally-ownedconcerns are the same as those imposed on other 8(a) Participants by andSection;124.104, provisions of the Reform Act impose some different control andmanagement requirements for tribally-owned concerns. Tribally-owned concernsmust be managed by members of the tribe who possess the same degree oftechnical experience and expertise as is required of other 8(a) managersunder andSection; 124.104(d). The Reform Act authorizes managers of tribally-ownedconcerns to manage a maximum of two such concerns. In contrast, other 8(a)managers are required to devote full-time to management of the Participant.Under this proposed section, after an individual tribal member has managedtwo tribally-owned concerns, he/she would be considered to have used his/her8(a) eligibility and would be precluded from using such eligibility toqualify any other concerns for 8(a) program participation.  Under this proposed section, members of the tribal council would be prohibitedfrom participating in the daily management of a tribally-owned Participantor from serving on its Board of Directors without first receiving writtenapproval from SBA.  This section would require that the primary economic benefits from theParticipant accrue to the tribe. Such receipt of economic benefit wouldbe presumed if the concern is located on the tribe's reservation or onother land which was tribally-owned prior to the existence of the concern.A tribally-owned concern would also be required to meet the eligibilitycriteria set forth in andSection;andSection; 124.107 through 124.109.  The special provisions relating to Alaska Native Corporations are proposedat paragraph (a)(3) of andSection; 124.112. While most of the requirementsare the same as for other Indian tribes, SBA has attempted in this proposedsection to reconcile requirements of the Alaska Native Claims SettlementAct, as amended (43 U.S.C. 1606) (Native Claims Act) with those of theSmall Business Act, as amended by the Reform Act. Therefore, for purposesof evaluating economic disadvantage, SBA proposes to prohibit any considerationof assets or income derived from distributions of the Alaska Native Fund,established by the Native Claims Act, although Alaska Native Corporationswould be required to include such assets on their financial statementsand specifically identify them as distributions of the Alaska Native Fund. This proposed section would describe the relationship between Alaska Natives,descendants of Alaska Natives, and an Alaska Native Corporation. In addition,this proposed section would make clear that the non-profit status of anAlaska Native Corporation in no way would affect the requirement that an8(a) applicant be a for-profit concern. Where the majority of the concern'sstock or other ownership interest is owned by the Alaska Native Corporationand holders of its Settlement Stock, this proposed section would deem suchconcern owned and controlled by the Alaska Native Corporation.Finally, this proposed section would make clear that an Alaska Native whoholds Settlement Common Stock would be treated as a tribal member for purposesof the control and management requirements of this section and andSection;124.104 and that officers or directors of the Alaska Native Corporationwould be treated as members of a tribal council for purposes of the restrictionon their daily management and control of the 8(a) Participant without priorwritten SBA approval.  SBA is proposing to add a new andSection; 124.113 to implement section 8(a)(15)of the Small Business Act as amended by Pub. L. 100-656. In this sectionSBA would state that concerns owned by Native Hawaiian Organizations areeligible for participation in the 8(a) program and other Federal programswhich require SBA to determine social and economic disadvantage as a conditionof eligibility.  Proposed andSection; 124.201(a) is designed to allow the SBA to meet theprovisions of the law requiring a 90-day time frame for the processingof applications for entry into the 8(a) program and the provision of comprehensivemanagement and technical assistance. Congress suggested using establishedratios of business opportunity specialists to serve the 8(a) portfolio,and andSection; 124.201(a) is intended to permit the AA/MSBandamp;COD to maintainappropriate resources to meet these requirements. Section 124.201(b) wouldstate SBA's policy that, except as noted in andSection; 124.201(a), concernshave the right to apply for 8(a) assistance, whether or not there is anappearance of eligibility.  Proposed sections 202 through 205 would provide technical information regardingthe application process, the use of representatives in connection withfiling 8(a) applications, and the location of the servicing office fora concern approved for 8(a) program participation. SBA is proposing onlyminor clarifying changes to these sections.  SBA proposes to implement section 8(a)(9) of the Small Business Act, asamended by section 409 of the Reform Act by adding new andSection;andSection;124.206 through 124.210. These proposed new sections would describe therights of an applicant concern or Program Participant, with regard to certaininitial Agency decisions, to seek further Agency review including an administrativeappeal to an Administrative Law Judge. The Reform Act would authorize anappeal of an initial Agency decision if such decision relates to programgraduation, program termination, a denial of a request for a waiver ofthe restriction against the sale of an 8(a) concern pursuant to andSection;124.317, or denial of program admission based on social disadvantage, economicdisadvantage, ownership, or control.  Section 409 of the Reform Act authorizes a hearing on the record underthe Administrative Procedure Act (5 U.S.C. 551, <T3>et seq.</T3>), but at the same time requires that the Agency's proposedaction ``be sustained unless it is found to be arbitrary, capricious, orcontrary to law.'' Section 409 further amends the usual scheme of APA hearingsby requiring that the ALJ's decision be ``the final decision of the Administration.''Generally, APA hearings call for an ALJ to conduct a factfinding hearingand to make a recommended decision to the Agency program official. Thatofficial would then be responsible for making the final Agency decisionon the matter.  In order to reconcile the apparent internal inconsistency of section 409of the Reform Act and to give meaning to the arbitrary and capricious standard,SBA has proposed procedures which require, except in limited circumstances,that the ALJ review the record as it existed when the Agency made its initialdecision to determine whether or not the Agency decisionmakers had beenarbitrary or capricious. The Administrative Law Judge (ALJ) would be requiredto remand the case to the AA/MSBandamp;COD where the administrative recorddoes not set forth the reason upon which the Agency's initial decisionis based. In limited cases, where the applicant concern or Participantfirst makes a showing that the decision was made with bad faith or improperbehavior on the part of SBA, the ALJ may permit the introduction of newor additional evidence, including testimony, and appropriate discoveryon the issue. In order to make the required showing, the applicant concernor Participant would be required to present credible evidence not mereallegations to the ALJ. The Agency would be afforded an opportunity torespond to the showing prior to a decision on the introduction of new oradditional evidence.  The proposed regulation would make clear that the burden of proof remainswith the applicant concern or Participant regardless of the result of theshowing presented by the applicant concern or Participant.  In order to afford the program applicants and Program Participants dueprocess consistent with the Reform Act provisions, these proposed procedureswould permit applicant or participating concerns to submit new evidenceto the 8(a) program officials either through a reconsideration procedurefor declined program applicants (Denial of Program Admission, andSection;124.206) or through a procedure affording Participants two separate opportunitiesto demonstrate why program termination or graduation should not occur (Programgraduation, andSection; 124.208 or Program termination, andSection; 124.209). Section 124.206 sets forth the procedures relating to approval and declineof applications for 8(a) program admission. An application would be consideredfirst by the Division of Program Certification and Eligibility which wouldmake a recommendation on program certification to the AA/MSBandamp;COD. TheAA/MSBandamp;COD is authorized to approve or decline such applications and,unless appealed to the Office of Hearings and Appeals under andSection; 124.210,the AA/MSBandamp;COD's decision would be the final agency determination. An applicant which has been denied program admission would be affordedan opportunity to seek reconsideration. As part of the reconsiderationprocess, the applicant concern could change or correct the circumstanceswhich caused the initial decline and could also submit new evidence tosupplement the written record. The Division of Program Certification andEligibility (Division) would review any additional information along withthe existing record and would make a recommendation to the AA/MSBandamp;COD.The AA/MSBandamp;COD would consider the complete record and would rendera decision. Such decision would become the final Agency decision within30 days if not appealed to the Office of Hearings and Appeals under andSection;124.210.SBA is proposing to establish a new andSection; 124.207 which, in accordancewith the provisions of section 7(j)(10) of the Small Business Act as amendedby Pub. L. 100-656, will enumerate the means by which a participant concernmay leave the 8(a) program. These means are: voluntary withdrawal, expirationof the concern's Program Term, graduation, and termination. Proposed andSection; 124.208 sets forth SBA's procedures by which a ProgramParticipant could be graduated from the 8(a) program. SBA would initiatesuch procedures when it determines that a Program Participant has substantiallyachieved the targets, objectives and goals described in its business plan.Under the proposed procedures, SBA would notify the Participant of itsintent to initiate program graduation in a letter of notification, whichwould set forth findings for every material issue relating to the basisfor program graduation and the reasons for each finding. The Participantwould be afforded 45 days to respond to the letter with written informationexplaining why the proposed basis for graduation is unwarranted. Following the response period, the Division of Program Certification andEligibility would review the written record of the proposed graduation,including any information submitted by the Participant. The Division wouldnotify the Participant of its proposed actions, either to recommend programgraduation to the AA/MSBandamp;COD or not. In instances where the basis forprogram graduation continues to exist following the first response period,the Participant would be afforded an additional 45 day period to submitany further written information which would rebut the proposed graduation.In those cases, following the second response period, the Division wouldconsider the entire record relating to the proposed program graduation.If the Division Director determines that program graduation is not warranted,he/she would so inform the Participant. If the Division Director determinesthat graduation is appropriate, he/she would recommend in writing to theAA/MSBandamp;COD that the Participant be graduated. Upon recommendation of the Division Director, the AA/MSBandamp;COD wouldconsider the proposed graduation and the record relating to it. If theAA/MSBandamp;COD determines that program graduation is not appropriate, he/shewould so notify the Participant. If he/she determines that graduation iswarranted, he/she would issue a Notice of Program Graduation to the Participant,which sets forth findings for every material issue relating to the basisof the program graduation along with specific reasons for each finding.The Notice would also advise the Participant of its right to appeal thedecision to the Office of Hearings and Appeals under andSection; 124.210and Part 134 of this Title. This decision would become the final Agencydecision within 45 days from the date that the Notice was mailed if theParticipant chooses not to appeal to the Office of Hearings and Appealswithin that period. After the effective date of program graduation, a concern which has beengraduated from the 8(a) program would no longer be eligible to receiveany 8(a) program assistance. Program graduation does not, however, affectthe concern's obligations to complete contracts previously awarded undersection 8(a) of the Small Business Act. Proposed andSection; 124.209 would address program termination prior to theexpiration of a Participant's Program Term. SBA would be authorized toseek program termination if good cause exists. The listing of examplesof good cause would be illustrative and not all inclusive. Generally, itwould restate those examples of good cause included in the existing regulations(<T3>see, </T3>andSection; 124.112 of existing regulations). Proposed program termination procedures would be similar to those proposedin andSection; 124.208 for program graduation. For program termination, theletters of notification and the Notice of Termination would set forth SBA'sintent to terminate, and findings for every material issue relating tothe grounds upon which such termination would be based and the reasonsfor such findings. Otherwise the procedures would be identical to thoseproposed for program graduation. Proposed andSection; 124.210, in conjunction with Part 134 of this Title,as proposed to be amended by conforming amendments, would describe theappeal rights of an applicant concern or Program Participant relating tocertain Agency determinations, as required by section 8(a)(9) of the SmallBusiness Act, as amended by section 409 of the Reform Act. These determinationswould be program graduation, program termination, denial of a request fora waiver from the prohibition against the sale of an 8(a) Participant pursuantto andSection; 124.317, and denial of program admission based solely on anegative finding of social disadvantage, economic disadvantage, ownershipor control. Within 45 days from the date that a Notice of such Agency determinationis mailed, an applicant or Participant concern could initiate an appealby filing a petition in accordance with Part 134 with SBA's Office of Hearingsand Appeals and concurrently serving the AA/MSBandamp;COD with a copy ofthe petition and all its attachments. In addition to meeting the requirementsof andSection; 134.11(a), a petition would be required to contain reasonswhy the Agency's determination is alleged to be arbitrary, capricious orcontrary to law with specific reference to the determination and the recordsupporting such determination. Appeal proceedings would be conducted by an Administrative Law Judge inaccordance with this section and with Part 134 of this Title. An ALJ selectedto preside over an appeal would be precluded by statute from acceptingjurisdiction over any of the following: (1) An appeal, which does not onits face allege facts that if proven to be true would warrant reversalor modification of the Agency determination; (2) an appeal which is untimelyfiled or otherwise not filed in accordance with this section or Part 134of this Title; or (3) an appeal, the subject of which has been decidedor is the subject of an adjudication before a court of competent jurisdictionover such matters.The determination of the Agency would be sustained unless found to be arbitrary,capricious or contrary to 1aw. The decision of the ALJ would be the finalAgency decision. In instances where the ALJ, in his/her discretion, determinesthat the record of the determination is insufficiently complete to decidewhether the determination was arbitrary, capricious or contrary to law,the ALJ would be permitted to remand the case for further considerationby the program officials. Unless the convenience and necessity of the partieswould require otherwise, any hearing relating to an appeal pursuant toparagraph (a) of this section would be conducted in the Washington, DCarea. SBA is proposing a new andSection; 124.211 dealing with the suspension ofprogram assistance to 8(a) Participant concerns. This section would replacecurrent andSection; 124.113. The proposed section would be essentially thesame as the current section except that changes are proposed which wouldreflect the proposed changes in procedures for the handling of terminationactions. SBA is also proposing to make the decision of the AdministrativeLaw Judge the final Agency decision in any hearing held regarding a programsuspension action. Finally, in paragraph (k), SBA is proposing to provideregulatory notice of current Agency policy that SBA does not recognizethe concept of de facto suspension. In accordance with this policy, unlessa concern has been formally suspended from the 8(a) program by SBA it willnot be eligible for reinstatement of any portion of its program term.Proposed andSection; 124.301 addresses business plans. Proposed paragraph(a) would set forth the general requirement that each 8(a) Program Participantdevelop and submit to SBA a comprehensive business plan, setting forththe Participant's business targets, objectives, and goals. SBA must approvethe business plan before the Participant is eligible to receive 8(a) contracts.Proposed paragraph (b) would require the business plan to contain the primaryindustry classification relevant to the 8(a) concern and related secondaryStandard Industrial Classification (SIC) code designations and would permitthe Participant to receive only those 8(a) contracts which are classifiedunder SIC codes approved in its business plan. However, a Participant wouldbe free to pursue contracts classified under SIC codes not contained inits business plan through Federal procurement procedures other than 8(a).Proposed paragraph (c) of andSection; 124.301 would set forth the requiredcontents of the business plan. The plan would include analyses of marketpotential, competitive environment, the concern's prospects for success,the concern's strengths and weaknesses, business development goals, estimatesof contract awards needed to meet those goals (both 8(a) and non-8(a)),and such other information as SBA may require. These requirements are basedon section 7(j)(10) of the Small Business Act, as amended by section 205of the Reform Act. Proposed andSection; 124.302 addresses the procedures and requirements forannual review and modification of the business plan. The Participant'sbusiness plan would be required to be reviewed annually with the BusinessOpportunity Specialist. The annual review of a participant's business Planwould generally occur within 15 working days before or after the anniversaryof the firm's certification of 8(a) eligibility. During the annual review,the Participant would be required to forecast its needs for 8(a) and non-8(a)contract awards during the next program year and succeeding program year.This section would also set forth the circumstances under which changesin the SIC code designations stated in a Participant's business plan wouldbe approved. SBA's current regulations permit SIC code changes only undernarrow circumstances where (1) an additional SIC code designation is neededto correct significant limitations in 8(a) contract support due to procuringagency actions beyond the control of the 8(a) concern, and (2) the Administratordetermines that, absent a SIC code change, the 8(a) concern would be unableto achieve reasonable 8(a) development. Congress was concerned that SBA'sexisting regulation could limit a Participant's business development byrestricting natural lines of business progression. The proposed rule wouldexpand the circumstances under which an 8(a) concern could request a SICcode change in accordance with section 8(a)(7)(B), as added by section303(g) of the Reform Act and as a result of SBA policy determinations.The 8(a) concern could request such a change if the requested SIC codeis related to the primary industry of the concern and represents a logicalbusiness progression for the concern; the 8(a) concern has demonstratedcapacity and capability to perform in the requested SIC code; and otherapplicable eligibility criteria are met. The proposed regulation also providesfor SIC code additions or changes when SBA makes an error. Finally, andSection; 124.302 would require each Program Participant in thetransitional stage of program participation (fifth to ninth years of programparticipation) to annually submit a transition management plan outliningthe specific steps it will take to promote profitable business operationsafter graduation. This section would implement section 7(j)(10), as amendedby section 205 of the Reform Act and section 8(a)(7)(B), as added by section303(g) of the Reform Act. Section 124.303 would describe the stages of a Participant's program participationand the assistance available in each of the stages, provided that qualifyingcriteria are met. The Program Term would be divided into two stages_a developmentalstage of four years and a transitional stage of five years. Program Participantsin the developmental stage would be eligible for sole source and competitive8(a) awards, financial assistance under a new loan program establishedin lieu of Business Development Expense (BDE), a maximum of two exemptionsfrom the requirements of the Walsh-Healey Act, a maximum of five exemptionsfrom the Miller Act's bonding requirements, financial assistance for skillstraining or upgrading of employees of 8(a) concerns, the transfer of technologyor surplus property owned by the United States to Participants, and trainingsessions to enhance the ability of 8(a) concerns to compete in the openmarketplace. Participants in the transitional stage of program participation would beeligible for the same assistance available to firms in the developmentalstage with the exception of the Walsh-Healey and Miller Act exemptionsand the financial assistance for employees of 8(a) concerns. In addition,such Participants would be eligible to receive from procuring agencies,assistance in forming joint ventures, leader-follower arrangements andteaming agreements, as well as training and technical assistance in transitionalbusiness planning. This section would implement paragraphs (12), (13) and(14) of section 7(j) of the Small Business Act, as added by section 301of the Reform Act. Proposed andSection; 124.304 would set forth the requirements and proceduresfor obtaining an exemption from the requirements of the Walsh-Healey Act.The exemption would enable a Participant to enter into a contingent agreementto acquire machinery, equipment, facilities or labor needed to performan 8(a) contract with an anticipated contract value under $10,000,000.An exemption would be granted only where the contract to which the exemptionwould apply is consistent with the business development goals set forthin the Participant's business plan and where SBA determines that the Participantis fully capable of performing the contract. Participants would be eligibleto receive a maximum of two such exemptions. SBA's authority to grant theseexemptions expires on October l, 1992. This section would implement section7(j)(13)(C) of the Small Business Act, as added by section 301 of the ReformAct.Proposed andSection; 124.305 would set forth the requirements and proceduresfor obtaining exemptions from the requirements of the Miller Act that bidand performance bonds be obtained on Federal construction contracts. Paragraph(a) would set forth the general policy for granting such exemptions. Anexemption would be granted only where SBA determined that an 8(a) concernwas unable to obtain the requisite bonds from a surety. For purposes ofthis proposed section, the term surety means an entity that is in the businessof issuing bonds, not an entity that would be willing to give a bond ona single contract only. Proposed paragraph (b) would set forth the eligibilityrequirements and conditions which would have to be met before a Participantcould receive such an exemption. Proposed paragraph (c) would set forththe limitations on the exemptions, including the limits to SBA's liability,maximum dollar amount of the contract ($3,000,000), and maximum numberof exemptions a Participant may receive during its Program Term (5). Proposedparagraph (d) would set forth the measures to be taken to protect the interestsof third parties such as persons providing material and labor to the Participant,including the establishment of a special bank account into which the procuringagency would deposit all payments relating to the performance of the contract.In addition, the Participant would be required to notify all persons supplyingit with materials or labor, including its own employees, that it has receivedan exemption from the Miller Act's bonding requirements pursuant to thissection and would have to receive written acknowledgment of the receiptof such notification. Proposed paragraph (e) would set forth the proceduresfor obtaining the exemptions, including attainment of approval by the procuringagency. The Miller Act exemptions are authorized only until October 1,1992. This section would implement section 7(j)(13)(D) of the Small BusinessAct, as added by section 301 of the Reform Act. Proposed andSection; 124.306 would set forth the requirements and proceduresfor obtaining financial assistance for skills training or upgrading ofemployees or potential employees of Program Participants in the developmentalstage of program participation. In order to receive such assistance, theProgram Participant would be required to document that other cost-freeor subsidized training programs are not available or suitable. This sectionwould also limit the types of training providers which could be utilizedand would impose certain dollar and time limitations on the training. Finally,this section would require the Participant to give adequate assurance thatit would employ the trainee or upgraded employee for at least six monthsafter training or upgrading has been completed and would require the traineeor upgraded employee to give a similar assurance. If the employee doesnot remain with the Participant for that period, the violating party wouldbe required to reimburse SBA for the training costs and would be ineligiblefor further assistance under this section, subject to a limited exceptionwhen such penalties would be inequitable, such as when the spouse of theemployee being trained is transferred. This section would implement section7(j)(13)(E) of the Small Business Act, as added by section 301 of the ReformAct. Proposed andSection; 124.307 would address contractual assistance to ProgramParticipants generally. SBA's statutory authority to contract with procuringagencies and subcontract the performance to 8(a) concerns is set forthin this proposed section. Such subcontracts may either be sole source awardsor awards attained through competition reserved for eligible 8(a) concerns.Prior to enactment of the Reform Act, 8(a) contracts were awarded onlyon a sole source basis. Pursuant to section 303 of the Reform Act, 8(a)contracts valued at over certain dollar amounts must be competed as ofOctober 1, 1989. <T3>See </T3>proposed andSection; 124.311. This section would also clarifythat admission into the 8(a) program does not bestow a right to receive8(a) contracts and that SBA does not guarantee any particular level ofcontract support to a Participant by approval of its business plan. Proposed andSection; 124.308 would set forth the procedures for obtainingand accepting procurements for the 8(a) program. Proposed paragraph (a)would provide that, in agencies where they are resident or have liaisonresponsibilities, Procurement Center Representatives (PCRs) will screenproposed procurements for potential 8(a) contracts. Paragraph (b) would set forth the mechanisms for identifying a requirementfor possible 8(a) award and the procedures to be followed once a requirementis identified. If SBA determined a requirement to be suitable for the 8(a)program, it would verify the SIC code designated for the requirement andrequest that the requirement be offered to the 8(a) program. If the anticipatedvalue of the requirement is above the statutory thresholds set forth inproposed andSection; 124.311, the SBA would request that it be offered asa competitive contract. If the requirement was below such thresholds, SBAwould request that it be offered either as an open requirement or on behalfof a particular Participant. Paragraph (c) of andSection; 124.308 would set forth the required contentsof the offering letter, the vehicle used to offer a requirement formallyto the 8(a) program. The information which must be contained in the offeringletter would include a description of the work to be performed or itemsto be delivered, the estimated time period for performance, the type ofcontract to be awarded, such as firm fixed price or cost reimbursement,and information showing that acceptance of the requirement for the 8(a)program would not adversely affect another small business. In cases wherethe procuring agency identifies a particular 8(a) concern for consideration,the agency would have to provide justification for its choice, such asthat the particular concern self-marketed the requirement. This informationis necessary so that SBA can make an informed decision as to whether therequirement is suitable for the 8(a) program, whether it must be competedunder the requirements of the Reform Act, and, if it is to be a sole sourcecontract, the appropriate 8(a) concern to perform the contract. Proposed paragraph (d) of andSection; 124.308 would set forth the proceduresfor accepting a requirement for the 8(a) program. Upon receipt of a procuringagency's offer, SBA would determine whether to accept the requirement forthe 8(a) program and would transmit that decision to the procuring agencywithin 15 working days of receipt of the offer, unless granted an extensionby the procuring agency. In the case of a local buy requirement to be acceptedon a sole source basis, SBA would accept the offer both on behalf of theprogram and on behalf of a specific Participant. In the case of a nationalbuy requirement, SBA would accept the offer for the program generally andadvise the procuring agency that the appropriate field office will designatea Participant for performance. In the case of a competitive requirement,it would accept the requirement for the program generally to be competedamong eligible 8(a) Participants. Proposed paragraph (e) of andSection; 124.308 would address sole source awardswhere the procuring agency nominates a specific Program Participant. Proposedparagraph (e)(1) would provide that, once a procurement is deemed suitablefor acceptance as a sole source contract, it will normally be acceptedon behalf of the Participant recommended by the procuring agency as longas certain specified conditions are met. The SBA must determine that theprocurement is consistent with the Participant's business plan, that theParticipant is responsible, and that award of the contract would not resultin the Participant exceeding its approved 8(a) business support level orthe business mix requirements established under andSection; 124.312. Paragraph(e)(1) would implement section 8(a)(1)(A) of the Small Business Act, asadded by section 303 of the Reform Act. Proposed paragraphs (e)(2) and (e)(3) would describe the procedures SBAwould follow after it determines whether or not an appropriate match existswith the nominated concern. If SBA determines an appropriate match doesexist, it would send an acceptance letter, advising the procuring agencywhether or not SBA will participate in contract negotiations or whetherit will authorize the procuring agency to negotiate directly with the identifiedProgram Participant. If SBA determines that an appropriate match does notexist (based on the factors set forth in paragraph (e)(1)), it would selectan alternate 8(a) concern and so advise the procuring agency.Proposed paragraph (f) of andSection; 124.308 would address the proceduresto be used in circumstances where a requirement is offered for the 8(a)program but no particular Program Participant is nominated for award_so-called``open requirements.'' In such a case, if the requirement is a local buyitem, the contract would be referred to the SBA district office in thedistrict where the work is to be performed or items delivered. If no 8(a)concern in that district is deemed qualified to perform the contract, itwould be considered for other 8(a) concerns located in that SBA regionor, if appropriate, other regions. It is also possible that a  specificcontract could be offered to an adjacent district office in another SBARegion before being considered for the rest of the Region if deemed appropriateby SBA. If the contract is a national buy item, it would be referred toSBA s Central Office for allocation. This section would also address the circumstances where SBA must selecta Participant for possible award from among two or more eligible and qualifiedParticipants. In such a case, the selection would be based on considerationof relevant factors such as the business developments needs, financialcondition, and management and technical ability of the eligible concerns.Proposed paragraph (f) would also require SBA to promote the equitablegeographic distribution of 8(a) sole source contracts to the maximum extentpracticable. This paragraph would implement section 8(a)(16)(B) of theSmall Business Act, as added by section 303 of the Reform Act. Proposed paragraph (g) of andSection; 124.308 would provide that SBA wouldnot authorize formal technical evaluations for sole source contracts. Thisis consistent with Congressional intent. The legislative history of theReform Act contemplates competition among eligible 8(a) Participants forrequirements that do not meet the dollar threshold amounts set forth inproposed andSection; 124.311 where the procuring agency desires a technicalevaluation of several firms. In addition, SBA recognizes that formal technical evaluations may be costlyfor 8(a) concerns. If formal  technical evaluations are limited to competitive8(a) awards, 8(a) concerns could elect whether to participate and wouldhave a chance of receiving the award. If a procuring agency wishes to conducttechnical evaluations among more than one 8(a) concern, it would be requiredto request that the requirement be a competitive 8(a) award. The agencycould request a formal two-step sealed bid procurement under the FederalAcquisition Regulations (FAR), or a standard negotiated competitive procurement.Proposed andSection; 124.309 would address the circumstances under whichthe SBA would decline to accept for award a requirement not previouslyin the 8(a) program. This section would implement SBA's policy that theAgency will not accept a requirement for the 8(a) program if such acceptancewould have an adverse impact on other small business programs or on anindividual small business. Proposed paragraph (a) of andSection; 124.309 would provide that SBA willnot accept a requirement where a solicitation has previously been issued.SBA could, however, accept a requirement under extraordinary circumstances;for example where a solicitation was issued but withdrawn because of inadequateresponse or in an emergency, where the agency would not have time to completethe requirement and could justify a sole source award under the FAR. Proposed paragraph (b) of andSection; 124.309 would provide that SBA wouldnot accept a requirement where the procuring agency has expressed publiclya clear intention to reserve the procurement  as a small business or smalldisadvantaged business set-aside; for example, a notice of intent to setaside a procurement published in the Commerce Business Daily and invitinga response from interested small businesses. The AA/MSBandamp;COD could,however, permit the acceptance of the requirement under extraordinary circumstances.For instance, acceptance would be permitted where the procuring agencyhad made the decision to set aside a requirement for the 8(a) program anda notice was subsequently mistakenly sent out. Even in such a case, SBAwould only accept the procurement if the procuring agency acknowledgedand documented that the notice was a mistake. Proposed paragraph (c) would set forth the general rule that SBA will notaccept a requirement for the 8(a) program where such acceptance would havean adverse impact on other small business programs or an individual smallbusiness, whether or not the affected small business is in the 8(a) program.This policy continues SBA's current policy but expands the present regulationto clarify that the adverse impact policy does not apply to ``new'' requirements;<T3>i.e.,</T3> ones that have not been previously procured by the relevantprocuring agency. In order for a concern to be adversely impacted by arequirement's acceptance for the 8(a) program, that concern must have previouslyperformed the requirement. In the case of new requirements, there is nosmall business which will lose the requirement. Section 124.109(c) would also provide that SBA will presume adverse impactto exist when a small business concern performed a specific requirementfor at least 24 months, is currently performing the requirement or finishedsuch performance within thirty days of the procuring agency's offer ofthe requirement to the 8(a) program, and the estimated dollar value ofthe award is 25 percent or more of its most recent annual gross sales (includingthose of its affiliates). Under this presumption, SBA would consider asmall business concern that meets the presumption's requirements as beingadversely impacted absent evidence to the contrary. SBA could also determinethat adverse impact exists apart from the above presumption. Such determinationswould be made on a case by case basis. Proposed paragraph (d) would set forth the circumstances under which SBAwould release a requirement from the 8(a) program for award through competitionoutside the 8(a) program. It would do so only in limited circumstanceswhere an 8(a) sole source contract is being performed by a Program Participantwhose Program Term would expire prior to contract completion or by a formerProgram Participant whose Program Term expired less than one year beforethe date of the proposed contract release. In making a determination whetherto release the requirement, SBA would weigh the importance of the contractfor the current or former Participant's stability and business developmentneeds against the needs of other current 8(a) Program Participants. Inaddition, SBA would not release a requirement where it would deplete orseriously reduce the pool of similar types of contracts to be awarded throughthe 8(a) program.  Finally, SBA would release a requirement only upon writtenrequest by a particular affected current or former Program Participant.Proposed andSection; 124.310 would set forth the requirements for approvalof lower tier subcontractors on 8(a) contracts. Such requirements wouldinclude advance approval, compliance with the performance of work requirementsrequired by section 921 of Pub. L. 99-661, maintenance of an arms lengthrelationship with the subcontractor, and control of the performance ofthe contract by the 8(a) concern. SBA would also have to determine thatthe proposed subcontracting arrangement is not an attempt to circumventSBA's size regulations. These requirements are to prevent fronts and toinsure that the benefits of 8(a) contracts inure primarily to 8(a) concerns. Proposed andSection; 124.311 would set forth the procedures to be used inconducting any competition among eligible 8(a) concerns authorized by Pub.L. 100-656. The Small Business Act, as amended, mandates that any contractoffered to the 8(a) program be awarded on the basis of competition amongeligible 8(a) concerns if: (1) There is a reasonable likelihood that atleast two eligible 8(a) concerns will submit offers, and (2) the anticipatedaward price of the contract, including options, will exceed $5,000,000for contracts assigned manufacturing SIC Codes and $3,000,000 for all othercontracts. This section of the proposed regulations would authorize competitionbelow the threshold dollar figures in limited instances, including wheretechnical competitions are appropriate. Competition in these instanceswould require the approval of the AA/MSBandamp;COD. The AA/MSBandamp;COD woulddeny a request by a procuring agency to compete an 8(a) requirement havinga dollar figure below the applicable threshold if the requirement was previouslyoffered to the 8(a) program as a sole source award, and the AA/MSBandamp;CODconcludes that the reason for such request is the procuring agency's failureto reach agreement on price during negotiations with the selected 8(a)concern. A sole source 8(a) award would be authorized above the thresholddollar figure where (1) SBA determines that there is not a reasonable expectationthat two eligible Program Participants will submit offers at a fair price,but it is known that there is an eligible Participant in the portfoliowhich can perform the requirement at a fair price, or (2) the requirementwould be awarded to an 8(a) concern owned and controlled by an economicallydisadvantaged Indian tribe. A procuring agency may request SBA to awarda sole source contract that is above the applicable threshold figure. SBAwill determine, after consulting with the procuring agency, whether thestatutory rule of two can be met for the specific requirement. If SBA believesthat it can be met, it will not accept a requirement above the applicablethreshold figure for award as a sole source 8(a) contract. Where a tribally-ownedconcern is seeking a requirement which exceeds the applicable thresholdfigure, either the concern or the procuring agency could request SBA toaward a sole source 8(a) contract above the threshold figures. In makinga determination as to whether to award such a contract on a sole sourcebasis, SBA would weigh the developmental needs of the tribally-owned concernagainst the needs of other eligible concerns in the portfolio for the contract.Proposed andSection; 124.311(h) would authorize SBA to restrict the awardof competitive 8(a) contracts to certain types of 8(a) concerns. Only thoseParticipants that have the SIC Code of the requirement in their approvedbusiness plan would be eligible to receive a competitive 8(a) award. SBAwould also be authorized to restrict 8(a) competitions among Participantsin specified stages of the program and, for local buy requirements, geographically.For example, SBA could require that only those Participants in the developmentalstage of program participation would be eligible for award of a specificrequirement. Proposed andSection; 124.311(f) would identify the procedures under whichan 8(a) competition would be conducted. SBA specifically requests commentsfrom Federal agencies as to the practical application of this section.The competition would be conducted by the procuring activity. However,SBA's approval of the competition criteria to be used would be required.In a sealed bid procurement, the procuring agency would identify the lowbidder to SBA. In a negotiated procurement, the procuring agency wouldidentify all offerors. It is contemplated that SBA would then determinewhich Participants are eligible for award. In making such a determination,SBA would look at the following: (1) Whether the firm had the SIC Codeidentified in the solicitation in its approved business plan; (2) if theprocurement is to be restricted within a particular stage of program participationor a particular geographical area, whether the firm is within the requiredstage of development or location; (3) whether it appears that the firmis small for the applicable SIC Code; (4) whether the firm's non-8(a) businessactivity targets are being met; and (5) whether the firm has exceeded itsapproved level of 8(a) support. SBA would identify all offerors which areeligible for award. In a sealed bid procurement, if the initially identifiedconcern is determined to be ineligible for award, the procuring agencywould identify the next low bidder, and so on until an eligible Participantis identified. In a negotiated procurement, the proposals of all firmsidentified as eligible for award by SBA would be evaluated by the procuringagency. Negotiations and/or discussions would be authorized with any ofthese firms. The procuring agency would then identify the selected firmto SBA. SBA would generally award an 8(a) subcontract to the firm selectedby the procuring agency. It would be the rare instance when SBA would notdo so. The contracting arrangement for a competitive 8(a) award would bethe same as that for a sole source 8(a) award (i.e., the procuring agencyand SBA would enter a prime contract and would subcontract the performanceof the requirement to the selected 8(a) concern). Proposed andSection; 124.311(g) would prohibit any party from challengingthe eligibility of a Participant for an 8(a) award. A challenge could notbe made either to SBA or to any other administrative forum as part of abid or other contract protest. Anyone with information concerning the eligibilityof a Participant to continue participation in the 8(a) program could submitsuch information to SBA and SBA would review it in accordance with proposedandSection; 124.111(c). Determinations as to a firm's eligibility to participatein the 8(a) program is statutorily vested in SBA and should not be undertakenby another administrative body. Therefore, SBA does not believe that bidor other contract protests at GAO, GSBCA, ASBCA, etc. should be able toattack a Participant's 8(a) eligibility status.Proposed andSection; 121.312 would require a firm to establish targets ofnon-8(a) business activity during its participation in the 8(a) program.During the developmental stage of program participation (program years1-4), a firm would be required to make substantial and sustained effortsto meet the targeted dollar levels of non-8(a) revenue set forth in itsbusiness plan. A fixed percentage of a Participant's total revenue duringeach program year in the transitional stage of program participation (programyears 5-9), would be required to be derived from non-8(a) business. Thisproposed section would specify varying ranges of non-8(a) business thata Participant would be required to achieve, depending upon its year inthe program. As previously discussed, an applicant must have the potential to succeedin business in order to be certified for 8(a) participation. One way anapplicant can demonstrate its prospect for success is to have a track recordof being in business for at least two years. It is contemplated that mostfirms entering the program would have such a two year track record. ProposedandSection; 124.312(b)(2) would require a newly certified Participant tomake maximum efforts to maintain its existing non-8(a) business base aftercertification. SBA understands that a firm may lose certain business dueto no fault of its own. However, SBA seeks to discourage total relianceon the 8(a) program and could commence termination proceedings if a Participantmade no attempts to maintain current or obtain new non-8(a) business. A firm in the developmental stage of program participation could not receive8(a) contract support (whether it is awarded as a sole source contractor through competition) in excess of 125 percent of the 8(a) support levelestablished in its approved business plan. The Participant's support levelcould be increased, but not solely to enable the firm to receive an additional8(a) contract that it has identified. In the past, SBA has at times approvedrequests for increases in 8(a) support levels in order to award additional8(a) contracts to the concern. A request for such an increase may havebeen approved whether or not the firm could increase its non-8(a) businesssimultaneously. This practice brought about two results. First, it gave little meaningto a firm's approved 8(a) support level. A firm could seek 8(a) contractsin excess of its approved 8(a) support level, knowing that SBA might increasethe support level if requested. Second, it encouraged a reliance on the8(a) program. It was possible that a concern could request, and receive,an increase in its 8(a) support level that resulted in the entire capacityof the business being devoted to the performance of 8(a) contracts. Thiswould have made it difficult for a firm to make the transition into thecompetitive marketplace upon leaving the program. The proposed regulation would permit a Participant to request, and receive,an increase in its approved 8(a) support level, but only if it can demonstratethat it has increased its capacity and capability to the point that itscurrently approved 8(a) support level is inappropriate. In addition, theincreased capacity and capability must be to the point that any approvedincrease in 8(a) support would not take up the entire increased capacityof the concern (i.e., after increasing its 8(a) support level, the Participantwould still be able to perform additional non-8(a) contracts). A requestfor an increase in a Participant's approved 8(a) support level could occuronly once during a program year other than at the date of its annual review.The proposed regulation would require such a request to be made at themid-year point of a Participant's program year. Specifically, such a requestwould be required to be made within 15 calendar days (either before orafter) of the six month date of the Participant's preceding annual review.This requirement is intended to alleviate SBA's concern that in the pastrequests for increases in contract support could be made, and granted,at will throughout a program year. In measuring whether a Participant has reached its approved 8(a) supportlevel during any program year, the proposed regulations (proposed andSection;124.312(b)(6) for firms in the developmental stage and proposed andSection;124.312(c)(9) for firms in the transitional stage) would add the dollarvalue of the base year of all contracts awarded during that program year(excluding options on such contracts which would be exercisable in oneor more subsequent program years) to the dollar value of all options andother modifications affecting price that are exercised during that programyear. Options and modifications would be counted in the program year thatthey are exercised. If an option or modification were exercised in thesame program year in which the base year of an 8(a) contract was awarded,then both the base year and option/modification would be counted in thatprogram year. If, however, an option or modification is exercised in asubsequent program year, then only the base year of the 8(a) contract wouldbe counted in determining 8(a) support received. In such a case, the dollarvalue of the option or modification would be counted in the program yearin which the option/modification was exercised. In order to determine a Participant's reliance on the 8(a) program andwhether its non-8(a) business activity targets are being met, proposedandSection; 124.312(b)(7), for firms in the developmental stage, and proposedandSection; 124.312(c)(10), for firms in the transitional stage, would requireParticipants to submit quarterly financial statements separating 8(a) andnon-8(a) revenues. Proposed andSection; 124.312(c) would set forth the non-8(a) business activitytargets that Participants would be required to meet during the transitionalstage of program participation. Participants approved for participationon or after November 15, 1988 and Participants with more than five yearsremaining in the program as of August 15, 1989 would be subject to thenon-8(a) business activity targets set forth in proposed andSection; 124.312(c)(4).Participants with five years or less remaining in the program as of August15, 1989 would be subject to modified non-8(a) business activity targetsset forth in proposed andSection; 124.312(c)(5). Proposed andSection; 124.312(c)(2) would require that during the transitionalstage a Participant's approved 8(a) support level would be set with thefirm's history of 8(a) and non-8(a) business and these business activitytargets in mind. Once established, a firm's support level could be increasedonly if the firm demonstrates that the receipt of such increased supportwould not conflict with the business activity targets. Similar to the requirementfor firms in the developmental stage, a request for an increase in 8(a)support by a Participant in the transitional stage could be made only onceduring a program year other than at the annual review (i.e., at the mid-yearpoint of the program year). The Business Opportunity Development Reform Act of 1988 required SBA toestablish non-8(a) business activity targets for Participants in the transitionalstage of program participation. It did not, however, provide definitiveguidelines for SBA to use in establishing these targets. Similarly, theconference report to the Reform Act, H.R. Rep. No. 1070, 100th Cong., 2dSess. 62-63 (1988), provides genera1 guidance, but is not explicit as tohow SBA should implement this provision. The conference report states thatthe targets established ``<T3>should generally </T3>require firms in the fifth and sixth years toshow 25% of revenues from sources other than 8(a) contracts, while in theseventh and eighth years such business revenues should <T3>move toward </T3>50%,'' and, in the final year of program participation,``firms should <T3>strive to achieve </T3>at least three-fourths of their business revenuesfrom sources other than 8(a) contracts.'' SBA has taken these general parametersand has refined them in order to have targets which firms are more likelyto meet.Instead of grouping years 5 and 6 and years 7 and 8 together (i.e., havingthe same business activity targets), the proposed rule would set differentbusiness activity targets for each year in the transitional stage of programparticipation. SBA felt that a requirement of approximately 25 percentnon-8(a) business in year 6 followed by a requirement of approximately50 percent non-8(a) business in year 7 would be unworkable. A Participantthat barely meets the target in year 6, and is thus not subject to remedialmeasures, could have difficulty in reaching the target in year 7. SBA believesthat a more gradual progression away from 8(a) reliance is preferable.In addition, the proposed rule would set ranges of acceptable non-8(a)business revenues instead of requiring a specific minimum level of non-8(a)business. SBA believes that the attainment of non-8(a) business by ProgramParticipants within a specified range is more realistic than minimum levelrequirements. For firms entering the program on or after November 15, 1988 and Participantswith more than five years remaining in the program as of August 15, 1989,the proposed rule would set the following non-8(a) business activity targets:15-25 percent non 8(a) business in the first year in the transitional stage;25-35 percent non-8(a) business in the second year in the transitionalstage; 40-45 percent non-8(a) business in the third year in the transitionalstage; 50-55 percent non-8(a) business in the fourth year in the transitionalstage; and 65-75 percent non-8(a) business in the fifth year in the transitionalstage (the final year of program participation). The Proposed rule would establish modified non-8(a) business activity targetsfor Participants with less than five years remaining in the program asof August 15, 1989. There would be no fixed percentage of non-8(a) businessrequired for firms having two years or less remaining in the program asof August 15, 1989. Such firms would be required only to make substantialand sustained efforts to meet the non-8(a) business activity targets setforth in their business plans. Many of these firms are heavily 8(a) reliantand SBA believes that establishing required percentages for non-8(a) businesswould have little practical effect. For Participants with more than twobut less than five years remaining in the program, the proposed rule wouldset the following modified non-8(a) business activity targets: 10-20 percentnon-8(a) business in the first year in the transitional stage, if applicable;20-30 percent non-8(a) business in the second year in the transitionalstage, if applicable; 35-40 percent non-8(a) business in the third yearin the transitional stage; 45-50 percent non-8(a) business in the fourthyear in the transitional stage; and 60-65 percent non-8(a) business inthe fifth year in the transitional stage (the final year of program participation).These targets would require less non-8(a) business than those for newlycertified firms and firms with more than five years remaining in the program.SBA does not want to unduly burden firms that are already participatingin the program, but at the same time does want to impose this businessmix requirement to ensure that firms are able to survive in the competitivearena after exiting the program. Proposed andSection; 124.312(c)(11) would require a Participant in the transitionalstage to certify that it is in compliance with the non-8(a) business activitytargets or that it is in compliance with such remedial measures orderedby SBA before it could receive any additional 8(a) awards.Proposed andSection; 124.312(c)(12) would authorize SBA to take remedialactions for Participants that fail to achieve the minimum percentage ofthe applicable non-8(a) business activity target. The severity of the remedialmeasure used would depend on the extent to which the Participant failedto obtain non-8(a) business. The potential remedies could range from requiringa Participant to obtain management and/or technical assistance where theParticipant's non-8(a) business activity is very close to the requiredtarget, to reducing a Participant's 8(a) support level or reducing/eliminatingsole source 8(a) awards for Participants which have had less success inmeeting the required targets, to termination where a Participant makesno effort to obtain non-8(a) business and is content to rely solely onthe 8(a) program.  Proposed andSection; 124.313 would repeat the provision of SBA's currentregulations that SBA will certify its own competence to perform the 8(a)requirement. This certification, required by law for entering into any8(a) contract (sole source and competitive), should not be confused withthe entirely distinct Certificate of Competency (COC) available under theSmall Business Act and Part 125 of this Title. That COC program for individualfirms is not available with respect to 8(a) contracts. The certificationis based on SBA's determination that the selected 8(a) concern is responsibleto perform the contract. An 8(a) contract will not be awarded to any 8(a)concern that SBA believes does not have the capability, competency, capacity,credit, integrity, or tenacity and perseverance to perform the requirement. Proposed andSection; 124.314 would require the selected 8(a) concern in eithera sole source or competitive 8(a) award to perform a certain percentageof the requirement with its own work force. The percentages for serviceand supply contracts are taken directly from section 8(a)(14)(A) of theSmall Business Act, 15 U.S.C. 637(a)(14)(A), as amended by Pub. L. 99-661.In addition, section 8(a)(14)(C) of the Small Business Act requires SBAto establish performance of work requirements for general and specialtyconstruction. This proposed rule would require an 8(a) contractor to performat least 15 percent of the cost of the contract, not including the costof materials, with its own employees for a general construction contract,and at least 25% of the cost of the contract, not including the cost ofmaterials, with its own employees for a specialty construction contract.These are the same percentage of work requirements that the 8(a) regulationshave historically required for general and specialty trade constructioncontracts. This proposed rule would not change those requirements. Theproposed rule would clarify that when the regulation requires the 8(a)concern to perform a certain percentage of the contract, work done by an8(a) concern's subsidiary, even if wholly owned, does not count in determiningwhether the applicable performance of requirement is being fulfilled. Proposed andSection; 124.314(d) would specify how this performance of workrequirements would apply to indefinite quantity contracts. This proposedsection would require the Program Participant, at any point in time, tohave performed the required percentage of the total value of the contractto that date. A Participant would not be required to perform the mandatedpercentage of each task order with its own employees or work force, butwould have to perform the required percentage of the combined total ofall task orders to date. SBA would be able to waive this requirement wheresubcontracting is essential up front before the 8(a) contractor can beginperformance (i.e., the subcontractor performs work in preparation of the8(a) subcontractor's performance).  Proposed andSection; 124.315 would define what constitutes ``fair marketprice'' for 8(a) contract purposes. This section is taken almost verbatimfrom section 303(e) of the Business Opportunity Development Reform Actof 1988.Proposed andSection; 124.316 would authorize SBA to delegate, by the useof special clauses in the prime and subcontract, the responsibility foradministering an 8(a) subcontract to the procuring agency. This proposedsection would authorize SBA to delegate all subcontract administrationfunctions <T3>except</T3> with respect to the following: the exercise of options;novation agreements; any modification issued pursuant to the ``Changes,''``Differing Site Conditions,'' ``Price Reduction,'' ``Default-Damages forDelay-Time Extensions'' and ``Suspension of Work'' clauses; payments tocontractors; termination of the subcontract; and consent to placement ofsubcontracts; and all matters related to the approval, disbursement andrepayment of Advance Payments granted by SBA. This new section was neededbecause the delegation of authority clause contained in andSection; 52.219-11of the FAR, Title 48 of the Code of Federal Regulations, which is insertedin all 8(a) contracts between the procuring agency and SBA, could be readbroadly so that all administration of the  subcontract, including the exerciseof options and modifications and novations, could be achieved without SBA'sconcurrence. SBA believes that it cannot delegate away its privity of contractand, thus, must be part of any option, modification or novation agreement.Proposed andSection; 124.317 would provide for termination of a contractfor convenience if the disadvantaged owner(s) of the 8(a) concern performingthe contract transfer(s) ownership of the concern. This section is takendirectly from section 407 of the Business Opportunity Development ReformAct of 1988 and is designed to encourage performance by the 8(a) firm thatinitially received the contract. The 8(a) Participant which was awardedthe 8(a) contract would be required to notify SBA immediately upon enteringan agreement to transfer all or part of its ownership to any other party.Proposed andSection; 124.318 would incorporate into the regulations opinionsof the SBA's General Counsel concerning the exercise of options and modifications.Specifically, proposed andSection; 124.318(a) would require that the exerciseof an unpriced option be considered a new contracting action. As such,if a concern has exited the 8(a) program or is other than small under thesize standard corresponding to the SIC Code for the requirement, negotiationsto price the option could not be entered into and the option could notbe exercised. If, however, the concern were still a Program Participantand still a small business under the size standard corresponding to theSIC Code for the requirement, negotiations to price the option  could beentered into and, if a fair and reasonable price is negotiated, the optioncould be exercised. Similarly, a modification beyond the scope of the initial8(a) contract award would constitute a new contracting action and the samerules that apply to unpriced options would apply. Alternatively, a pricedoption or a modification within the scope of the initial 8(a) contractaward could be exercised whether or not the concern that received the awardhas exited the 8(a) program and whether the concern has grown large underthe size standard corresponding to the SIC Code for the requirement. Proposed andSection; 124.319 would set forth the procedures for both terminationsof 8(a) contracts for default and for convenience. These provisions, withone exception, are identical to those currently contained in 13 CFR 124.302(d).The only exception is that, as noted above in proposed andSection; 124.317,a termination for convenience would be instigated whenever the disadvantagedowner(s) of an 8(a) concern transfer(s) ownership of the concern to anyother party and the SBA Administrator does not grant a waiver pursuantto the exceptions set forth in proposed andSection; 124.317. Proposed andSection; 124.320 would address disputes and appeals. Proposedparagraph (a) would address contract disputes generally. Disputes arisingbetween an 8(a) subcontactor and a procuring agency contracting officerwould generally be decided unilaterally by the procuring agency contractingofficer. For disputes arising out of advance payments or  business developmentexpense funds, the contracting officer would be that of SBA. For disputesarising out of construction contracts where SBA has waived bonding pursuantto proposed andSection; 124.305, the contracting officer deciding the disputewould be that as agreed between SBA and the procuring agency. It is anticipatedthat where a dispute arises out of the performance of the contract, theprocuring agency contracting officer would decide the dispute, and wherethe dispute arises out of the disbursement of funds from the special bankaccount, the SBA contracting officer would decide it. Participants havethe right to appeal contracting officer decisions under the Contract DisputesAct of 1978. Proposed paragraph (b) would describe the conditions and procedures forappeal by SBA to the head of a procuring agency. This paragraph would clarifythat SBA is authorized to appeal both the decision not to set aside a requirementfor the 8(a) program and the terms and conditions of a contract alreadyset aside for the program. This paragraph would also provide time limitationsfor notification of appeal and for a decision on the appeal. The procuringagency, upon receipt of the appeal, would be required to suspend all furtheraction regarding the procurement until a written decision is made, unlessthe procuring agency could show urgent and compelling circumstances. Thisparagraph also would require the head of the procuring agency to notifythe SBA of the reasons for his or her determination. This paragraph wouldimplement section 8(a)(1)(A) of the Small Business Act, as amended by section303(d).  Proposed andSection; 124.321 would set forth the requirements for enteringjoint venture agreements to perform 8(a) contracts. Proposed paragraph(a) would set forth the prerequisites for entering into a joint ventureagreement. The joint venture would be required to be solely for the performanceof an 8(a) contract and could be entered into only when the 8(a) concernlacks the necessary capacity to perform the contract on its own. Any jointventure entered into by a Participant would be required to be of substantialbenefit to the Participant. A joint venture agreement would be found tobe of substantial benefit to the 8(a) concern when it would further thegoals and targets set forth in its business plan, strengthen the concern'sfinancial position, or contribute to the concern's business development.Proposed paragraph (b) would set forth the requirement that, except fortribally owned concerns, the combined annual receipts or employees of theconcerns entering into the joint venture must meet the size standard forthe SIC code industry designated for the contract. SBA generally considersjoint venture partners to be affiliates for purposes of determining size.<T3>See</T3> andSection; 121.3(vii)(C). Proposed paragraph (c) would address the required contents of joint ventureagreements. Such required contents would include designation of the partiesto the venture as co-managers; a distribution of 51 percent of the revenuesearned by the joint venture to the 8(a) concern; the establishment of aspecial bank account requiring the signature  of all participants in thejoint venture for withdrawal; an itemized description of all major equipment,facilities and other resources; and a provision in the agreement specifyingthe responsibilities of the parties with regard to contract performanceand negotiation of subcontracts. These requirements are intended to preventthe use of joint ventures as fronts for non-8(a) concerns and to insurethat the primary benefits of 8(a) contracts go to Program Participants.Proposed paragraph (d) would set forth additional requirements for jointventure agreements including approval by the AA/MSBandamp;COD or his or herdesignee; designation of an employee of the 8(a) concern as a designatedproject manager responsible for contract performance; housing of recordsin the offices of the 8(a) concern; the submission of quarterly financialstatements; the submission of a project-end profit and loss statement;and performance of work requirements. These requirements would enable theSBA to adequately monitor the joint venture to prevent fraud and circumventionof the regulations and to ensure that the joint venture is operating inaccordance with the terms and conditions set forth in the joint ventureagreement. Proposed paragraph (e) would give SBA the authority to inspect the recordsof the joint venture at any time. Proposed paragraph (f) would set forth the statutory exemption from SBA'ssize limitations for joint ventures with concerns owned by Indian tribes.Section 602 of the Reform Act grants joint ventures entered into by triballyowned concerns exemptions from SBA's size limitations for up to two contractsprovided that certain requirements are met. The tribally owned concernmust own 51 percent or more of the joint venture; the joint venture mustbe located on the tribe's reservation or on land owned by the tribe; thejoint venture must perform most of its activities on such reservation ortribally owned land; and members of the tribe must be employed for at least50 percent of the joint venture's workforce. This proposed paragraph wouldalso require that a requirement suitable for a joint venture must be identifiedby either SBA or a tribally owned concern and may not be identified bya large business concern. SBA is authorized to provide these exemptionsonly until September 30, 1991. Proposed andSection; 124.401 would address Advance Payments. The requirementsset forth in this proposed section would be substantively the same as thosecurrently used by SBA in authorizing and administering advance payments.The current regulation has been reworded where necessary for clarity. Inaddition, several provisions which currently appear only in SBA's StandardOperating Procedures or policy guidelines have been added to this sectionof the proposed regulations. This proposed section would be, as is theSBA's existing regulation concerning advance payments, patterned afterthe requirements of the Federal Acquisition Regulations (FAR). This proposedsection would also incorporate the provisions currently appearing in andSection;124.403 concerning letters of credit. Again, the substance of the proposedregulation dealing with letters of credit has not been changed, but ithas been incorporated into the advance payment section for ease of use,understanding and clarity. Proposed andSection; 124.402 would address Business Development Expense (BDE).This proposed section would govern those Program Participants that areperforming contracts for which BDE was given prior to October 1, 1989.As previously stated, the newly authorized loan program set forth in andSection;122.57 of this Title is intended to replace BDE. The granting of BDE isno longer authorized after October 1, 1989, the effective date of the statutoryprovision authorizing the loan program. This section would provide thatany BDE funds received by a Program Participant prior to October 1, 1989must be used exclusively for the purposes stated in the BDE approval andthat use of such funds for other purposes would be grounds for terminationfrom the 8(a) program pursuant to andSection; 124.209. Program Participantswhich received BDE funds prior to October 1, 1989 would be required tomaintain records to substantiate the uses for which the BDE funds havebeen expended. This section would also provide that a Participant wouldbe liable for repayment of the full amount of the BDE granted the Participantin the event of default on the 8(a) contract to which the BDE funds relate.Proposed andSection; 124.501, <T3>Development assistance program, </T3>is identical to andSection; 124.501of the current regulations. Proposed andSection; 124.502, <T3>Small Business and Capital Ownership Development Program, </T3>is identicalto andSection; 124.502 of the current regulations. Proposed andSection; 124.601 would set forth those reporting requirementsnot set forth in other sections. Proposed paragraph (a) would require 8(a)concerns to submit a capability statement to SBA annually. Such statementwould briefly describe the 8(a) concern's various contract performancecapabilities. The capability statements would be submitted to the appropriateprocuring agencies for the purpose of matching requirements with appropriate8(a) concerns. This paragraph would implement section 8(a)(12) of the SmallBusiness Act, as amended by section 501 of the Reform Act. Proposed paragraph (b) would require each Program Participant to submita written report to SBA semi-annually concerning the accountants, consultants,attorneys, and other such parties receiving compensation to assist theParticipant to obtain Federal contracts. Participants would be requiredto include in such report the amount of compensation received by such personsduring the relevant reporting period along with a description of the activitiesperformed. Reports raising suspicion would be immediately forwarded toSBA's Inspector General. The failure to submit a report would be consideredgood cause for the initiation of a termination proceeding pursuant to andSection;124.209. This paragraph would implement section 8(a)(20) of the Small BusinessAct, as added by section 404 of the Reform Act. Proposed paragraph (c) would address the reports required of former 8(a)Program Participants. Former Participants would be required to providesuch information as SBA may request concerning such former Participants'continued business operations, contract portfolio and financial conditionfor a period of three years following the date on which the concern exitedthe program. Failure to provide such information could result in SBA'srefusal to approve options on contracts awarded through the 8(a) program.This section would assist SBA in fulfilling its statutory data collectionand reporting requirements under section 7(j)(16) of the Small BusinessAct, as added by section 408 of the Reform Act. That section requires SBAto periodically evaluate those concerns which have exited the 8(a) programduring the immediately preceding three fiscal years.  <ITAG tagnum="85">Compliance With Executive Orders 12291 the Regulatory FlexibilityAct (5 U.S.C. 601, et seq.) and 12612 the Paperwork Reduction Act (44 U.S.C.Ch. 35) </ITAG>The Small Business Administration considers these regulations to be a majorrule pursuant to Executive Order 12291 and one which will have significanteconomic impact on a substantial number of small entities for purposesof the Regulatory Flexibility Act. Therefore, SBA offers the followingRegulatory Impact Analysis/Regulatory Flexibility Analysis: a. Descriptions of Reasons Why This Action Is Being Considered These proposed rules are being considered to implement sections 8(a) and7(j) of the Small Business Act, as amended by the Business OpportunityDevelopment Reform Act of 1988, (15 U.S.C. 637(a) and 636(j), as amendedby Pub. L. 100-656). These proposed rules would also provide clarificationof the intention that the benefits of the 8(a) program be used exclusivelyfor business development purposes to help small businesses owned and controlledby socially and economically disadvantaged individuals to compete on anequal basis in the mainstream of the American economy.b. Statement of Objectives and Legal Basis for the Proposed Rules The Small Business Administration (SBA) proposes to amend its regulationsgoverning the Minority Small Business and Capital Ownership DevelopmentProgram authorized by sections 7(j)(10) and 8(a) of the Small BusinessAct (15 U.S.C. 636(j)(10) and 637(a)). In most instances the proposed revisionswould implement changes required by the Business Opportunity DevelopmentReform Act of 1988 (Pub. L. 100-656), enacted November 15, 1988. Some provisions,however, would incorporate into the regulations existing Agency policywhile others would implement proposed policy changes. The legal basis for the proposed rules are sections 5(b)(6), 7(j) and 8(a)of the Small Business Act as amended by Pub. L. 100-656 (15 U.S.C. 634(b)(6),636(j) and 637(a)). c. Description of and Estimate of the Number of Small Entities to WhichThese Proposed Rules Will Apply If adopted in final form, these proposed rules would apply to all businessconcerns applying for or participating in the 8(a) program. They wouldalso apply to certain businesses requiring social and economic disadvantagedstatus for eligibility to participate in such programs as the Small DisadvantagedBusiness (SDB) Set-Aside Program authorized by section 1207(a) of Pub.L. 99-661 and the section 8(d) Subcontracting Program authorized by Section8(d) of the Small Business Act (15 U.S.C. 637(d)). There are approximately 2,800 firms certified and eligible for participationin the 8(a) program. It is anticipated that within four years the numberof firms in the 8(a) program will reach 5,000. Prior to the enactment ofthe Business Development Reform Act, approximately 2,000 applications werereceived each year. Of this number, 1,000 firms on average advanced tothe second stage and completed the application process. Experience showsthat approximately 35 percent of the firms completing the application processwere accepted for participation in the 8(a) program annually. SBA anticipates that the number of applications under the Business DevelopmentReform Act will increase due to more expeditious application and processingprocedures. Therefore, we anticipate that an average of 2,500 to 3,000applications can be expected annually. Experience demonstrates an averagedecline rate of 80 percent. New firms coming into the program under theproposed rules could reach 600 annually. Over the next 18- to 24-month period, we expect very few firms to leavethe program as a result of provisions of the ``grandfathering clause''permitting a firm up to an additional eighteen months' participation inthe program. d. Preliminary Regulatory Impact Analysis If adopted in final form, these regulations would have a major economicimpact on the national economy. Currently, purchases through the 8(a) programapproximate $3.2 billion annually and are projected to reach $4 billionwhen the Business Development Opportunity Reform Act is implemented byregulation. There would be certain economic benefits received by 8(a) Program Participantsin that they would be provided increased access to developmental resourcespreviously unavailable to socially and economically disadvantaged individuals.For example, it is expected that as a result of clarification of linesof responsibility for implementing the 8(a) program and expedition of theapplication process for 8(a) program certification, additional firms couldbe accepted for participation. These firms are expected to be strongeras a result of increased monitoring, availability of counseling and assistancefor development. Firms remaining in the program would be required to achievea reasonable mix of competitive as well as 8(a) contracts and establishbusiness practices designed to enhance their ability to survive once theyhave completed their participation in the program. In complying with increased monitoring and reporting requirements, programparticipants would experience some additional costs. However, these costsshould be significantly less than the potential benefits which could berealized by the program participants through their greater access to andownership of productive capital as a result of 8(a) Program Participation.While the initial costs to Federal agencies for administering the programcould be higher, the long range overall costs should be significantly reduceddue to stronger firms and the increased numerical base of firms capableof competing for Federal procurement. This would also result in decreasedacquisition costs of goods and services by the Federal Government. In addition, these proposed rules would also apply to business concernsseeking to participate in other programs requiring social and economicdisadvantaged status, where such status has been challenged. Examples ofsuch programs are the Small Disadvantaged Business Set-aside program authorizedby section 1207(a) of Pub. L. 99-661 and the section 8(d) SubcontractingProgram authorized by section 8(d) of the Small Business Act. Since potentialParticipants in those programs could be affected by these proposed rulesif their disadvantaged status is challenged to SBA, these proposed rulesare likely to have an additional impact. Currently, the Department of Defense's procurements represent a significantportion of total government purchases at $135.3 billion (1988.). In thatyear Small Disadvantaged Businesses received $3.6 billion (2.8 percent)of this amount. (Source: Office of Small and Disadvantaged Business Utilizationand Office of Secretary of Defense). However, anticipated impact wouldbe tangential because the DOD Program exists independently and does notrely on implementation of these rules for its existence. The proposed ruleswould only pertain to the distribution of contracts between eligible firms.While there could be some difference to individual firms seeking to dobusiness with the Federal Government under such programs, there would belittle or no impact on the number of contracts set-aside pursuant to suchprograms. Therefore, the economic impact on the national economy resultingfrom the effect of these rules on such programs is expected to be minimal.The Small Business Administration is expected to experience the majorityof additional costs related to implementing the provisions of these proposedrules. It is anticipated that these increased costs will not exceed $11million. They are likely to be largely in the areas of increased administrationfor new guidelines and procedures and added personnel and equipment costs.e. Description of Projected Reporting, Recordkeeping and Other ComplianceRequirements of These Proposed Rules The following provisions of these proposed rules would require significantreporting, recordkeeping and compliance requirements.<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Business Plan </ITAG>Section 124.301 would require that within 30 days of receipt of certification,Program Participants develop comprehensive business plans establishingbusiness activity targets, objectives and goals. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Annual Review </ITAG>Section 124.302 would require annual review of a Participant's businessplan with modification, where appropriate, and development of forecastingfor required contracting support. Starting in the year of transition (fifthyear), Participants would be required to submit a transition managementplan establishing plans for their competitive business mix and the firm'ssurvival after expiration of its program term. Section 124.111 would reflect other requirements for contracting eligibilityreview such as certification of continued 8(a) eligibility, personal financialstatements for each disadvantaged owner, record of payments made by Participantsto disadvantaged owners. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. Reporting and Verification of Business Activity </ITAG>Section 124.312 would require Program Participants to provide SBA withquarterly and annual financial statements within 90 calendar days (180calendar days for audited statements) from the end of each period. Within30 days of the end of the program year, the Participant would provide SBAwith the annual report of all non 8(a) contracts, options and modificationsaffecting prices executed during the program year.<ITAG tagnum="81">4. Miscellaneous Reporting Requirements </ITAG>Section 124.601 would require each Program Participant to annually submita capability statement to SBA that describes the firm's contract performancecapabilities and the name of the Participant's Business Opportunity Specialist.These capability statements would be used for contract matching requirementswith various procuring agencies. Section 124.601 semi-annually would also require the Program Participantto provide the Participant's Business Opportunity Specialist with a listingand amounts paid to agents, representatives, attorneys, accountants, consultantsand other parties (excluding employees) to assist in obtaining Federalcontracts. Finally, Section 124.601 would require former 8(a). Program Participantsto provide SBA with requested information concerning business operations,contract portfolio and financial conditions for a three year period followingexit from the program. f. Federal Rules Which May Duplicate This Proposed Rule Although there are Federal rules contained in sections of the Federal AcquisitionRegulations (FAR) which may duplicate or overlap with these proposed rules,it is SBA's understanding that any inconsistency between those rules andthese proposed rules will be corrected upon SBA's publication of finalrules affecting this Subpart. g. Significant Alternatives to Proposed Rules Which Would Accomplish StatedObjectives SBA submits that there are no significant alternatives which would minimizeany significant economic impact upon small entities. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 13 CFR Part 124 </ITAG>Government procurement, Minority business, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements, Technical assistance.Accordingly, pursuant to the authority set forth in sections 7(j) and 8(a)of the Small Business Act, 15 U.S.C. 636(j) and 637(a), SBA hereby amendsPart 124 of Title 13 of the Code of Federal Regulations as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 124_[AMENDED] </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 124 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>15 U.S.C. 634(b)(6), 636(j), 637(a), 637(d) and Pub.L. 99-661 (sec. 1207), and Pub. L. 100-656.</ITAG>2. Subpart A of Part 124 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart A_Minority Small Business and Capital Ownership Development</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.1 Scope of regulations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.2 Associate Administrator for Minority Small Business and CapitalOwnership Development. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.3 Division of Program Certification and Eligibility. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.4 Commission on Minority Business Development. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.5 Violations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.6 Penalties for misrepresentation and false statements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.7 Restrictions on fees for applicant and participant representatives.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.100 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.101 The 8(a) program: General eligibility. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.102  Small business concern. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.103 Ownership requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.104 Control and management. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.105 Social disadvantage. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.106 Economic disadvantage. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.107 Potential for success. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.108 Additional 8(a) program eligibility requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.109 Ineligible businesses. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.110 Program term. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.111  Continued 8(a) program eligibility. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.112 Concerns owned by Indian tribes. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.113 Concerns owned by Native Hawaiian Organizations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.201 Processing applications. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.202 Place of filing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.203 Servicing office. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.204 Applicant representatives. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.205 Forms and documents required. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.206 Approval and decline of applications for 8(a) program admission.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.207 Program exit. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.208 Program graduation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.209 Program termination. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.210 Appeals to SBA's Office of Hearing and Appeals. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.211  Suspension of program assistance. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.300 Business development. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.301 Development of business plan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.302 Review and modification of business plan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.303 Stages of 8(a) program participation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.304 Statutory exemption from the Walsh-Healey Act. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.305 Statutory exemption from Miller act bonds. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.306 Financial assistance for skills training. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.307 Contractual assistance. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.308 Procedures for obtaining and accepting procurements for the8(a) program. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.309 Barriers to acceptance. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.310 Approval of lower tier subcontractors. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.311 8(a) competition. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.312 Competitive business mix. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.313 Certification of SBA's competency. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.314 Performance of work by the 8(a) concern. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.315 Fair market price. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.316 Contract administration. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.317 Performance of contracts by original concern. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.318 Exercise of options and modifications. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.319 Contract termination. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.320 Disputes and appeals. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.321 Joint venture agreements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.401 Advance payments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.402 Business development expense. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.501 Development assistance program. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.502 Small Business and Capital Ownership Development Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.601 Miscellaneous reporting requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_Minority Small Business and Capital Ownership Development</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope of regulations. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>(1) These regulations implement sections 8(a) and 7(j)of the Small Business Act, as amended by the Business Opportunity DevelopmentReform Act of 1988, (15 U.S.C. 637(a) and 636(j), as amended by Pub. L.100-656). Sections 8(a) and 7(j) of the Small Business Act establish theMinority Small Business and Capital Ownership Development Program or 8(a)Program. The 8(a) Program is intended to be used exclusively for businessdevelopment purposes to help small businesses owned and controlled by sociallyand economically disadvantaged individuals to compete on an equal basisin the mainstream of the American economy. (2) These regulations apply to all business concerns applying for or participatingin the 8(a) program as of the effective date of these regulations. As noted,portions of these regulations also apply to other Federal programs forwhich social and economic disadvantaged status is a requirement of programeligibility. Such programs include, among others, the Small DisadvantagedBusiness (SDB) Set-aside and Bid Preference Programs authorized by section1207(a) of Pub. L. 99-661, and the Minority Small Business SubcontractingProgram authorized by section 8(d) of the Small Business Act (15 U.S.C.637(d)). (b) <T3>The 8(a) and 7(j) programs. </T3>(1) Section 8(a) authorizes SBA toenter into all types of contracts, including, but not limited to, contractsfor supplies, services, construction, research and development with otherGovernment departments and agencies and to subcontract the performanceof these contracts to small business concerns owned and controlled by sociallyand economically disadvantaged individuals, Indian tribes or Hawaiian NativeOrganizations. (2) Section 7(j) authorizes SBA to provide financial assistance to publicor private organizations to pay all or part of the cost of projects designedto provide technical or management assistance to individuals or small businessconcerns eligible for assistance under sections 7(i), 7(j)(10), and 8(a)of the Small Business Act. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Associate Administrator for Minority Small Business and Capital OwnershipDevelopment. </ITAG>The Associate Administrator for Minority Small Business and Capital OwnershipDevelopment (AA/MSBandamp;COD), who shall be an employee in the competitiveservice or in the Senior Executive Service, and a career appointee, isresponsible for the formulation and execution of the policies and programsunder sections 7(j) and 8(a) of the Small Business Act. The AA/MSBandamp;CODoperates under the supervision of, and is responsible to, the Administratorof SBA. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Division of Program Certification and Eligibility. </ITAG>The Division of Program Certification and Eligibility (Division) withinthe Office of Minority Small Business and Capital Ownership Development(MSBandamp;COD) shall be responsible for handling all matters relating to8(a) program eligibility, termination and graduation from 8(a) programparticipation, and certifications of disadvantaged status for purposesof any program or activity conducted under the authority of section 8(d)of the Small Business Act or any Federal law that references such section.The Division, headed by a Director who shall report directly to the AA/MSBandamp;COD,shall have field offices within some or all of the Agency's regional offices.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.4 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Commission on Minority Business Development. </ITAG>A Commission on Minority Business Development (Commission) shall be establishedpursuant to section 505 of the Business Opportunity Development ReformAct of 1988 (Pub. L. 100-656). This Commission is authorized to reviewall Federal programs designed to promote the development of minority ownedbusinesses in order to ascertain whether the congressionally describedgoals and purposes of such programs are being realized. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Violations. </ITAG>Willful violation by an applicant for admission to the section 8(a) programor an applicant for participation in the section 7(j) program of any ofSBA's regulations governing its other programs may result in the applicant'sdenial of admission to the program. The nature and severity of any suchviolation will be considered by the AA/MSBandamp;COD in making a determinationon the admission of an applicant to the program. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.6 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Penalties for misrepresentations and false statements. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Section 16 of the Small Business Act (15 U.S.C. 645)sets forth penalties for false statements and misrepresentations. (b) <T3>Misrepresentation of small business or small disadvantaged businessstatus. </T3>The Business Opportunity Development Reform Act of 1988 (Pub.L. 100-656) increased the penalties for misrepresentation of small businessstatus or small disadvantaged business status. Generally, section 16(d)of the Small Business Act provides that any person or entity that misrepresentsthe status of any concern or person as a ``small business concern'' or``small business concern owned and controlled by socially and economicallydisadvantaged individuals'' in order to obtain for oneself or another anyof the contracting opportunities set forth in paragraph (b)(1) of thissection will be subject to the penalties set forth in paragraph (b)(2)of this section. (1)(i) A prime contract to be awarded pursuant to section 9 (Small BusinessInnovation Research Authorities Program) or section 15 (various small businessset-aside authorities) of the Small Business Act; (ii) A subcontract to be awarded pursuant to section 8(a) of the SmallBusiness Act; (iii) Subcontract that is to be included as part or all of a goal containedin a subcontracting plan required pursuant to section 8(d) of the SmallBusiness Act; or (iv) A prime or subcontract to be awarded as a result, or in furtherance,of any other provision of Federal law that specifically references section8(d) of the Small Business Act for a definition of program eligibility.(2)(i) A fine of not more than $500,000 or by imprisonment for not morethan 10 years, or both; (ii) The administrative remedies prescribed by the Program Fraud CivilRemedies Act of 1986 (31 U.S.C. 3801-3812) and implementing regulations(54 FR 6271, February 9, 1989); (iii) Suspension and debarment as specified in 13 CFR Part 145 or Subpart9.4 of the Federal Acquisition Regulation (FAR) (48 CFR Subpart 9.4), orany successor regulation, on the basis that such misrepresentation indicatesa lack of business integrity that seriously and directly affects the presentresponsibility of a person or entity to transact business with the Federalgovernment; and (iv) Be ineligible for participation in any program or activity conductedunder the authority of the Small Business Act or the Small Business InvestmentAct of 1958 (15 U.S.C. 661, <T3>et seq.</T3>) for a period not to exceed 3 years. (c) <T3>Misrepresentation concerning compliance with competitive mix targets.</T3>Section 16(f) of the Small Business Act, as amended by Pub. L. 100-656,imposes the penalties set forth in paragraph (b)(2) of this section onany person or entity that falsely certifies past compliance with the requirementsof section 7(j)(10)(I) of the Small Business Act which deals with competitivebusiness mix and attainment of business activity targets (see andSection;124.312). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.7 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Restrictions on fees for applicant and Participant representatives.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>The compensation received by any agent or representativeof an 8(a) applicant or Program Participant for assisting the applicantin obtaining 8(a) certification or for assisting the Program Participantin obtaining 8(a) contracts must be reasonable in light of the service(s)performed by the agent or representative. (b) <T3>Contingent fees. </T3>The fee charged by any agent or representativeof an 8(a) applicant or Program Participant for assisting the applicantin obtaining 8(a) certification or for assisting the Program Participantin obtaining 8(a) contracts cannot be contingent upon the applicant/Participantreceiving either 8(a) certification or specific 8(a) contract awards. (c) <T3>Fees as a percentage of contract award. </T3>A Program Participantis prohibited from agreeing to pay or paying a fee to any agent or representativefor assistance in obtaining a specific 8(a) contract award, if such feeis based on a percentage of the contract award, either in terms of totalvalue of the award, profit, or otherwise. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.100 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>(a) ``Alaska Native'' means a citizen of the United States who is a personof one-fourth degree or more Alaskan Indian (including Tsimshian Indiansnot enrolled in the Metlaktla Indian Community), Eskimo, or Aleut blood,or a combination thereof. The term includes, in the absence of proof ofa minimum blood quantum, any citizen who is regarded as an Alaska Nativeby a Native village or Native group and whose father or mother is regardedas an Alaska Native. (b) ``Alaska Native Corporation'' means any Regional Corporation, VillageCorporation, Urban Corporation, or Group Corporation organized under thelaws of the State of Alaska in accordance with the Alaska Native ClaimsSettlement Act, as amended (43 U.S.C. 1601, <T3>et seq.</T3>). (c) ``Application'' or ``8(a) application'' means all forms and attachmentsrequired by SBA to be completed by an applicant for the 8(a) program forthe purpose of establishing program eligibility. (d) ``Business Opportunity Specialist'' (BOS) means the SBA field officeemployee responsible for providing business development assistance to ProgramParticipants pursuant to section 7(j) and 8(a) of the Small Business Act(15 U.S.C. 636(j), 637(a)). (e) ``Business plan'' means the business plan documents as submitted bythe 8(a) concern and approved by SBA which include the objectives, goals,and business projections of an 8(a) concern, and all written amendmentsor modifications which have also been approved by SBA. (f) ``Certification of SBA's competency'' means a certification by SBA,based on its assessment of an 8(a) concern's competency to perform, thatSBA is competent to perform the requirements as stated in the contract.The assessment does not require a special investigation or the issuanceof a Certificate of Competency (COC) as provided for elsewhere in theseregulations under the authority of section 8(b)(7) (A), (B) and (C) ofthe Small Business Act. (g) ``Concern'' means any business entity organized for profit which hasa place of business located in the United States and which makes a significantcontribution to the U.S. economy through payment of taxes and/or use ofAmerican products, materials and/or labor. For definition of ``Small BusinessConcern,'' and regulations relating to small business size standards, <T3>see </T3>andSection; 124.102 and Part 121 of this title. (h) ``Descendant of an Alaska Native'' means a lineal descendant of anAlaska Native or of an individual who would have been an Alaska Nativeif such individual were alive on December 18, 1971, or an adoptee of anAlaska Native or of a descendant of an Alaska Native whose adoption occurredprior to his or her majority (age 18 in the State of Alaska) and is recognizedat law or in equity. (i) ``Disadvantaged owner'' means an individual who SBA has determinedto be socially and economically disadvantaged in connection with a concern'sapplication for or participation in the 8(a) program. (j) ``Fixed Program Participation Term'' means that ultimate time periodduring which a concern may have participated in the 8(a) program priorto the effective date of the Business Opportunity Development Reform Actof 1988 (Pub. L. 100-656) (November 15, 1988). (k) ``Graduation'' means completion of 8(a) program participation priorto expiration of the Program Term because of substantial achievement ofthe targets, objectives and goals contained in the Participant's businessplan. (l) ``Immediate family member'' means father, mother, husband, wife, son,daughter, brother, sister, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law,brother-in-law, sister-in-law, step-father, step-mother, step-son, step-daughter,step-brother, step-sister, half-brother and half-sister. (m) ``Indian tribe'' means any Indian tribe, band, nation, or other organizedgroup or community of Indians, including any Alaska Native Corporationas defined in paragraph (b) of this section which is recognized as eligiblefor the special programs and services provided by the United States toIndians because of their status as Indians, or is recognized as such bythe State in which such tribe, band, nation, group, or community resides.See paragraph (jj) of this section for definition of ``tribally-owned concern.''(n) ``Joint venture agreement'' means an agreement between an eligible8(a) concern and another small business concern, whether or not an 8(a)participant, solely for the purpose of performing a specific 8(a) contract.(o) ``Local buy item'' means a supply, service (nonprofessional/professional)or product purchased to meet the specific needs of one user in one location.Examples include the purchase of services, such as custodial, trash hauling,ADP support, auditing and training as well as construction work to be performedin one location and single user manufactured items. (p) ``Manufacturer'' means a concern which owns, operates, or maintainsa factory or establishment that produces on the premises the materials,supplies, articles, or equipment described in the business plan. In orderto qualify as a manufacturer, a concern must be able to show (1) That it is an established manufacturer of particular goods or goodsof general character which may be sought by the Government, or (2) If it is newly entering into such manufacturing activity, that it hasmade all necessary prior arrangements for space, equipment, and personnelto perform manufacturing operations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">A new firm which has made such definite commitments in order to entera manufacturing business which will later qualify it for the 8(a) program,shall not be barred from 8(a) approval because it has not yet done anymanufacturing; however, this interpretation is not intended to qualifya firm whose arrangements to use space, equipment, or personnel are contingentupon 8(a) approval. This definition is based upon the Walsh-Healey PublicContracts Act, 41 U.S.C. 35-45. (q) ``National buy item'' means an item or service purchased to meet theneeds of a system where supply control, inventory management, and procurementresponsibility have been assigned to a central procuring activity to supportthe needs of one or more users of the item in two or more locations. Examplesinclude military clothing purchased by the Defense Personnel Support Centerof the Department of Defense, paint or hand tools purchased by the FederalSupply Service of the General Services Administration, medical suppliespurchased by the Veterans Administration, or studies, evaluations, consultingservices or similar services purchased by the headquarters office of aDepartment or agency for use in two or more commands or field offices.(r) ``Native Hawaiian'' means any individual any of whose ancestors werenatives prior to 1778, of the area which now comprises the State of Hawaii.(s) ``Native Hawaiian Organization'' means any community service organizationserving Native Hawaiians in the State of Hawaii which: (1) Is a not-for-profit organization chartered by the State of Hawaii,(2) Is controlled by Native Hawaiians, and (3) Whose business activities will principally benefit such Native Hawaiians.(t) ``Negative control,'' as used in this part is defined in andSection;121.3(a)(i); and andSection; 124.104(c). (u) ``Nondisadvantaged individual'' means any individual who does not claimdisadvantaged status, does not qualify as disadvantaged, or upon whosedisadvantaged status SBA does not rely in qualifying the concern for 8(a)program participation. Except as provided in andSection; 124.116(c)(4), anindividual who has used his/her disadvantaged status in previously qualifyinga concern for 8(a) program participation is considered a nondisadvantagedindividual for all other 8(a) program purposes. (v) ``Non-8(a) business activity target'' means the amount of non-8(a)revenue forecasted in a Participant's approved business plan during eachyear of its participation in the 8(a) program. During the developmentalstage of program participation, these targets are goals of non-8(a) businessthat a Participant must strive to achieve and may be either a percentageof total revenues or a specified dollar figure. During the transitionalstage of program participation these targets must be expressed as a percentageof total revenues, as set forth in andSection; 124.312(c), that a Participantis required to achieve in each year in the transitional stage. (w) ``Open requirement'' means a requirement submitted to SBA by a procuringagency for possible 8(a) award without a particular 8(a) concern beingidentified as a candidate for the award. Open requirements can be for localbuy items or national buy items. (x) ``Operational control'' means actual or constructive authority to establishlong and short term goals for the concern, and manage the concern's dayto day operations. (y) ``Personal net worth'' means the net value of the assets of an individualremaining after total liabilities are deducted. See andSection; 124.106.(z) ``Primary industry classification'' means the four digit Standard IndustrialClassification (SIC) Code designation which, for an on-going applicantconcern, best describes the industry representing the largest proportionof its business revenues for the previous year or, in the case of a start-upapplicant concern, that SIC Code designation which best describes the industryin which it intends to do the most business. (aa) ``Principal place of business'' means the location at which the businessrecords of the applicant concern are maintained and the location at whichthe individual who manages the concern's day-to-day operations spends themajority of his/her working hours. (bb) ``Program Participant'' (``Participant'' or ``8(a) Participant'')means a small business concern participating in the Small Business andCapital Ownership Development Program established by section 7(j) and 8(a)of the Small Business Act (15 U.S.C. 636(j) and 637(a)). (cc) ``Program suspension'' means the temporary cessation of all 8(a) programassistance pursuant to andSection; 124.115 of these regulations. (dd) ``Program year'' means a 12-month period of an 8(a) Participant'sprogram participation. The first program year begins on the date that theconcern is certified to participate in the 8(a) program and ends one yearlater. Each subsequent program year begins on the Participant's anniversaryof program certification and runs for one 12-month period. (ee) ``Regular dealer'' means regular dealer as defined by the Walsh-HealeyPublic Contracts Act, 41 U.S.C. 35-45, and Department of Labor regulationsfound at 41 CFR 50-201.101, 50-206.53, and 50-206.54. (ff) ``Requirement'' means a contract opportunity from a Federal procuringagency to acquire articles, equipment, supplies, services, materials orconstruction work. (gg) ``Same or similar line of business'' means all business activitieswithin the same two-digit ``Major Group'' of the Standard Industrial Classification(SIC) System (set forth in the SIC Manual), as the primary industry classificationof the applicant concern. (hh) ``Self-marketing'' of a requirement occurs when an 8(a) firm identifiesa requirement that has not been committed to the 8(a) program and throughits marketing efforts causes the procuring agency to offer that specificrequirement to the 8(a) program on its behalf. A firm which identifiesand markets a requirement which is subsequently offered to the 8(a) programas an open requirement or on behalf of another 8(a) Participant has not``self-marketed'' the requirement within the meaning of these regulations.(ii) ``Termination'' means the permanent cessation of 8(a) program participationprior to the expiration of the concern's Program Term for good cause pursuantto andSection; 124.114. (jj) ``Tribally-owned concern'' means any concern at least 51 percent ownedby an Indian tribe as defined in paragraph (h) of this section. (kk) ``Unconditional ownership'' means ownership that is not subject toconditions precedent, conditions subsequent, executory agreements, votingtrusts, shareholder agreements or other similar arrangements which serveto allow the benefits of program participation to accrue to nondisadvantagedindividuals. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.101</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> The 8(a) program: General eligibility. </ITAG>(a) In order to be eligible to participate in the 8(a) program, an applicantconcern or an individual upon whom 8(a) eligibility is based must meetall of the eligibility criteria set forth in andSection; 124.102 throughandSection; 124.110 hereunder. An applicant concern owned and controlledby an Indian tribe must meet the requirements set forth in andSection; 124.116and in andSection;andSection; 124.102 through 124.110, as applicable. An applicantconcern owned and controlled by a Native Hawaiian Organization must meetthe requirements set forth in andSection; 124.117 and in andSection;andSection;124.102 through 124.110, as applicable. All determinations by the AA/MSBandamp;CODmade pursuant to andSection;andSection; 124.102, 124.103, 124.104, 124.105,124.106, and 124.107 shall be in writing, setting forth the findings basedon relevant facts and in accordance with law  and regulations, upon whichthe determination is based. An applicant concern which is declined 8(a)program admission may request a reconsideration of such decline, as setforth in andSection; 124.206. If the application is denied on reconsiderationbased on a negative finding of social disadvantage, economic disadvantage,ownership or control, such decline may be appealed by an unsuccessful applicantto the Office of Hearings and Appeals. If no reconsideration is soughtor if after reconsideration the application is declined based in wholeor in part on a ground other than a negative finding of social disadvantage,economic disadvantage, ownership or control, the written decline of theAA/MSBandamp;COD is final and not subject to appeal. Appeal procedures fora decline of program admission by the AA/MSBandamp;COD and grounds for whichsuch an appeal may be brought are set forth in andSection; 124.206 and Part134 of this title. The written decision of the Office of Hearings and Appealsshall be the final Agency decision. A concern which has been declined for8(a) program admission may reapply for the program 12 months after thedate of the final Agency decision to decline. (b) In order to continue its participation in the 8(a) program, a concerncertified for program participation on or after the effective date of theseregulations must continue to meet all eligibility requirements describedin paragraph (a) of this section. In order to continue its participationin the 8(a) program, a concern certified for program participation priorto the effective date of these regulations  must comply with the requirementsof paragraph (a) of this section which have been previously required byregulation, policy or procedure. Within 12 months of the effective dateof these regulations, such concerns must also come into compliance withthe requirements of paragraph (a) of this section which have not been previouslyrequired by regulation, policy or procedure. Failure to do so may leadto termination or graduation pursuant to andSection;andSection; 124.113 and124.114. (c)(1) It is SBA's intent to process applications for participation ina fair and consistent manner and to ensure that 8(a) program participationis limited to eligible individuals and concerns. Toward that end, SBA invitesthe participation of the public in preventing fraud and assuring the integrityof the 8(a) program. (2) The AA/MSBandamp;COD shall review any determination that an individual,applicant concern or Participant is eligible to participate in the 8(a)program whenever a member of the public submits credible evidence that:(i) Such determination was based on fraudulent information; (ii) SBA did not follow the requirements of these regulations in renderingthe determination; or (iii) The individual or concern has undergone one or more changes whichhave rendered it ineligible for 8(a) program particiption.  (3) The AA/MSBandamp;COD shall determine whether the facts developed duringany such review warrant further action. The member of the public whoseinformation gave rise to the review shall be advised of SBA's findings,consistent with laws protecting confidentiality. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.102 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Small business concern. </ITAG>(a) In order to be approved for participation in the 8(a) program, an applicantconcern must qualify as a small business concern as defined in andSection;121.4 of title 13, Code of Federal Regulations or andSection; 124.116. Theparticular size standard to be applied will be based on the primary industryclassification of the applicant concern. A concern owned by a Native HawaiianOrganization must also qualify as a small business concern, but the circumstanceof ownership by the Native Hawaiian Organization shall not, by itself,cause affiliation with the Native Hawaiian Organization. (b) If the Division of Program Certification and Eligibility (Division)is unable to determine that an applicant concern qualifies as a small business,the Division may deny the concern's application for 8(a) program admissionor may request a formal size determination from the appropriate regionaloffice. If the application is so denied, the small business concern mayrequest a formal size determination from the appropriate regional officepursuant to  andSection; 121.8 of this title. Negative size determinationsby an SBA regional office may be appealed to SBA's Office of Hearings andAppeals pursuant to andSection; 121.11 of this title. (c) In order to continue to participate in the 8(a) program, a ProgramParticipant must qualify pursuant to the provisions of Part 121 of thistitle as a small business under one or more of the SIC Codes containedin the concern's approved business plan. (d) Except for contracts awarded to joint ventures controlled by eligibleIndian tribes, under andSection; 124.320, a Program Participant must certifythat it is a small business pursuant to andSection; 121.4(g) of this titlefor the purpose of performing each contract awarded under the authorityof section 8(a). SBA, in turn, will verify such certifications. In theevent that the SBA does not accept a certification, the Program Participantmay file an appeal with SBA's Office of Hearings and Appeals pursuant toandSection;andSection; 121.4(g)(2)(ii)(D)(4) and 121.11 of this title. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.103 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Ownership requirements. </ITAG>Except for concerns owned by Indian tribes, Alaska Native Corporationsor Native Hawaiian Organizations, in order to be eligible to participatein the 8(a) program, an applicant concern must be one which is at least51 percent unconditionally owned by an individual(s) who is a citizen of the United States (specifically excluding permanent resident alien(s))and who is determined by SBA to be socially and economically disadvantaged.See andSection; 124.100 for definition of unconditional ownership. Generally,such individuals are required to have had a minimum of 51 percent ownershipin the applicant concern for at least two years prior to the date of applicationfor 8(a) program participation. In extraordinary circumstances, the AA/MSBandamp;CODmay waive this requirement where the disadvantaged owner(s) can demonstratethe concern's potential for success in accordance with paragraphs (b)(1)through (b)(4) of andSection; 124.107. Special ownership requirements forconcerns owned by Indian tribes and Alaskan Native Corporations are setforth in andSection; 124.116. Ownership requirements for Native HawaiianOrganizations are set forth in andSection; 124.117. (a) In the case of an applicant concern which is a partnership, 51 percentof the partnership interest must be owned by an individual(s) determinedby SBA to be socially and economically disadvantaged. Such ownership mustbe reflected in the concern's partnership agreement. (b) In the case of an applicant concern which is a corporation, 51 percentof each class of voting stock and 51 percent of the combined total of alloutstanding stock must be owned by an individual(s) determined by SBA tobe socially and economically disadvantaged. (c) A socially and economically disadvantaged individual(s) must hold unconditionalownership in the applicant concern. Such individual(s) cannot assert ownershipof a concern on the basis of unexercised stock options or other arrangements.(d) When determining ownership for purposes of 8(a) program eligibility,SBA will consider options to purchase stock by nondisadvantaged individualsor to convert non-voting stock or debentures held by nondisadvantaged individualsor entities to voting stock, to have been exercised. (e) The individual(s) upon whom eligibility is based must receive at least51 percent of the annual distribution of dividends of a corporate applicantconcern and must be entitled to receive 100 percent of the value of eachshare of stock in his/her possession in the event that the stock is sold;and must be entitled to receive at least 51 percent of the distributionproceeds in the event of a dissolution of the corporation. (f) An individual who is determined by SBA to be socially and economicallydisadvantaged for purposes of qualifying a concern for 8(a) program participationmay not have an ownership interest in any other 8(a) concern. One 8(a)concern may not hold an ownership interest in any other 8(a) concern. (g) A nondisadvantaged individual who is a partner, stockholder, officerand/or director in an 8(a) concern is prohibited from holding a simultaneousownership interest in another 8(a) concern. (h) A non 8(a) concern in the same or similar line of business is prohibitedfrom having an ownership interest in an 8(a) concern. (i) An 8(a) business concern may continue participation in the programsubsequent to a change in its 8(a) ownership, provided that SBA gave priorwritten approval to such change. Where the change in 8(a) ownership resultsfrom the death or incapacity of a disadvantaged principal, prior approvalis not required; however, the concern shall notify SBA as soon as possible.Continued participation of the 8(a) concern under new disadvantaged ownershiprequires compliance with all individual and business eligibility requirementsof these regulations by the concern and the new owners or the grant ofa waiver to andSection; 124.317. (j) The ownership limitations set forth in paragraphs (g), (h) and (i)of this section and paragraph (a)(5) of andSection; 124.104 do not applyto individuals or concerns with ownership interests of less than 5 percentof a concern which is a Program Participant or applicant. A Program Participant'srequest for SBA's approval for the issuance of a public offering will betreated as a request for a change of ownership in accordance with the provisionsof andSection; 124.317. Such request will also cause SBA to examine the concern'scontinued need for access to the business development resources of the8(a) program. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.104</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Control and management. </ITAG>Except for concerns owned by Indian tribes and Native Hawaiian Organizationsas defined in andSection; 124.100 (m) and (r), an applicant concern's managementand daily business operations must be controlled by an owner(s) of theapplicant concern who has (have) been determined to be socially and economicallydisadvantaged. (See andSection; 124.112 for the requirements for tribally-ownedentities and andSection; 124.113 for requirements for concerns owned by NativeHawaiian Organizations.) In order for a disadvantaged individual to befound to control the concern, that individual must have managerial andtechnical experience and competency directly related to the primary industryin which the applicant concern is seeking 8(a) certification. In addition,for those industries requiring professional training and/or licensing (i.e.,public accountancy, law, professional engineering, asbestos removal, etc.),SBA must determine that the individual(s) upon whom eligibility is basedhas (have) the necessary training and/or hold the requisite license(s).(a) Individuals who are not socially and economically disadvantaged maybe involved in the management of an applicant concern, and may be stockholders,partners, officers, and/or directors of such concern. Such individual(s),their spouses or immediate family members who reside in the individual'shousehold may not, however: (1) Be former employers of the disadvantaged owner(s) of the applicantor 8(a) concern. (2) Be an owner, stockholder, partner, officer, director or manager ofanother firm in the same or similar line of business as the applicant or8(a) concern. (3) Exercise actual control or have the power to control the applicantor 8(a) concern. (4) Receive excessive compensation for personal services from the applicantor 8(a) concern as directors or employees. Compensation for the personalservices of a nondisadvantaged owner, his/her spouse or immediate familymember residing in the same household will be deemed excessive if it exceedsthe compensation to be received by any of the individuals upon whom eligibilityis based; provided that with the written approval of the AA/MSBandamp;CODor designee, an individual upon whom eligibility is based may elect totake a lower salary than such a nondisadvantaged individual if it is demonstratedto be in the best interests of the applicant or 8(a) concern. (5) Have an ownership interest in another 8(a) concern subject to the exceptionset forth in paragraph (j) of andSection; 124.103.(b) The AA/MSBandamp;COD may allow exceptions to the prohibitions set forthin paragraphs (a) (1), (4) and (5) of this section if requested to do soin writing and if it is established that the contemplated relationshipbetween the nondisadvantaged individual and the disadvantaged individualor applicant concern does not give the former actual control or the potentialto control the applicant or 8(a) concern and such relationship is in thebest interest of the applicant or 8(a) concern. (c) With respect to the situation described in paragraph (a)(3) of thissection, nondisadvantaged individuals may be found to control or have thepower to control in any of the following circumstances, which are illustrativeonly and not all inclusive: (1) Nondisadvantaged individuals control the board of directors of the8(a) concern either directly through majority membership, or indirectly,if the by-laws allow nondisadvantaged individuals to block any action proposedby the disadvantaged individuals through negative control. For example,an equal number of disadvantaged and nondisadvantaged directors could createnegative control. (2) A nondisadvantaged individual, as an officer or member of the Boardof Directors of the 8(a) concern, or through stock ownership, has the powerto control day-to-day direction of the business affairs of the concern.(3) The nondisadvantaged individual provides critical financial or bondingsupport or licenses to the 8(a) concern which directly or indirectly allowsthe nondisadvantaged individual to gain control or direction of the 8(a)concern. (4) A nondisadvantaged individual exercises voting control of the Participantthrough a nominee(s). (5) A nondisadvantaged individual controls the corporation or the individualdisadvantaged owners through loan arrangements. (6) Other contractual relationships exist with nondisadvantaged individuals,the terms of which would create control over the disadvantaged concern.(d) An applicant concern must be managed on a full-time basis by one ormore persons who have been found by SBA to be socially and economicallydisadvantaged, and such person(s) must possess requisite management andtechnical capabilities as determined by SBA. Such individual must holdthe position of President or Chief Executive Officer. This precludes outsideemployment or other business interests by the individual which conflictwith the management of the firm or hinder it in achieving the objectivesof its business development plan. Any disadvantaged person upon whom 8(a)eligibility is based, who is engaged in the management and daily businessoperations of the 8(a) concern and who wishes to engage in outside employmentmust notify SBA of the nature and anticipated duration of the outside employmentprior to engaging in such employment. SBA will review such notificationfor compliance with the requirement of day-to-day management and controlof the 8(a) concern. (e) The socially and economically disadvantaged individual(s) upon whomeligibility is based shall control the Board of Directors of an applicantor 8(a) concern, either in actual numbers (<T3>e.g., </T3>in a concern having a three-person Board of Directors whereeach Director has one vote, there must be at least two disadvantaged individualson the Board) or through voting rights (<T3>e.g., </T3>in a concern having a two-person Board of Directors whereone individual on the Board is disadvantaged and one is not, the disadvantagedvote must be weighted_worth more than one vote_in order for the concernto be eligible for 8(a) participation). All arrangements regarding thestructure and voting rights of the Board and its members must comply withapplicable state laws. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.105 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Social disadvantage. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Socially disadvantaged individuals are those who havebeen subjected to racial or ethnic prejudice or cultural bias because oftheir identities as members of groups without regard to their individualqualities. The social disadvantage must stem from circumstances beyondtheir control. (b) <T3>Members of designated groups. </T3>(1) In the absence of evidence tothe contrary, the following individuals are presumed socially disadvantaged:Black Americans; Hispanic Americans; Native Americans (American Indians,Eskimos, Aleuts, or Native Hawaiians); Asian Pacific Americans (personswith origins from Burma, Thailand, Malaysia, Indonesia, Singapore, Brunei,Japan, China, Taiwan, Laos, Kampuchea, Vietnam, Korea, The Philippines,U.S. Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands (Republic of Palau), Republicof the Marshall Islands, Federated States of Micronesia, the Commonwealthof the Northern Mariana Islands, Guam or Samoa; Subcontinent Asian Americans(persons with origins from India, Pakistan, Bangladesh, Sri Lanka, Bhutanor Nepal); and members of other groups designated from time to time bySBA according to procedures set forth at paragraph (d) of this section.(2) An individual seeking socially disadvantaged status as a member ofa designated group may be required to demonstrate that he/she holds himself/herselfout and is identified as a member of a designated group if SBA has reasonto question such individual's status as a group member. (c) <T3>Individuals not members of designated groups. </T3>(1) An individualwho is not a member of one of the above-named groups must establish his/herindividual social disadvantage on the basis of clear and convincing evidence.A clear and convincing case of social disadvantage must include the followingelements: (i) The individual's social disadvantage must stem from his or her color,ethnic origin, gender, physical handicap, long-term residence in an environmentisolated from the mainstream of American society, or other similar causenot common to small business persons who are not socially disadvantaged.(ii) The individual must demonstrate that he or she has personally sufferedsocial disadvantage, not merely claim membership in a non-designated groupwhich could be considered socially disadvantaged. (iii) The individual's social disadvantage must be rooted in treatmentwhich he or she has experienced in American society, not in other countries.(iv) The individual's social disadvantage must be chronic and substantial,not fleeting or insignificant. (v) The individual's social disadvantage must have negatively impactedon his or her entry into and/or advancement in the business world. SBAwill entertain any relevant evidence in assessing this element of an applicant'scase. SBA will particularly consider and place emphasis on the followingexperiences of the individual, where relevant: (A) <T3>Education. </T3>SBA shall consider, as evidence of an individual'ssocial disadvantage, denial of equal access to institutions of higher education;exclusion from social and professional association with students and teachers;denial of educational honors; social patterns or pressures which have discouragedthe individual from pursuing a professional or business education; andother similar factors.(B) <T3>Employment.</T3> SBA shall consider, as evidence of an individual'ssocial disadvantage, discrimination in hiring; discrimination in promotionsand other aspects of professional advancement; discrimination in pay andfringe benefits; discrimination in other terms and conditions of employment;retaliatory behavior by an employer; social patterns or pressures whichhave channelled the individual into nonprofessional or non-business fields;and other similar factors. (C) <T3>Business history. </T3>SBA shall consider, as evidence of an individual'ssocial disadvantage, unequal access to credit or capital; acquisition ofcredit or capital under unfavorable circumstances; discrimination in receipt(award and/or bid) of government contracts; discrimination by potentialclients; exclusion from business or professional organizations; and othersimilar factors which have impeded the individual's business development.(d) <T3>Socially disadvantaged group inclusion</T3>_(1) <T3>General. </T3>Upon an adequate showing to SBA by representatives ofan identifiable group that the group has suffered chronic racial or ethnicprejudice or cultural bias, and upon the request of the representativesof the group that SBA do so, SBA shall publish in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> a notice of its receipt of a request that itconsider a group not specifically named in section 201 of Pub. L. 95-507to have members which are socially disadvantaged because of their identificationas members of the group for the purpose of eligibility for the 8(a) program.The notice shall adequately identify the group making the request, andif a hearing is requested on the matter and such request is granted, thetime, date and location at which such hearing is to be held. All informationsubmitted to support a request should be addressed to the AA/MSBandamp;COD.(2) <T3>Standards to be applied. </T3>In determining whether a group has madean adequate showing that it has suffered chronic racial or ethnic prejudiceor cultural bias for the purposes of this regulation, SBA shall determine:(i) Whether the group has suffered the effects of prejudice, bias, or discriminatorypractices; (ii) Whether such conditions have resulted in economic deprivation forthe group of the type which Congress has found exists for the groups namedin Pub. L. 95-507; and (iii) Whether such conditions have produced impediments in the businessworld for members of the group over which they have no control and whichare not common to all small business owners. If it is demonstrated to SBAby a particular group that it satisfies the above criteria, SBA will publisha notice under paragraph (d)(1) of this section. (3) <T3>Procedure. </T3>Once a notice is published under paragraph (d)(1) ofthis section, SBA shall adduce further information on the record of theproceeding which tends to support or refute the group's request. Such informationmay be submitted by any member of the public, including Government representativesand any member of the private sector. Information may be submitted in writtenform, or orally at such hearings as SBA may hold on the matter. (4) <T3>Decision. </T3>Once SBA has published a notice under paragraph (d)(1)of this section, it shall afford a period of not more than thirty (30)days for public comment concerning the petition for socially disadvantagedgroup status. It shall complete the reception of comments, including theholding of hearings within such comment period. Thereafter, SBA shall considerall information received and shall render its final decision within 60days of the close of the comment period. Such decision shall be publishedas a notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. Concurrent with the notice, SBA shall providethe petitioners of its final decision in writing. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.106</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Economic disadvantage. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Economic disadvantage for the 8(a) program.</T3> (1)(i) For purposesof the 8(a) program, economically disadvantaged individuals are sociallydisadvantaged individuals whose ability to compete in the free enterprisesystem has been impaired due to diminished capital and credit opportunities,as compared to others in the same or similar line of business who are notsocially disadvantaged and such diminished opportunities have precludedor are likely to preclude such individuals from successfully competingin the open market. In determining economic disadvantage for purposes of8(a) program eligibility, SBA shall compare the applicant concern's businessand financial profile with profiles of businesses in the same or similarline of business which are not owned and controlled by socially and economicallydisadvantaged individuals. (ii) This program is not intended to assist concerns owned and controlledby socially disadvantaged individuals who have accumulated substantialwealth, who have unlimited growth potential or who have not experiencedor have overcome impediments to obtaining access to financing, marketsand resources. (2) <T3>Factors to be considered. </T3>In determining the degree of diminishedcredit and capital opportunities of a socially disadvantaged individual,SBA will consider factors relating both to the applicant concern and tothe individual(s) claiming disadvantaged status. Factors to be analyzeddepend upon the particular primary industry in which the applicant concernis involved and fall into three general categories: the personal financialcondition of the individual(s) claiming disadvantaged status, includingthat individual's access to credit and capital; the financial conditionof the applicant concern; and the applicant concern's access to credit,capital and markets. (i) <T3>Personal financial condition of the individuals claiming disadvantagedstatus. </T3>This criterion is designed to assess the relative degree ofeconomic disadvantage of the individual, as well as the individual's potentialto capitalize or otherwise provide financial support for the business.The specific factors to be considered include, but are not limited to:the individual's personal income for at least the past two years; totalfair market value of all assets; and, the personal net worth of the individualand his/her spouse, if married, subject to the exclusions set forth inparagraph (b)(1)(i) of this section. (A) When married, an individual upon whom eligibility is based shall submita joint financial statement. However, a joint financial statement is notrequired if the individual and his/her spouse are subject to a legal separation.(B) Whenever SBA calculates the personal net worth of an individual claimingdisadvantaged status for purposes of the 8(a) program, SBA shall excludethe individual's ownership interest in the applicant or participating 8(a)concern and the equity in his/her primary personal residence, (includingthe equity of both spouses, if married) but shall not exclude any portionof such equity in his/her primary residence which is attributable to excessivewithdrawals from the applicant or participating 8(a) concern. (C) Whenever SBA calculates the personal net worth of an individual claimingto be an Alaska Native, as defined in andSection; 124.100(a), SBA shall includeassets and income from sources other than an Alaska Native Corporation,as defined in andSection; 124.100(b), and shall exclude from such calculationany of the following which the individual receives from any Alaska NativeCorporation: (<T3>1</T3>) Cash (including cash dividends on stock received from a NativeCorporation) to the extent that it does not, in the aggregate, exceed $2,000per individual per annum; (<T3>2</T3>) Stock (including stock issued or distributed by a Native Corporationas a dividend or distribution on stock); (<T3>3</T3>) A partnership interest; (<T3>4</T3>) Land or an interest in land (including land or an interestin land received from a Native Corporation as a dividend or distributionon stock); and (<T3>5</T3>) An interest in a settlement trust. (ii) <T3>Business financial condition. </T3>This criterion will be used to providea financial picture of a firm at a specific point in time in comparisonto other concerns in the same or similar line of business which are notowned and controlled by socially and economically disadvantaged individuals.In evaluating a concern's financial condition, SBA's consideration willinclude, but not be limited to, the following factors: Business assets,revenues, pre-tax profit, net worth of the concern, including the valueof the investments in the concern held by the individual claiming disadvantagedstatus, the return on assets, the return on investments, return on sales,ratio of current assets to current liability (current ratio), the ratioof the concern's sales to the compensation of its officers, the ratio ofthe concern's sales to its working capital, the ratio of the concern'sdebt to its net worth. (iii) <T3>Access to credit and capital. </T3>This criterion will be used to evaluatethe ability of the applicant concern to obtain the external support necessaryto operate a competitive business enterprise. In making the evaluation,SBA shall consider the concern's access to credit and capital, including,but not limited to, the following factors: Access to long-term financing;access to working capital financing; equipment trade credit; access toraw materials and/or supplier trade credit; and bonding capability. (b) <T3>Economic disadvantage for the 8(d) Subcontracting Program, Small DisadvantagedBusiness Set-Asides, Small Disadvantaged Business Evaluation Preferencesand for any other Federal procurement programs requiring SBA's determinationof disadvantaged status.</T3> For purposes of the section 8(d) subcontractingprogram and other programs requiring SBA's determination of disadvantagedstatus, economically disadvantaged individuals are socially disadvantagedindividuals whose ability to compete in the free enterprise system hasbeen impaired due to diminished capital and credit opportunities, as comparedto others in the same or similar line of business and whose diminishedopportunities have precluded or are likely to preclude such individualsfrom successfully competing in the open market. In determining economicdisadvantage for the 8(d) subcontracting program, small disadvantaged businessset-asides and small disadvantaged business evaluation preferences, SBAwill consider the factors set forth in paragraph (a) of this section butwill apply standards to each factor that are less restrictive than thoseapplied when determining economic disadvantage for purposes of the 8(a)program. This approach corresponds to the Congressional intent that partialor complete achievement of a concern's 8(a) program business developmentgoals should not necessarily preclude its participation in other Federalprocurement programs for concerns owned and controlled by socially andeconomically disadvantaged individuals. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.107</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Potential for success. </ITAG>(a) SBA will approve a concern for program participation only when it findsthat the applicant concern possesses the potential for success. In determiningwhether a concern has potential for success, SBA will look at a numberof factors including, but not limited to, the technical and managerialexperience and competency of the individual(s) upon whom eligibility isbased, the financial capacity of the applicant concern and the concern'srecord of performance on previous Federal and private sector contractsin the primary industry in which the concern is seeking 8(a) certification.SBA will examine each of these factors to determine whether the otherwiseeligible applicant concern has the potential to successfully perform subcontractsawarded under the 8(a) program and meet the business development objectivesand goals of the program. (b) Generally, if an applicant concern has been in business in the primaryindustry classification in which it seeks 8(a) certification for two fullyears as evidenced by income tax returns showing revenues for each of theyears, and if the concern has a proven performance record and is financiallysound, SBA will find it to possess the requisite potential for success.In extraordinary circumstances, an applicant concern which has not beenin business in its primary industry classification for two full years maybe found to possess the potential for success if all of the following conditionsare met: (1) The disadvantaged person(s) upon whom eligibility is based has (have)outstanding business experience, technical expertise, and educational backgrounddirectly related to the applicant concern's primary industry classification.(2) The applicant concern is adequately capitalized. (3) The disadvantaged person(s) upon whom eligibility is based has (have)demonstrated strong management skills. (4) The applicant concern's existence as a functional business entity isnot contingent upon acceptance into the 8(a) program. (c) An applicant concern shall not be denied admission into the programdue solely to a determination that specific contract opportunities areunavailable to assist in the development of the concern unless: (1) The Government has not previously procured and is unlikely to procurethe types of products or services offered by the concern; or (2) The purchase of such products or services by the Federal Governmentwill not be in quantities sufficient to support the developmental needsof the applicant and other Program Participants providing the same or similaritems or services. (d) Even though an applicant concern meets all of the eligibility criteriaestablished in these regulations, the AA/MSBandamp;COD has the authorityto decline an otherwise eligible concern based on the lack of SBA resourcesto serve the applicant concern. A determination to decline the applicationbased on the lack of SBA resources must be accompanied by a written statementthat SBA resources, particularly personnel, are inadequate or unavailableto serve the applicant concern. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.108</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Additional 8(a) program eligibility requirements. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Individual character review. </T3>If, during the processing of an application,adverse information is obtained from the section 8(a) program applicantor a credible source regarding possible criminal conduct by an applicantconcern or any of its principals, no further action will be taken on theapplication until SBA's Inspector General has evaluated that informationand has advised the AA/MSBandamp;COD of his or her findings. The AA/MSBandamp;CODwill consider those findings when evaluating the application.(b) <T3>Standards of conduct. </T3>The SBA Standards of Conduct regulations,13 CFR Part 105, <T3>et seq., </T3>apply to eligibility questions involving SBA employeesand their relatives. In particular, see andSection;andSection; 105.404 and105.506 of this title prohibiting certain SBA employees and former employeesfrom, among other things, holding an ownership interest in an 8(a) concern.(c) <T3>Eligibility limitations. </T3>(1) Except for Indian tribes, once aconcern or disadvantaged individual upon whom eligibility was based hasparticipated in the 8(a) program and the concern has exited the programby termination, graduation, voluntary withdrawal or expiration of its programterm, neither the concern nor any of the individuals upon whom programeligibility was based shall be eligible to reapply for program participation.<T3>See </T3>andSection; 124.112 of this part regarding eligibility limitationsfor Indian tribes. (2) An individual will be found to have used his or her eligibility forthe 8(a) program if he or she has claimed disadvantaged status by completingthe appropriate SBA forms and SBA has approved the applicant concern'sentry into the 8(a) program. (3) Use of eligibility will take effect on the date of the concern's approvalinto the program. (4) After an 8(a) concern exits the program, a disadvantaged owner of thatconcern may hold an ownership interest in another 8(a) concern providedthat the concern is not in the same or similar line of business. In theseinstances, for purposes of 8(a) participation only, such an individualwill be deemed to be a non-disadvantaged owner of that concern and criteriarestricting non-disadvantaged individual participation shall apply. <T3>See </T3>andSection;andSection; 124.103 and 124.104 of this part. (5) Transfer of the ownership and control of an 8(a) participant to oneor more other individuals does not terminate such concern's eligibilityfor the program provided that SBA determines the transferee(s) to be sociallyand economically disadvantaged or grants a waiver pursuant to andSection;124.317. However, the 8(a) concern's Program Term as described in andSection;124.110 is in no way affected by such transfer. (d) <T3>Manufacturers and regular dealers. </T3>(1) For purposes of programentry, each applicant concern whose primary industry classification isas a manufacturer or supplier of materials, supplies, articles and equipmentmust be determined to be a manufacturer or regular dealer as defined inthe Walsh-Healey Public Contracts Act Regulations found at 48 CFR Subpart22.6. (2) Participants in the developmental stage of 8(a) program participationmay be eligible for two exemptions from the contingent agreement requirementsof the Walsh-Healey Public Contracts Act, <T3>see, </T3>andSection; 124.304(d). However, the availability of such exemptionsduring the Program Term in no way affects the requirement that an applicantconcern comply with the provisions of paragraph (d)(1) of this section.(e) Immediate family members living in the same household may not eachuse their individual disadvantaged status to qualify more than one businessconcern for section 8(a) program participation if the concerns are in thesame or similar line of business. When the concerns are in separate linesof business, each applicant must establish that the concerns are separatelyowned, managed and controlled. (For size limitations <T3>see </T3>andSection; 121.3(a)(ii) of this title.) <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.109</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Ineligible businesses. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Brokers and packagers. </T3>Brokers and packagers are ineligible toparticipate in the 8(a) program. These types of businesses do not satisfythe definition of a manufacturer or regular dealer, as stated in andSection;124.100. (b) <T3>Franchises. </T3>Except for those admitted to the 8(a) program priorto the effective date of these regulations, franchises are ineligible toparticipate in the section 8(a) program. (c) <T3>Debarred or suspended person or concern. </T3>Pursuant to 48 CFR ChapterI, Subpart 9.4, or 13 CFR Part 145, individuals or concerns who are debarred,suspended, voluntarily excluded or are found to be an ineligible bidderby any contracting agency of the Federal Government are ineligible foradmission into the 8(a) program during the period of debarment, suspension,voluntary exclusion or status as ineligible. Prior to approval for admissionto the 8(a) program, the applicant must certify that both the applicantconcern and the disadvantaged individual(s) upon whom eligibility is basedare not at that time debarred, suspended, voluntarily excluded or otherwisean ineligible bidder. (d) <T3>Non-profit organizations. </T3>A non-profit organization does not meetthe general definition of a concern as set forth in andSection;andSection;121.3(b) and 124.100(d) of these regulations and is, therefore, ineligiblefor 8(a) program participation (<T3>see </T3>andSection; 124.100(g)). Nothing in this paragraph affects theeligibility of a for-profit concern owned and controlled by a HawaiianNative Organization, Indian tribe or Alaska Native Corporation (<T3>see </T3>andSection;andSection; 124.112 and 124.113 of this part). (e) <T3>Concerns owned by other disadvantaged concerns. </T3>A concern whichis owned in whole or in part by another business concern and relies onthe disadvantaged status of that concern to claim disadvantaged statusis ineligible for 8(a) program participation. These types of businessesdo not meet the individual disadvantaged ownership requirements of theSmall Business Act and the regulations as set forth in andSection; 124.103.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.110</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Program term. </ITAG>(a) Each concern certified for program participation on or after November15, 1988, is subject to a Program Term of nine years from the date of suchcertification. The term will consist of two stages: the developmental stageand the transitional stage, which are described in andSection; 124.303 ofthis part. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit SBA frominitiating graduation, termination or suspension actions pursuant to andSection;andSection;124.208, 124.209 and 124.211 or to prohibit a participant from voluntarilywithdrawing from the program. (b) A concern is subject to a revised program term if the following conditionsare met: (1) The concern was a Program Participant as of September 1, 1988 or approvedfor 8(a) program participation between September 1, 1988 and November 15,1988; and (2) The concern did not voluntarily withdraw from the 8(a) program andwas not graduated or terminated pursuant to andSection;andSection; 124.208and 124.209 between September 1, 1988 and November 15, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The revised Program Term shall be the greater of nine years from thedate of the Participant's first contract pursuant to section 8(a) or theParticipant's Fixed Program Participation Term (FPPT) expiration date,including any extension thereof, plus 18 months, whichever is greater.(c) Once a Program Term has been established or revised in accordance withparagraphs (a) and (b) of this section, SBA is statutorily prohibited fromextending such term beyond the specified expiration date.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.111 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Continued 8(a) program eligibility.  </ITAG>(a) <T3>Standards.</T3> In order for a concern to remain eligible for programparticipation, it must continue to meet all eligibility criteria containedin andSection;andSection; 124.101 through 124.109. Failure to do so will causeSBA to initiate a graduation or termination proceeding in accordance withandSection;andSection; 124.208 and 124.209.  (b) <T3>Submissions supporting continued eligibility. </T3>As part of its annualreview, each Program Participant shall annually submit to the Divisionof Program Certification and Eligibility and to the servicing field officethe following:  (1) A certification that it meets the 8(a) program eligibility requirementsas set forth in andSection;andSection; 124.101 through 124.109;  (2) Personal financial statement for each disadvantaged owner;  (3) A record of all payments (including loans and advances) made by theParticipant to each of its owners or to any person or entity affiliatedwith such owners; and  (4) Such other information as SBA may deem necessary. For other requiredannual submissions, <T3>see</T3> andSection; 124.601.  (c) <T3>Economic disadvantage eligibility reviews. </T3>(1) Upon receipt ofspecific and credible information alleging that a Program Participant nolonger meets the requirements of economic disadvantage for continued programeligibility, SBA shall conduct a review of the concern's eligibility forcontinued participation in the Program.  (2) (i) If, based on information received from the Participant or elsewhere,SBA has reason to believe that the Participant no longer meets the standardsof economic disadvantage as set forth in andSection; 124.106, SBA shall conducta review to determine whether the Participant and its disadvantaged ownerscontinue to meet such standards.  (ii) Sufficient reasons for SBA to conclude that an 8(a) Participant isno longer economically disadvantaged may include, but are not limited to:demonstrated access of the concern and/or its owners to a substantial newsource of capital or loans, an unusually large amount of funds withdrawnfrom the concern by its owners, or an unusually high personal net worthof the disadvantaged owner(s), not including the owner's equity in the8(a) concern and in his/her primary personal residence.  (3) If SBA determines, pursuant to paragraphs (c)(1) or (c)(2) of thissection, that a Program Participant and/or its disadvantaged owner(s) areno longer economically disadvantaged, SBA shall initiate a graduation proceedingunder andSection; 124.208.  (4) If, based on information received from the Participant or elsewhere,SBA has reason to believe that an excessive amount of funds or other assetshas been withdrawn from the Participant for the personal benefit of thedisadvantaged owner(s) or that of any person or entity affiliated withsuch owner(s), SBA shall conduct a review to determine whether such withdrawalwas detrimental to the achievement of the targets, objectives and goalsof the Participant's business plan.  (5) If SBA determines pursuant to paragraph (c)(4) of this section, thatfunds or other assets have been withdrawn to the detriment of the achievementof the targets, objectives and goals of the Participant's business plan,SBA shall initiate a termination proceeding under andSection; 124.209 orshall require an appropriate reinvestment of funds or other assets andsuch other actions as SBA may deem necessary to counteract the detrimentalwithdrawals.  (d) <T3>Eligibility reviews.</T3> If on the basis of information submittedpursuant to paragraph (b) or upon information received from any source,SBA has reason to believe the Program Participant no longer meets the eligibilitycriteria (other than economic disadvantage), SBA shall conduct a reviewof the Participant's 8(a) program eligibility. If as a result of such review,SBA determines such Participant may no longer be eligible for program participation,SBA shall initiate termination proceedings under andSection; 124.209.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.112 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Concerns owned by Indian tribes.  </ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> (1) Small business concerns owned by Indian tribes areeligible for participation in the section 8(a) program, provided that certainconditions are met as described below. The term Indian Tribe is definedin andSection; 124.100(m) of this part.  (2) Small business concerns owned and controlled by Indian tribes are generallyconsidered socially and economically disadvantaged for purposes of participationin programs authorized by section 8(d) of the Small Business Act, section1207(a) of the Defense Authorization Act of 1987 and any other program,except the 8(a) program, which requires social and economic disadvantagedstatus as a condition of eligibility. If such disadvantaged status is challengedunder Subpart B of this part, SBA will evaluate the disadvantaged statusof the tribally owned concern using the criteria set forth in this sectionand andSection; 125.106 of this part, as appropriate.  (3) Small business concerns owned and controlled by Alaska Native corporations(ANC) are eligible for participation in the section 8(a) program, subjectto the same conditions as apply to tribally-owned concerns and are describedat paragraphs (b) through (e) of this section with the following exceptionswhich apply solely to ANC-owned concerns:  (i) In evaluating the economic disadvantage of the ANC, no considerationshall be given to assets or income derived from distributions of the AlaskaNative Fund established by the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act, Pub.L. 92-203, (1971). Such assets and income should be included but specificallyidentified on the ANC's financial statements.  (ii) Alaska Natives and descendants of Natives must own a majority of boththe total equity of the ANC and the total voting powers to elect directorsof the ANC through their holdings of settlement common stock. Settlementcommon stock means stock of an ANC issued pursuant to 43 U.S.C. 1606(g)(1)and which is subject to the rights and restrictions listed in 43 U.S.C.1606(h)(1).  (iii) Even though an ANC can be either for profit or non-profit, a smallbusiness concern owned and controlled by ANC must be for profit to be eligiblefor the 8(a) program. The concern will be deemed owned and controlled bythe ANC for purposes of program eligibility so as to satisfy paragraph(a)(3) of this section where the majority of stock or other ownership interestis held by the ANC and holders of its settlement common stock. Both a majorityof the total equity and total voting power must be so held.  (iv) An Alaska Native who holds Settlement Common Stock will be treatedas a tribal member for purposes of the control and management requirementsof paragraph (c)(4)(i) of this section. Officers or directors of an ANCwill be treated as members of tribal council for purposes of paragraph(c)(4)(ii) of this section.  (b) <T3>Tribal eligibility. </T3> In order to qualify a concern which it ownsand controls for participation in the 8(a) program, an Indian Tribe itselfmust meet the conditions set forth in paragraphs (b) (1) through (2) ofthis section. Once an Indian tribe has so established its disadvantagedstatus, it need not reestablish such status in order to have other businessesthat it owns certified for 8(a) program participation, unless specificallyrequired to do so by the AA/MSB-COD or his/her designee. The AA/MSB-COD,or designee, may require proof of tribal eligibility during the programparticipation of any tribally-owned business or at any time during theprocessing of an 8(a) program application by a tribally-owned concern.However, nothing in this paragraph affects the requirement that each tribally-ownedconcern seeking to be certified for 8(a) Program participation comply withthe provisions of paragraph (c) of this section.  (1) <T3>Social disadvantage.</T3> An Indian tribe meeting the definition setforth in andSection; 124.100(m) of this part shall be deemed socially disadvantaged.Individual tribal members responsible for control and management upon whomeligibility is based, pursuant to paragraph (c)(4) of this section, areconsidered socially disadvantaged Native Americans absent evidence to thecontrary as provided at andSection; 124.105(b).  (2) <T3>Economic disadvantage.</T3> In order to be eligible to participatein the 8(a) program the Indian tribe must demonstrate to SBA, that thetribe itself is economically disadvantaged. This shall involve the considerationof available data showing the tribe's economic condition, including butnot limited to, the following information:  (i) The number of tribal members.  (ii) The present tribal unemployment rate.  (iii) The per capita income of tribal members excluding judgment awards. (iv) The percentage of the local Indian population below the poverty level.(v) The tribe's access to capital markets. (vi) The tribal assets as disclosed in a current tribal financial statement.The statement should list all assets including those which are encumberedor held in trust, but the status of those encumbered or trust assets shouldbe clearly delineated. (vii) A list of all wholly or partially owned tribal enterprises or affiliatesand the primary industry classification of each, as defined in andSection;124.100(z). The list must also specify the members of the tribe who manageor control such enterprises or serve as officers or directors. (viii) Other information usually evaluated by SBA in order to determineeconomic disadvantage as described in andSection; 124.106. (3) <T3>Application process_forms and documents required. </T3>In order toestablish tribal eligibility to qualify for the 8(a) program, the Indiantribe must submit the forms and documents required of 8(a) applicants generallyas well as the following material: (i) A copy of the tribe's governing document(s) such as its constitutionor business charter. (ii) Evidence of its recognition as a tribe eligible for the special programsand services provided by the United States or by its state of residence.(iii) Copies of its articles of incorporation and bylaws as filed withthe organizing or chartering authority, or similar documents needed toestablish and govern a non-corporate legal entity. (iv) Documents or materials needed to show the tribe's economically disadvantagedstatus as described in paragraph (b)(2) of this section. (c) <T3>Business eligibility. </T3>In order to be eligible to participate inthe 8(a) program, a concern which is owned by an eligible Indian tribemust meet the conditions set forth in paragraphs (c) (1) through (6) ofthis section. (1) <T3>Legal business entity organized for profit and susceptible to suit.</T3>The applicant or participating concern must be a separate and distinctlegal entity organized or chartered by the tribe, or Federal or state authorities.The concern must waive any sovereign immunity which may attach by reasonof ownership by the tribe. Its articles of incorporation must contain expresssovereign immunity waiver language, or a ``sue and be sued'' clause whichdesignates United States Federal Courts to be among the courts of competentjurisdiction. Also, the concern must be organized for profit, and the tribemust possess economic development powers in the tribe's governing documents.(2) <T3>Size. </T3>(i) A tribally-owned applicant concern must qualify as asmall business concern as defined for purposes of Government procurementin Part 121 of this title. The particular size standard to be applied shallbe based on the primary industry classification of the applicant concern.Ownership by the tribe will not, in and of itself, cause affiliation withthe tribe or with other entities owned by the tribe. However, affiliationwith other tribally-owned entities may be caused by circumstances otherthan tribal ownership. (<T3>See </T3>andSection; 121.3(a) of this title regarding affiliation.) (ii) Except as provided in paragraph (c)(2)(iii) of this section, a tribally-ownedProgram Participant must certify to SBA that it is a small business pursuantto the provisions of andSection; 121.4(g)(2) of this title for the purposeof performing each individual contract which it is awarded. (iii) During its Program Term, a tribally-owned Program Participant may,for up to two 8(a) contracts, be a party to a joint venture which exceedsthe applicable size standard, if the joint venture is: (A) 51 Percent or more owned and controlled by the tribally-owned Participant;(B) Is located on the tribe's reservation or land owned by such tribe;(C) Performs most of its activities on such reservation or tribally-ownedland; and (D) Employs members of the tribe for at least 50 percent of its total workforce.(3) <T3>Ownership. </T3>For corporate entities, a tribe must own at least 50percent of the voting stock and at least 51 percent of the aggregate ofall classes of stock. For new corporate entities, a tribe must own at leasta 51 percent interest. No Indian tribe shall own more than one currentor former 8(a) Program Participant having the same primary industry classification.Tribally-owned Program Participants are subject to the provisions of andSection;andSection;124.103 (c) and (d) relating to ownership by nondisadvantaged individualsand non-8(a) concerns. (4) <T3>Control and management. </T3>(i) The management and daily businessoperations of a tribally-owned concern must be controlled by individualmembers of the tribe, who have not previously used any disadvantaged statusindividually which they may have to qualify a non-tribally-owned concernfor 8(a) program participation, and who do not or have not manage(d) andcontrol(led) more than one other tribally-owned 8(a) Program Participant.In addition, such managers must be found to possess the technical experienceand expertise required in andSection; 124.104(d). This paragraph does notpreclude management of a tribally-owned concern by committees, teams, orBoards controlled by such individuals. (ii) Members of the tribal council shall not participate in the daily managementor on the board of directors of any tribally-owned 8(a) concern withoutobtaining prior written approval for such participation from SBA. (iii) Except as permitted by paragraph (c)(4)(i) of this section, membersof the management team, business committee members, officers, and directorsare precluded from engaging in any outside employment or other businessinterests which conflict with the management of the concern or preventthe concern from achieving the objectives set forth in its business developmentplan. This is not intended to preclude participation in tribal or otheractivities which do not interfere with such individual's responsibilitiesin the operation of the applicant concern. (5) <T3>Location and economic benefit. </T3>The primary economic benefits fromthe concern must accrue to the tribe. A concern located on a designatedIndian reservation or on tribally-owned land will be presumed to providean economic benefit, such as employment, to the tribal community. SBA mayapprove a location not on tribally owned land, if the applicant concerncan demonstrate that similar economic benefits will accrue to the tribalcommunity. (6) <T3>Other eligibility criteria. </T3>A tribally-owned concern must alsomeet the eligibility criteria set forth in andSection;andSection; 124.107 through124.109. (d) <T3>Individual eligibility limitation. </T3>Once a tribally-owned concerncompletes its 8(a) program participation, those individuals upon whom eligibilitywas based pursuant to paragraph (c)(4) of this section shall be deemedto have used their eligibility to qualify a concern for the 8(a) program.They may use their eligibility again only to qualify up to a total of twotribally-owned concerns. (e) <T3>Existing section 8(a) firms. </T3>Tribally-owned concerns presentlyin the section 8(a) program must comply with the requirements of this sectionwithin 12 months from the effective date of these regulations. Failureto do so may result in the commencement of section 8(a) program terminationproceedings.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.113 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Concerns owned by Native Hawaiian organizations. </ITAG>Concerns owned by Native Hawaiian Organizations as defined in andSection;124.100(s) are eligible for participation in the 8(a) program and otherfederal programs requiring SBA to determine social and economic disadvantageas a condition of eligibility. Such concerns must meet all eligibilitycriteria set forth in andSection;andSection; 124.102 through 124.109 of thispart. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.201 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Processing applications. </ITAG>(a) The AA/MSBandamp;COD may take appropriate administrative actions to meetlegislative requirements, including limiting the size of the portfolioto be served. (b) Except as noted in paragraph (a) of this section, it is SBA's policythat an established or start-up business or an individual on behalf ofsuch business has the right to apply for 8(a) assistance, whether or notthere is an appearance of eligibility. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.202 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Place of filing. </ITAG>An application for admission is to be filed in the regional office of theDivision of Program Certification and Eligibility serving the territoryin which the principal place of business, as defined in andSection; 124.100(aa),is located. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.203 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Servicing office. </ITAG>Once approved, a Program Participant will be serviced in the field officeserving the territory in which the concern's principal place of business,as defined in andSection; 124.100(aa), is located. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.204 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicant representatives. </ITAG>An applicant concern may employ at its option outside representatives inconnection with an application for section 8(a) program participation.If the applicant chooses to employ outside representation such as an attorney,accountant, or others, the requirements of Part 103 of this title dealingwith the appearance and compensation of persons appearing before SBA areapplicable to the conduct of the representative. In addition, representationin proceedings before the Office of Hearings and Appeals shall be limitedas provided in andSection; 134.16 of this title. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.205 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Forms and documents required. </ITAG>Each 8(a) applicant concern must submit the forms and attachments theretorequired by the SBA when making application for admission to the section8(a) program. Such forms and attachments will include, but are not limitedto, financial statements and Federal personal and business tax returns.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.206 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Approval and decline of applications for 8(a) program admission. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>The AA/MSBandamp;COD is authorized to approve or declineapplications for admission to the 8(a) program. However, denials of programadmission based on his/her finding that the individual(s) claiming socialand economic disadvantage are not socially and/or economically disadvantagedand/or that such individual(s) does (do) not own and/or does (do) not controlthe applicant concern, may be appealed to SBA's Office of Hearings andAppeals (OHA). The Division of Program Certification and Eligibility (theDivision) will receive, review and evaluate all 8(a) applications. TheDivision will advise each program applicant within 15 days after the receiptof an application whether such application is complete and suitable forevaluation and, if not, what additional information or clarification isrequired to complete the application. SBA will process an application for8(a) program participation within 90 days of receipt by the Division ofa complete application package. Incomplete application packages will notbe processed. (b) <T3>Approval. </T3>If the AA/MSBandamp;COD finds that the applicant concernmeets all eligibility criteria, he/she shall issue an approval letter tothe concern. The date of the approval letter shall be the date of programcertification for purposes of determining the concern's Program Term pursuantto andSection; 124.110. A concern is not approved for participation in the8(a) program until an approval letter is sent by the AA/MSBandamp;COD tothe ccncern. Up until that event occurs, any new information which couldhave an adverse affect on the application may be considered by the AA/MSBandamp;COD.An applicant is not admitted to the 8(a) program, however, until the participationagreement is signed. (c) <T3>Decline. </T3>If the AA/MSBandamp;COD finds that an applicant concerndoes not meet all eligibility criteria, he/she will provide written notificationof this finding to the applicant in a letter of decline. The letter ofdecline shall set forth findings based on the facts and in accordance withlaw and regulations for every material issue relating to each eligibilityfactor with specific reasons for each finding. The letter of decline shallinform the applicant of its rights to request reconsideration of the AA/MSBandamp;COD'sdecision and/or to appeal such decision. (1) <T3>Reconsideration. </T3>Every applicant has the right to request thatthe AA/MSBandamp;COD reconsider his/her decline decision. Such request mustbe made in writing by certified mail, return receipt requested within 45days of the date of service of the decline letter. In support of the reconsiderationrequest, the applicant may submit in writing to the appropriate RegionalOffice of the Division any additional information and documentation pertinentto overcoming the reason(s) for the initial decline. If the concern requestsreconsideration, the AA/MSBandamp;COD will issue a written determinationon the reconsideration within 45 days of receipt of the request by theRegional Office of the Division which processed the original application.The Agency's eligibility analysis on reconsideration will consider alleligibility factors in light of all information then available to the Agency,and may approve the application, decline it for any of the same reasonscited in the initial decline or decline it for reasons not previously identified.If, on reconsideration, the AA/MSBandamp;COD finds that the applicant concernmeets all eligibility criteria, he/she shall issue an approval letter tothe concern. The date of the approval letter shall be the date of programcertification for purposes of determining the concern's Program Term pursuantto andSection; 124.110. If, on reconsideration, the AA/MSBandamp;COD determinesthat the concern does not meet all eligibility criteria, he/she will notifythe applicant of this decision by letter. Such letter shall set forth findingsbased on the facts and in accordance with law and regulations for everymaterial issue relating to each eligibility factor with specific reasonsfor each finding. If the concern is being declined solely for reasons notidentified in the initial decline, the concern will be advised that SBAwill treat the decline as an initial decline, and that the concern willbe afforded all rights which were available to it on its initial decline.(2) <T3>Appeal. </T3>An unsuccessful applicant will have the right to appealits decline to OHA if the application is denied based solely on a negativefinding of one or more of the following criteria: social disadvantage,economic disadvantage, ownership or control. The applicant, at its option,may bring such appeal either after the initial decline or after a declineon reconsideration. Petitions of appeal must conform to the requirementsof andSection; 124.210 and will be handled in accordance with the procedurescontained in andSection; 124.210 and Part 134. (3) <T3>Final agency decision. </T3>If a declined applicant does not requestreconsideration of the decline or, if eligible under paragraph (c)(2) ofthis section, a declined applicant does not file an appeal with OHA within45 days of the date of service of the decline letter, the determinationof the AA/MSBandamp;COD will become the final Agency decision. If the applicationis denied on reconsideration and the applicant does not have the rightto appeal the denial under paragraph (c)(2) of this section, the decisionof the AA/MSBandamp;COD is the final Agency decision. If the applicant isentitled under paragraph (c)(2) of this section to an appeal, and exercisesthat right, the decision of the Administrative Law Judge shall be the finalAgency decision.(4) <T3>Reapplication for program participation. </T3>A concern which has beendeclined for 8(a) program admission may reapply for admission to the program12 months after the date of the final Agency decision to decline. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.207</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Program exit. </ITAG>A concern participating in the 8(a) program may leave the program by anyof the following means: (a) Voluntary withdrawal. (b) Expiration of the Program Term allowed by andSection; 124.110; (c) Graduation pursuant to the provisions of andSection; 124.208; (d) Termination pursuant to the provisions of andSection; 124.209. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.208</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Program graduation.</ITAG> (a) <T3>General. </T3>When an 8(a) concern is recognized as successfully completingthe 8(a) program by substantially achieving the targets, objectives andgoals set forth in its business plan prior to the expiration of its programterm, and has demonstrated the ability to compete in the marketplace withoutassistance under the 8(a) program, its participation within the programshall be determined by SBA to be completed and the firm shall be graduatedfrom the program. (b) <T3>Graduation criteria. </T3>In determining whether a concern has substantiallyachieved the goals and objectives of its business plan and has attainedthe ability to compete in the marketplace without 8(a) program assistance,the following factors, among others, shall be considered by SBA. (1) Positive overall financial trends, including but not limited to: (i) Profitability; (ii) Sales, including improved ratio of non-8(a) sales to 8(a) sales; (iii) Net worth, financial ratios, working capital, capitalization, accessto credit and capital; (iv) Ability to obtain bonding; (v) A positive comparison of the 8(a) concern's business and financialprofile with profiles of non-8(a) businesses in the same area or similarbusiness category; and (vi) Good management capacity and capability. (c) <T3>Graduation procedures_</T3>(1) <T3>Letter of notification. </T3>Upon determination by the SBA pursuantto paragraph (b) of this section that an 8(a) concern should be graduatedfrom the 8(a) program, SBA shall notify the Participant in writing of itsintent to graduate in a letter of notification. The letter of notificationshall set forth findings, based on the facts and in accordance with lawand regulations, for every material issue relating to the basis of theprogram graduation with specific reasons for each finding. The letter ofnotification shall also provide the Participant 45 days from the date ofservice of the letter to submit in writing information which would explainwhy the proposed basis of graduation is not warranted. (2) <T3>Second letter of notification. </T3>After the 45 day response periodhas elapsed, the Division shall consider the proposed graduation, includinginformation submitted by the Participant, if any. As appropriate, the Divisionshall notify the Participant that it will not recommend program graduationor that, despite the information that may have been provided, the basisfor graduation continues to exist and that he/she intends to recommendto the AA/MSBandamp;COD that the Participant be graduated. In instances wheregraduation will be recommended, the Division Director shall further notifythe Participant that it will have a 45 day period from the date of serviceof the second letter of notification to submit to SBA such further informationwhich would explain why the proposed graduation is not justified. (3) <T3>Recommendation of the Division. </T3>Following the 45 day responseperiod, the Division Director will consider the facts of the proposed graduation,including all information submitted by the Participant. If the DivisionDirector determines that graduation is not appropriate, he/she will sonotify the Participant within 15 days of the close of the response period.If the Division Director determines that graduation is appropriate, he/shewill recommend in writing to the AA/MSBandamp;COD, within 15 days of theclose of the response period, that the Participant be graduated. (4) <T3>Decision of the AA/MSBandamp;COD. </T3>Upon the recommendation of theDivision Director, the AA/MSBandamp;COD will consider the proposed graduationand the written record supporting it. If the AA/MSBandamp;COD determinesthat program graduation is warranted, he/she will issue a Notice of ProgramGraduation to the Participant. If not, he/she will so notify the Participant.(5) <T3>Notice requirements. </T3>A Notice of Program Graduation shall conformto the form, filing and service requirements of Part 134 of this Title,under which the appeal proceeding shall be conducted. The Notice of ProgramGraduation shall set forth findings, based on the facts and in accordancewith law and regulations, for every material issue relating to the basisof the program graduation with specific reasons for each finding. The Noticeof Program Graduation shall also advise the Program Participant that itmay avail itself of an opportunity for an appeal by filing a petition inaccordance with the provisions of andSection; 124.210 and Part 134 of thistitle. (6) <T3>Appeal to Office of Hearings and Appeals. </T3>Procedures governingappeals of program graduation to the Office of Hearings and Appeals areset forth in andSection; 124.210 and Part 134. (d) <T3>Post graduation. </T3>After the effective date of a program graduationas provided for herein, an 8(a) concern is no longer eligible to receiveany 8(a) program assistance. Such concern is obligated to complete previouslyawarded 8(a) subcontracts, however. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.209</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Program termination. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Participation of a section 8(a) business concern in thesection 8(a) program may be terminated by SBA prior to the expiration ofthe concern's Program Term for good cause. Examples of good cause include,but are not limited to, the following: (1) Failure by the concern to continue to maintain its eligibility forprogram participation. (2) Failure by the concern to maintain its status as a small business underthe Small Business Act, as amended, and the regulations promulgated thereunder.<T3>See </T3>andSection; 124.102. (3) Failure by the concern for any reason, including the death of an individualupon whom eligibility was based, to maintain ownership, full-time day-to-daymanagement, and control by the person(s) who has (have) been determinedto be socially and economically disadvantaged pursuant to these regulations.(4) Failure by the concern to obtain written approval from SBA any changesin ownership, management or control pursuant to andSection;andSection; 124.103and 124.104. (5) Failure by the concern to disclose to SBA the extent to which nondisadvantagedpersons or firms participate in the management of the section 8(a) businessconcern. (6) A demonstrated pattern of failing to make required submissions or responsesto the Administration in a timely manner, including: (i) Failure by the concern to provide SBA with required quarterly or annualfinancial statements within 90 days of the close of the reporting period,or required audited financial statements within 180 days of the close ofthe reporting period. Failure to provide SBA with requested tax returns,reports, or other available data within 30 days of the date of request.(ii) Failure by the concern to submit an updated business plan within 30days of receipt of request, without an extension of time which has beenapproved by SBA. (iii) Failure by the concern to provide documents or certifications ofcontinuing eligibility or otherwise respond to requests for informationrelating to the section 8(a) program from SBA or other authorized governmentofficials within the time frames provided for in the requests. (7) Cessation of business operations by the concern. (8) Failure by the concern to achieve the goals cited in its original ormodified business plan as a result of repeated refusals to accept or utilizeSBA assistance. (9) Failure by the concern to pursue competitive and commercial businessin accordance with the business plan, or failure to make reasonable effortsto achieve competitive status. (10) Failure by the concern to engage in business practices that will promoteits competitiveness within a reasonable period of time as evidenced by,among other indicators, a pattern of inadequate performance or unjustifieddelinquent performance or terminations for default with respect to contractsawarded under the authority of section 8(a).(11) A pattern of inadequate performance of awarded section 8(a) procurementsubcontracts by the concern. (12) Failure by the concern to pay or repay significant financial obligationsowed to the Federal Government. (13) Failure by the concern to obtain and keep current any and all requiredpermits, licenses, and charters. (14) Diversion of funds or other assets from the section 8(a) businessconcern for the personal benefit of its disadvantaged owners or any personor entity affiliated with such owners which is detrimental to the achievementof the targets, objectives, and goals contained in such Program Participant'sbusiness plan. (15) Unauthorized use of business development expense funds and/or advancepayment funds and/or SBA direct, guaranty or immediate participation loanproceeds; or violation of an advance payment, business development expenseagreement, or loan agreement. (16) Failure by the concern to obtain prior SBA approval of any managementagreement, joint venture agreement or other agreement relative to the performanceof a section 8(a) subcontract. Violation of any requirement of a management,joint venture, or other agreement approved by SBA by either the section8(a) concern or one of the joint venturers. (17) Failure by the concern to obtain approval from SBA before subcontractingunder a section 8(a) subcontract, or failure by the concern to abide byany conditions imposed by SBA upon such approval. (18) Violation by the concern of a section 8(a) subcontract provision whichprohibits contingent fees and gratuities; or failure to disclose to SBAfees paid or to be paid, or costs incurred or committed to third parties,directly or indirectly, in the process of obtaining section 8(a) contractsor subcontracts. (19) Knowing submission of false information to SBA on behalf of a section8(a) business concern by its principals, officers, or agents, or by itsemployees, where the principal(s) of the section 8(a) concern knows orshould have known such submission to be false. (20) Debarment, suspension, voluntary exclusion, or ineligibility of theconcern or its principals pursuant to 13 CFR Part 145, FAR Subpart 9.4,48 CFR Ch. 1, and 48 CFR Ch. 22, or any successor regulation. (21) Conviction of the concern or the individual(s) upon whom 8(a) programeligibility is based for any offense indicating a lack of business integrityincluding but not limited to: (i) Commission of a criminal offense as an incident to obtaining or attemptingto obtain a public or private contract, or subcontract thereunder, or inthe performance of such contract or subcontract; (ii) Violation of the Organized Crime Control Act of 1970 (Pub. L. 91-452;84 Stat. 922); (iii) Embezzlement, theft, forgery, bribery, falsification or destructionof records, receiving stolen property, or any other offense indicatinga lack of business integrity or business honesty which seriously and directlyaffects the question of present responsibility as a government contractor;(iv) Violation of any Federal antitrust statute; or (v) Commission of any felony not specifically listed above. (vi) Violation of section 16 of the Small Business Act, (15 U.S.C. 645).(22) Conviction of a nondisadvantaged owner or officer of the concern forany offense described in paragraph (a)(21) of this section, provided thatone or more disadvantaged owners or officers of the concern abetted, conspiredwith or otherwise acquiesced in the owner's or officer's commission ofthe offense. (23) Willful failure on behalf of an 8(a) business concern to comply withapplicable labor standards and obligations. (24) Violation of any terms and conditions of the 8(a) Program ParticipationAgreement. (25) Willful violation by an 8(a) business concern, or any of its principals,of any rule or regulation of the Administration pertaining to materialissues. (b) <T3>Termination procedures</T3>_(1) <T3>Letter of notification.</T3> When SBA determines that grounds existto terminate a concern's participation in the 8(a) program pursuant tothis section, SBA shall notify the Participant in writing of its intentto terminate in a letter of notification. The letter of notification shallset forth findings, based on the facts and in accordance with law and regulations,for every material issue relating to the grounds upon which such terminationwould be based with specific reasons for each finding. The letter of notificationshall provide the Participant 45 days from the date of service of the letterto submit in writing information which would eliminate the ground(s) fortermination or would explain why the proposed ground(s) should not justifytermination. (2) <T3>Second letter of notification. </T3>After the 45-day response periodhas elapsed, the Division shall consider the proposed termination, includinginformation submitted by the Participant, if any. The Division shall notifythe Participant that the grounds for proposed termination have been eliminatedor that, despite the information that may have been provided, some or allof the grounds for termination continue to exist. Where appropriate, theDivision Director shall further notify the Participant that he/she intendsto recommend to the AA/MSBandamp;COD that the Participant be terminated fromthe program, and that, within 45 days of the date of service of the secondletter of notification, the Participant may submit to SBA such furtherinformation as would eliminate the ground(s) for termination or would explainwhy the proposed ground(s) should not justify termination.(3) <T3>Recommendation of the Division. </T3>Following the 45 day responseperiod, the Division Director will have 15 days to consider the facts ofthe proposed termination, including all information submitted by the Participantand to notify the Participant of his/her recommendation to the AA/MSBandamp;COD.If the grounds for proposed termination continue to exist, the DivisionDirector will recommend in writing to the AA/MSBandamp;COD that the Participantbe terminated. (4) <T3>Decision of the AA/MSBandamp;COD. </T3>Upon the recommendation of theDivision Director, the AA/MSBandamp;COD will consider the proposed terminationand the written record supporting it. If the AA/MSBandamp;COD determinesthat a termination is warranted, he/ she will issue a Notice of Terminationto the Participant. If not, he/she will so notify the Participant. (5) <T3>Notice requirements. </T3>A Notice of Termination shall conform tothe form, filing and service requirements of Part 134 of this title, underwhich the appeal proceeding shall be conducted. The Notice of Terminationshall set forth findings, based on the facts and in accordance with lawand regulations, for every material issue relating to the grounds uponwhich the termination is based. The Notice of Termination shall also advisethe Program Participant that it may avail itself of an opportunity foran appeal by filing a petition in accordance with the provisions of andSection;124.210 and Part 134 of this title. (6) <T3>Appeal to Office of Hearings and Appeal. </T3>Procedures governingappeals of program termination to the Office of Hearings and Appeals areset forth in andSection; 124.210 and Part 134 of this title. (c) <T3>Post termination. </T3>After the effective date of a program termination,a section 8(a) business concern is no longer eligible to receive any section8(a) program assistance. Such concern is obligated to complete previouslyawarded section 8(a) subcontracts (see andSection; 124.211 for Program Suspension).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.210 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Appeals to SBA's Office of Hearings and Appeals. </ITAG>(a) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this section, an applicant concernor Program Participant shall be afforded the opportunity to appeal anyof the following Agency determinations: (1) Denial of program admission based solely on a negative finding(s) ofsocial disadvantage, economic disadvantage, ownership or control pursuantto andSection; 124.206; (2) Graduation pursuant to andSection; 124.208; (3) Termination pursuant to andSection; 124.209; or, (4) Denial of a request to issue a waiver pursuant to andSection; 124.317.(b) The applicant or Participant concern may initiate such appeal by filinga petition in accordance with Part 134 of this title with SBA's Officeof Hearings and Appeals (OHA) within 45 days of the date of service ofthe final Agency determination pursuant to paragraph (a) of this section.In addition to the requirements of andSection; 134.11(a), the petition shallstate, with specific reference to the determination and the record supportingsuch determination, the reasons why the determination is alleged to bearbitrary, capricious or contrary to law. Concurrent with its filing withOHA, the concern shall also serve the AA/MSBandamp;COD with a copy of thepetition, including all attachments. (c) Appeal proceedings brought under the authority of this section shallbe conducted by an Administrative Law Judge. (d) The Administrative Law Judge selected to preside over an appeal shalldecline to accept jurisdiction over any matter if: (1) The appeal does not, on its face, allege facts that, if proven to betrue, would warrant reversal or modification of the determination, includingappeals of proposed denials of 8(a) program admission which have been basedin whole or in part on grounds other than a negative finding of socialdisadvantage, economic disadvantage, ownership or control; (2) The appeal is untimely filed under andSection; 134.12 or is not otherwisefiled in accordance with the requirements of this section and the rulesof procedure set forth in Part 134 of this title; or (3) The matter has been decided or is the subject of an adjudication beforea court of competent jurisdiction over such matters. (e) Once the Administrative Law Judge accepts jurisdiction over an appeal,subsequent initiation of an adjudication of the matter by a court of competentjurisdiction will not preclude the Administrative Law Judge from renderinga final decision on the matter. (f) Proceedings conducted under the authority of this section shall beconducted in accordance with the provisions of this section and Part 134of this title. (g) Unless it is established that the convenience and necessity of theparties requires otherwise, in the sole discretion of the AdministrativeLaw Judge, any oral hearing conducted with respect to an appeal pursuantto paragraph (a) of this section shall be held in the Washington, DC area.(h) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (h)(3) of this section, any proceedingconducted under the authority of paragraph (a) of this section shall bedecided solely on a review of the written administrative record. The determinationby the AA/MSBandamp;COD or a designee for matters related to paragraphs (a)(1),(a)(2), and (a)(3) of this section, and the determination by the Administratorfor matters related to paragraph (a)(4) of this section, shall be sustainedunless such determination is found to be arbitrary, capricious, or contraryto law. (2) If the Administrative Law Judge determines that, due to the absencein the written administrative record of the reasons upon which the determinationin question was based, such administrative record is insufficiently completeto decide whether the determination is arbitrary and capricious or contraryto law, the case shall be remanded by the Administrative Law Judge to theAA/MSBandamp;COD for further consideration in accordance with the terms ofsuch remand. Such remand shall be for a period of no more than 10 workingdays. The ALJ shall retain jurisdiction of the matter during such periodas the matter is on remand. (3) (i) Neither the admission of evidence beyond the written administrativerecord, nor any form of discovery, will be permitted in proceedings underthis section unless it is first determined by the Administrative Law Judgethat the applicant concern or Participant, upon written submission, hasmade a substantial showing, based upon credible evidence, and not mereallegation, that the Agency determination in question may have resultedfrom bad faith or improper behavior. Prior to any such determination, theAgency shall be afforded an opportunity to respond in writing to the submissionof the applicant concern or Participant. Upon a determination by the AdministrativeLaw Judge that the applicant concern or Participant has made such a substantialshowing, the Administrative Law Judge may permit appropriate discovery,and accept relevant evidence beyond the written administrative record,which is specifically limited to the alleged bad faith or improper behaviorasserted by the applicant concern or Participant. (ii) A determination by the Administrative Law Judge that the requiredshowing set forth in paragraph (h)(3)(i) of this section has been madedoes not shift the burden of proof, which continues to rest with the applicantconcern or the Participant. (i) A decision rendered by the Administrative Law Judge under the authorityof this section shall be the final decision of the Administration and shallbe binding upon the parties and those within the employ of the Administration.(j) Such decision shall be rendered, insofar as practicable, within ninetydays after a petition for appeal is filed, and, in the event such 90-daytime limit has not been met, the Administrative Law Judge shall indicatethe reason therefor in the decision, when issued.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.211 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Suspension of program assistance. </ITAG>(a) Upon the issuance of a Notice of Termination, SBA may suspend contractsupport and all other forms of 8(a) program assistance to that concernfor a period of time not to exceed the time necessary to resolve the issueof the concern's termination from the program under the procedures setforth in andSection; 124.209 and in Part 134 of this title. The institutionof such a suspension will not occur in conjunction with each proposed termination,but will only occur when SBA determines that suspension of the concern'sprogram participation is in the best interests of the Government. For example,SBA will generally find that it is in the best interests of the Governmentto suspend a Participant where the  proposed termination is based on fraudor the submission of false statements or program ineligibility. (b) Immediately upon SBA's determination to suspend a section 8(a) concern,SBA will furnish that concern with a Notice of Suspension by certifiedmail, return receipt requested, to the last known address of the concern.If no receipt is returned within ten calendar days from the mailing ofthe notice, notice will be presumed to have occurred as of that time. TheNotice of Suspension will provide the following information: (1) The reason(s) for the suspension, which will be the grounds upon whichthe Notice of Termination has been issued; (2) A statement that the suspension will continue pending the completionof further investigation or the termination proceeding or some other specifiedperiod of time; (3) Notice that awards of competitive and non-competitive section 8(a)subcontracts, including those which have been ``self-marketed'' by an 8(a)concern, will not be made during the pendency of the suspension unlessit is determined by the head of the relevant procuring agency or his/herauthorized representative to be in the best interest of the Governmentto do so, <T3>and </T3>SBA adopts that determination; (4) Notice that the concern is obligated to complete previously awardedsection 8(a) subcontracts; (5) Notice that the suspension is effective nationally throughout the SBA; (6) A statement that a request for a hearing on the suspension will beconsidered by an Administrative Law Judge in SBA's Office of Hearings andAppeals (OHA), and granted or denied as a matter of his/her discretion.(7) A statement that the firm's program term is suspended effective thedate of the suspension and that it will resume only if the concern's participationin the program is not terminated. (c) It is contemplated that in most cases a hearing on the issue of thesuspension will be afforded if the Participant requests one. However, nohearing shall be granted if the suspension is based upon advice from eitherthe Department of Justice or the Department of Labor that such a hearingwould prejudice substantial interests of the Government. (d) The applicant concern may appeal a Notice of Suspension by filing apetition in accordance with Part 134 of this title with OHA within 30 daysof the date of service of a Notice of Suspension to paragraph (b) of thissection. Concurrent with its filing with OHA, the concern shall also servethe AA/MSBandamp;COD with a copy of the petition including all attachments.(e) A request for a hearing on the suspension will be considered by anAdministrative Law Judge in OHA, and granted as a matter of his/her discretion. (f) Proceedings conducted under the authority of this section shall beconducted in accordance with the provisions of this section and Part 134of this title. (g) For any oral hearing convened pursuant to andSection; 134.19 of thistitle resulting from a request filed in accordance with this section, theAdministrative Law Judge shall give due regard to the convenience and necessityof the parties or their authorized representatives in designating the placeof the oral hearing. (h) A hearing on the suspension will commence as soon as possible followingthe decision of the Administrative Law Judge to grant a request, but inno case more than 20 calendar days after the Administrative Law Judge'sruling if the request is granted. (i) At the close of such suspension hearing, the Administrative Law Judgeshall issue a decision upholding or lifting the suspension. The decisionof the Administrative Law Judge shall be the final Agency decision. (j) Any program suspension which occurs in accordance with these regulationswill continue in effect until such time as the SBA lifts the suspensionor the section 8(a) business concern's participation in the program isfully terminated. If all program assistance to a section 8(a) businessconcern  has been suspended under these regulations and the concern's participationin the program is not terminated, the suspension will be lifted and theProgram Term remaining as of the effective date of Program Suspension willbe restored to the concern. However, nothing in this paragraph precludesSBA from initiating termination, graduation or suspension proceedings atany time during the concern's Program Term. (k) SBA does not recognize the concept of de facto suspension. Reinstatementof the remaining portion of a Program Term will occur only where a concern'sprogram participation has been formally suspended by SBA in accordancewith the procedures set forth in this section. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.300</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Business development. </ITAG>The regulations at andSection; 124.301 through andSection; 124.320 addressthe provision of various forms of assistance to 8(a) Program Participantsto promote the business development of such concerns. Such assistance includesfinancial, management and technical assistance, and contract support. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.301 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Development of business plan. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>In order to assist the SBA in determining the businessdevelopment needs of each 8(a) Program Participant, each such Participantshall develop a comprehensive business  plan, setting forth the Participant'sbusiness targets, objectives, and goals. The business plan shall be submittedto the SBA servicing field office in final form within 30 days after theParticipant's receipt of notice of certification to participate in the8(a) program. The Participant will not be eligible for 8(a) contracts untilthe SBA approves its business plan. The approved business plan will constitutethe Participant's short and long term goals and the strategy for developmentalgrowth to the point of economic survival independent of the 8(a) program.(b) <T3>Standard Industrial Classification (SIC) code designations. </T3>Theconcern's primary industry classification as defined in andSection; 124.100and all related secondary Standard Industrial Classification (SIC) codedesignations will be stated in an 8(a) concern's original business planand will be subject to change thereafter only if the conditions of andSection;124.302(c) are met. Once admitted to the 8(a) program, a concern will onlybe permitted to perform 8(a) contracts which are classified under approvedSIC codes which appear in its business plan. An 8(a) concern may receiveFederal contracts classified under SIC codes not contained in its businessplan, provided it is qualified, under authority other than section 8(a)of the Small Business Act. (c) <T3>Contents of business plan. </T3>The initial business plan shall containat least the following: (1) An analysis of market potential, competitive environment, and otherbusiness analyses estimating the Program Participant's prospects for profitableoperations during the term of program participation and after graduation;(2) An analysis of the Program Participant's strengths and weaknesses,with particular attention paid to the means of correcting any financial,managerial, technical, or labor conditions which could impede the Participantfrom receiving contracts other than those awarded through the 8(a) program;(3) Specific targets, objectives, and goals for the business developmentof the Participant during the next two years, utilizing the results ofthe analyses conducted pursuant to paragraphs (c)(1) and (c)(2) of thissection; (4) Estimates of contract awards pursuant to section 8(a) and from othersources which would be needed by the Participant to meet the specific targets,objectives and goals for the years covered by the business plan; and (5) Such other information as SBA may require. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.302</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Review and modification of business plan. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Annual review. </T3>Each Participant shall annually review its currentlyapproved business plan with the Business Opportunity Specialist (BOS) andshall modify such plan as may be appropriate. Any modified plan shall besubmitted to the BOS for approval. A currently approved plan shall be consideredthe applicable plan for all program purposes until the SBA approves inwriting a modified plan. SBA shall establish an anniversary date for reviewof the Participant's business plan and contract support forecasts. Theannual review of a Participant's business plan will generally occur within15 working days before or after the anniversary of the firm's certificationof 8(a) eligibility. (b) <T3>Contract support forecast. </T3>Each Participant shall annually forecastin writing its needs for contract awards for the next program year andthe succeeding program year during the review of its business plan conductedunder paragraph (a) of this section. Such forecast shall be included inthe Participant's business plan. The forecast shall include: (1) The aggregate dollar value of contract support to be sought under section8(a) (sole source and competitive), reflecting compliance with the businessmix requirements of andSection; 124.312; (2) The aggregate dollar value of non-8(a) contracts to be sought; (3) The types of contract opportunities being sought, identified by theappropriate Standard Industrial Classification (SIC) code; and (4) Such other information as may be requested by the SBA to aid in providingeffective business development assistance to the Participant. (c) <T3>Changes in SIC code designations. </T3>Requests for changes in SICcode designations stated in a business plan may be approved only by theappropriate Regional Administrator or his/her designee, and only if: (1)(i) The requested SIC code is related to the primary industry of the8(a) concern and represents a logical business progression for the concern;(ii) The 8(a) concern has demonstrated capacity and capability to performin the requested SIC code; and (iii) Other applicable eligibility criteria (Walsh-Healey Act, the non-manufacturerrule, size rules, etc.) appear to be met; or (2) SBA erred in omitting a previously requested SIC code, improperly classifyinga business industry or making a typographical or other error in its letterof approval to the 8(a) concern. (d) <T3>Transition management plan. </T3>Beginning in the first year of thetransitional stage of program participation under andSection; 124.303, eachParticipant shall annually submit for inclusion in its business plan atransition management plan outlining specific steps to promote profitablebusiness operations after graduation. The transition management plan shouldbe submitted to the BOS at the same time other modifications are submittedpursuant to the annual review under paragraph (a) of this section. Suchplan shall set forth the same information as required under paragraph (b)of this section for the initial plan, incorporate the competitive mix requirementsof andSection; 124.312, and provide specific transition steps the Participantwill take to continue its business development after the expiration ofits Program Term. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.303</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Stages of 8(a) program participation. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Genera1. </T3>General program participation is divided into two stages_adevelopmental stage and a transitional stage. The developmental stage shallbe 4 years and the transitional stage shall be 5 years unless the Participanthas exited the program by one of the means set forth in andSection; 124.112.The developmental stage is designed to assist Participants to overcomeeconomic disadvantage by providing such assistance as may be necessaryand appropriate to enable them to access relevant markets and strengthentheir financial and managerial skills. The transitional stage of programparticipation is designed to assist Participants to overcome, insofar aspracticable, the remaining elements of economic disadvantage and to prepareParticipants for leaving the 8(a) program. (b) <T3>Developmental stage of program participation. </T3>A Program Participant,if otherwise eligible, shall be qualified to receive the following assistanceduring the developmental stage of program participation: (1) Sole source and competitive 8(a) contract support; (2) Financial assistance pursuant to andSection; 122.57 of this title; (3) Pursuant to andSection; 124.304, a maximum of two exemptions from therequirements of section 1(a) of the Walsh-Healey Act, 41 U.S.C. 35(a);(4) Pursuant to andSection; 124.305, a maximum of five exemptions from therequirements of the Miller Act, 40 U.S.C. 270a to 270d, that performancebonds be issued for the protection of the United States and payment bondsbe issued for the protection of persons furnishing material and labor forthe construction, alteration, or repair of public buildings or public works;(5) Pursuant to andSection; 124.306, financial assistance from SBA for skillstraining or upgrading for employees or potential employees of Program Participants;(6) The transfer of technology or surplus property owned by the UnitedStates to Program Participants by grant, license, or sale. Technology orproperty transferred pursuant to this paragraph must be used by the Participantduring the normal conduct of its business operation and cannot be soldor transferred to any other party (other than the Government) during suchconcern's Program Term and for one year thereafter. A Participant mustagree to these conditions prior to any transfer of technology or property;and (7) Training sessions to assist individuals and enterprises eligible toreceive 8(a) contracts in the development of business principles and strategiesto enhance their ability to compete successfully for contracts in the marketplace.(c) <T3>Transitional stage of program participation. </T3> A Program Participant,if otherwise eligible, shall be qualified to receive the following assistanceduring the transitional stage of program participation: (1) The same assistance as that provided to Participants in the developmentalstage under paragraphs (b)(1), (b)(2), (b)(6) and (b)(7) of this section;(2) Training and technical assistance in transitional business planning.(3) Assistance from procuring agencies (in cooperation with SBA) in formingjoint ventures, leader-follower arrangements, and teaming agreements betweenthe Participant and other Program Participants or other business concerns,in accordance with all applicable statutes and regulations, with respectto contracting opportunities for research, development, fullscale engineeringor production of major systems. In the case of a requirement to be procuredas a small business set-aside, a small disadvantaged business set-aside,or through the 8(a) program, applicable size regulations will apply indetermining whether the cooperative venture between a Participant and anotherbusiness entity qualifies as a small business concern; and <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.304 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Statutory exemption from the Walsh-Healey Act. </ITAG>(a) SBA is authorized to grant Program Participants in the developmentalstage of participation a maximum of two exemptions from the requirementsof section 1(a) of the Walsh-Healey Act, 41 U.S.C. 35(a). These exemptionsapply only to specific 8(a) contracts with anticipated contract valuesunder $10,000,000 (including options) and shall be used only to allow forcontingent agreements by a Participant to acquire the machinery, equipment,facilities, or labor needed to perform such contracts. An exemption maybe granted only where such exemption is needed to permit the firm to performa contract which is consistent with the business development goals setforth in its approved business plan and SBA determines that the Participantis fully capable of performing the contract. SBA must be provided witha copy of the intended contingent agreement for its review prior to grantingan exemption. (b) The exemptions described in this section are authorized only untilOctober 1, 1992. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.305 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Statutory exemption from Miller Act bonds. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Policy. </T3>Subject to the conditions contained in this section, SBAmay exempt an 8(a) Participant in the developmental stage of program participationfrom any payment and performance bonds required by the Miller Act, 40 U.S.C.270a-270d, for, and in connection with, any 8(a) construction contractwhenever it is determined by SBA that the 8(a) concern is unable to obtainthe requisite bond(s) from a surety for the performance of the 8(a) contract.The exercise of this authority by SBA is subject to the conditions setforth below. (b) <T3>Conditions for SBA exemption of bonding requirements. </T3>In orderto be eligible to obtain an exemption from the bonds required by the MillerAct, the following requirements must be met: (1) The Program Participant must have been engaged in construction activitiesfor a period of at least two years; (2) SBA must find that the concern is otherwise eligible to receive a specific8(a) construction contract, but is unable to obtain the requisite bond(s)required by the Miller Act for the performance of the contract; (3) SBA must find, based on information supplied by the Participant, thatthe Participant cannot secure, either with or without an SBA surety bondguarantee, the bonds required for the contract from a corporate surety;and (4) SBA must determine that the firm has the potential to become bondableif assisted by the bond waiver. (c) <T3>Limitations. </T3>(1) The maximum dollar value of an 8(a) contracton which a bond requirement can be exempted is $3,000,000 (including options).(2) In no event shall the above exemption be construed to make SBA liableto the procuring agency, 8(a) concern or any supplier, subcontractor, laboreror others for contractual obligations entered into by the 8(a) concernunder the 8(a) contract to which the exemption applies.(3) No Participant may receive more than one exemption to the Miller Actat any point in time, unless approved in writing by the Regional Administratoror his/her designee. (4) No Participant may receive more than a total of five exemptions underthis section. Where a Participant receives an exemption for a procurementhaving a base year and one or more option years, the exercise of an optiondoes not count as an additional exemption (i.e., an exemption on such acontract counts as one exemption, not one for the base year and one foreach of the option years exercised). (5) A bond exemption shall not be granted where a contract for which aParticipant has previously received such an exemption has been terminatedfor default. (6) In order to be eligible for a bond exemption, a Participant must demonstratethat it has been denied a bond for the performance of the requirement byat least three sureties, at least one of which is a corporate surety. (d) <T3>Protection of third parties.</T3> (1) The 8(a) contract must containspecial clauses indicating that: (i) The 8(a) contractor will make timely payment to all persons furnishingmaterials or labor to the 8(a) concern in the performance of the contract;(ii) There must be established a special bank account in an institutioninsured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC), into whichthe procuring agency will deposit all payments relating to the performanceof the contract; and (iii) All disbursements from the special bank account shall be subjectto the approval and counter signature by SBA or a third party approvedby SBA. (This requirement for a controlled account will be satisfied ifSBA makes an advance payment to the Participant pursuant to andSection; 124.401of these regulations and a special bank account is established in connectiontherewith.) (2) The 8(a) contractor must notify persons supplying it with materialsor labor that the contract is exempt from the Miller Act's bonding requirementand must also notify such suppliers that SBA will not be liable for paymentfor materials or labor. The 8(a) contractor must obtain a written acknowledgmentof such notification from each supplier of materials or labor, and suchacknowledgment(s) must, where practicable, be in SBA's possession priorto award of the contract and payment of invoices. (e) <T3>Procedure for obtaining a bond exemption.</T3> (1) A Program Participantwhich seeks a bond exemption under this section may submit a written requestto the applicable SBA servicing field office. (2) Upon receipt of the request, SBA shall notify the Participant of supportingdocumentation that must be submitted in order to process the exemptionrequest. (3) If SBA preliminarily determines that a bond waiver is appropriate,SBA shall contact the procuring agency, prior to acceptance of the offer,and obtain its written views with respect to the bond exemption. (4) The views and concerns of the procuring agency will be heavily weighedin determining whether to grant a bond exemption. (5) If the procuring agency does not concur with the bond exemption andSBA accedes to the procuring agency's concerns, SBA may accept the offerfor another 8(a) concern. (f) <T3>Expiration date. </T3>The exemptions described in this section areauthorized only until October 1, 1992. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.306</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Financial assistance for skills training. </ITAG>(a) SBA may pay in whole or in part the costs of training or upgradingof employees or potential employees of 8(a) concerns. An owner participatingin the day-to-day management of a Participant may be considered as an employeefor purposes of this section. Payments will be made to training providerspursuant to appropriate agreements. (b) SBA assistance under this section is subject to the following conditionsand requirements: (1) The concern must be in the developmental stage of program participation.(2) The 8(a) concern must document that it has explored the use of existingcost-free or cost-subsidized training programs offered by public and privatesector agencies working with programs of employment and training and economicdevelopment and that no such programs are available or are capable of meetingthe training needs of the Participant. (3) The concern must be current with any reporting requirements establishedby SBA for ongoing program participation. (4) The employee receiving the training or upgrading may not be a beneficiaryof any other publicly or privately funded training program which benefitsthe trainee or upgraded employee for the same activity SBA is compensatingunder this section. (5) The training provider must be an institution of higher education, acommunity or vocational college, or an institution eligible to provideskills training under the Job Training Partnership Act (29 U.S.C. 1501<T3>et seq.</T3>). (6) The training provider may not be debarred or suspended from any Federalprograms. (7) The training of employees or potential employees of a concern mustbe consistent with the concern's approved business plan. (8) SBA must approve the training in writing prior to its commencement.(9) No more than five employees or potential employees of a single 8(a)concern may be recipients of benefits under this section at one time. (10) The length of training or skills upgrading financed under this sectionmay be no less than one month nor more than six months. (11) The training or skills upgrading assistance must be of a type whichwill offer genuine capacity development for the employing firm. (12) No more than $2,500 shall be made available for any one employee orpotential employee. (c) SBA's allocation of resources appropriated for the purposes of thissection shall generally be based on the identification of needs of developmentalstage concerns. SBA shall evaluate training needs in the annual businessplan review process, and may conduct other surveys as appropriate. (d) Projects to be funded under this section shall be initiated by a proposalprepared by the 8(a) concern and submitted to SBA. (e) Assistance under this section will be made only when the agreementsentered into by SBA to fund training or upgrading contain acceptable trainingand upgrading standards and acceptable monitoring standards and requirementsto insure the integrity and effectiveness of the training or upgrading.(f) The Participant must give adequate assurance that it will employ thetrainee or upgraded employee for at least six months after the trainingor upgrading financed pursuant to this section has been completed. Traineesand upgraded employees must provide a similar assurance that they willremain in the employ of the 8(a) firm for such six-month period. Such assurancewill consist of an appropriate written employment agreement. If a traineeor upgraded employee does not remain in the employ of the Participant forat least six months after receiving such SBA-financed training or upgrading,the violating party must reimburse SBA for the amount expended togetherwith any reasonable interest and costs incurred for collection. In addition,the violating party, whether it is the Participant, individual traineeor upgraded employee, shall be barred from receiving any further assistanceunder this section. The appropriate SBA Regional Administrator, or his/herdesignee, may waive the reimbursement provisions of this paragraph in limitedcircumstances where an employee's leaving is due to an unforeseen event(e.g., the employee's spouse is relocated by his/her business and the employeemust move).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.307</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Contractual assistance. </ITAG>(a) It is the policy of SBA to enter into contracts with other Governmentagencies and to subcontract the performance of such contracts, pursuantto section 8(a)(1)(C) of the Small Business Act, to 8(a) Program Participantsat prices which will enable such concerns to perform the contracts andearn a reasonable profit.(b) Such subcontracts may either be sole source awards or awards attainedthrough competition reserved for eligible Participants. (c) Admission into the 8(a) program does not bestow a right to receive8(a) contracts. SBA's approval of a Participant's business plan pursuantto andSection; 124.301 does not guarantee the Participant any particularlevel of contract support. (d) An 8(a) contract will be provided to a Participant only when such contractis consistent with the Participant's capabilities and business developmentneeds, as determined by SBA. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.308 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedures for obtaining and accepting procurements for the 8(a) program.</ITAG>(a) <T3>PCR-serviced agencies. </T3>If an SBA Procurement Center Representative(PCR) is resident or has liaison responsibilities in a procuring agency,he/she will be responsible for screening proposed procurements for possible8(a) contracts, in accordance with 13 CFR 125.6. (b) <T3>Requirement identification. </T3>A requirement for possible award maybe identified by SBA, a particular Program Participant or the procuringagency itself. Once a requirement that appears suitable for the 8(a) programhas been identified, SBA shall verify the appropriateness of the SIC codedesignation assigned to the requirement and request the  procuring agencyto offer the requirement to the 8(a) program. If SBA disagrees with theSIC code designation assigned to a particular requirement, SBA may requestthat the procuring agency assign a different SIC code to the requirement.If the requirement exceeds the thresholds established by andSection; 124.311,the SBA will request that the requirement be offered to the 8(a) programto be competed among eligible Program Participants, unless SBA determinesthat there is not a reasonable expectation that at least two eligible 8(a)concerns will submit offers. If the requirement is below the thresholdsestablished by andSection; 124.311, the SBA may request that it be offeredto the 8(a) program for possible sole source award as an open requirementor in support of the approved business plan of a specific Program Participant.(c) <T3>Offering letter. </T3>When a requirement is offered to the 8(a) program,the offering letter from the procuring activity shall contain the followinginformation: (1) A description of the work to be performed or items to be deliveredand a copy of the statement of work, if available; (2) The estimated period of performance; (3) The SIC code that applies to the principal nature of the procurement;(4) The procuring agency's current dollar estimate of the requirement,including options, if any; (5) Any special restrictions or geographical limitations on the requirement; (6) The location of the work to be performed for construction and serviceprocurements; (7) Any special capabilities or disciplines needed for contract performance;(8) The type of contract to be awarded, such as firm fixed price, costreimbursement, or time and materials; (9) The procurement history, if any, of the requirement; (10) The names and addresses of any small business contractors which haveperformed on this specific procurement during the previous 24 months; (11) A statement that no solicitation for the specific procurement hasbeen issued for small business set-aside or small disadvantaged businessset-aside and that no other public communication (such as a notice in theCommerce Business Daily) has been made evidencing the procuring agency'sclear intention to set aside the procurement for small business or smalldisadvantaged business (<T3>see </T3>andSection; 124.309(a)); (12) Identification of any particular 8(a) concern designated for consideration,including a brief justification, such as one of the following: (i) The 8(a) concern, through its own efforts, marketed the requirementand caused it to be reserved for the 8(a) program, or (ii) The procurement is a follow-on or renewal contract and the nominatedconcern is the incumbent; (13) Bonding requirements, if applicable; and (14) Any other information that the procuring agency deems relevant orSBA requests.  (d) <T3>Acceptance of the requirement. </T3>Upon receipt of the procuring agency'soffer, SBA will determine whether it will accept the requirement for the8(a) program. SBA's decision whether to accept the requirement will betransmitted to the procuring agency in writing within 15 working days ofreceipt of the offer, unless SBA requests, and the procuring agency grants,an extension. If SBA decides to accept a sole source requirement for the8(a) program, it will advise the procuring agency in writing. In the caseof a local buy requirement, as defined in andSection; 124.100(o) of theseregulations, SBA will accept the offer both on behalf of the program andin support of the business plan of a specific Participant. In the caseof a National buy requirement, as defined in andSection; 124.100(q) of theseregulations, SBA will accept the offer for the 8(a) program generally andwill advise the procuring activity that SBA's appropriate field officewill designate a specific Participant for contract performance. If SBAdecides to accept a competitive requirement for the 8(a) program, it willsend a letter to the procuring agency accepting the offer for the benefitof the 8(a) program generally. SBA is not required to accept any particularprocurement for the 8(a) program. (e) <T3>Sole source award where procuring agency nominates a specific programparticipant. </T3>If the procuring agency identifies a particular 8(a)concern for a sole source award, SBA will determine whether an appropriatematch exists. (1) Once a procurement is deemed suitable for acceptance as an 8(a) solesource contract, it will normally be accepted on behalf of the Participantrecommended by the procuring agency, provided that: (i) The procurement is consistent with the Participant's business plan;(ii) The Participant is determined by SBA to be a responsible contractorwith respect to performance of the contract; and (iii) The award of the contract would not result in the Participant exceedingits approved 8(a) business support level or the business mix requirementsestablished under andSection; 124.312. (2) If an appropriate match exists, SBA will send a letter accepting theoffer in support of the business plan of the identified Participant tothe procuring agency. This letter will advise the procuring agency whetherSBA will participate in contract negotiations or whether SBA will authorizethe procuring agency to negotiate directly with the identified ProgramParticipant. A Program Participant selected by SBA to perform a noncompetitive8(a) contract shall, when practicable, participate in any negotiation ofthe terms and conditions of such contract. (3) If SBA determines that an appropriate match with the nominated 8(a)concern does not exist based on the factors set forth in paragraph (e)(1)of this section, it will notify the affected 8(a) concern and may thenselect an alternate 8(a) concern, in accordance with paragraph (f)(3) ofthis section. It will so advise the procuring agency of its actions. (f) <T3>Open requirements. </T3>When a procuring agency does not nominate aparticular concern for performance of a sole source 8(a) contract (openrequirement), the following additional procedures will apply: (1) If the contract is a local buy item, SBA will examine the portfolioof 8(a) concerns for the SBA district office where the work is to be performedor the items delivered for selection of a qualified 8(a) concern. If noneis found to be qualified or a match for a concern in that district is determinedto be impossible or inappropriate, the requirement may be considered forother 8(a) concerns located within the region or, if appropriate, otherregions. (2) If the procurement is a national buy item, it shall be referred toSBA's Central Office in Washington, DC. The Central Office will allocatenational buy requirements on an equitable basis. (3) In cases in which SBA must select a Participant for possible awardfrom among two or more eligible and qualified Participants, the selectionwill be based upon consideration of relevant factors, including the businessdevelopment needs, compliance with competitive business mix requirements(if applicable), financial condition, management ability, and technicalcapability of each Participant. SBA shall make its selection based uponan examination of the business plan and procurement history of the concernas well as any supplemental materials requested and received. (4) To the maximum extent practicable, the SBA shall promote the equitablegeographic distribution of 8(a) sole source contracts. (g) <T3>Formal technical evaluations. </T3>SBA will not authorize formal technicalevaluations for sole source 8(a) contracts. If a procuring agency requiresthe performance of a formal technical evaluation among more than one 8(a)concern, the procuring agency must request that the requirement be a competitive8(a) award. The procuring agency may request a formal two-step procurementprocess pursuant to andSection;14.5 of the FAR, 48 CFR 14.5, or a standardnegotiated competitive procurement. Agencies may, however, conduct informalassessments of several 8(a) firms' capabilities to perform a specific requirement,provided that the statement of work for the requirement is not releasedto any of the participating 8(a) firms. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.309</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Barriers to acceptance. </ITAG>SBA will not accept for 8(a) award proposed procurements not previouslyin the 8(a) program if any of the circumstances identified in paragraph(a), (b), or (c) of this section exist. (a) <T3>Solicitation previously issued.</T3> A solicitation has already beenissued for the procurement as a small business set-aside, such as an Invitationfor Bid (IFB) or Request for Proposal (RFP). The AA/MSBandamp;COD may permitthe acceptance of the requirement, however, under extraordinary circumstances,such as where a procuring agency had made a decision to offer the requirementto the 8(a) program before the solicitation was sent out and the procuringagency acknowledges and documents that the solicitation was in error. (b) <T3>Reservation as small business or SDB set-aside. </T3>The procuringagency has expressed publicly a clear intention to reserve the procurementas a small business or small disadvantaged business (SDB) set-aside (<T3>e.g., </T3>a notice of intent to set aside a procurement publishedin the Commerce Business Daily which invites a response from interestedsmall businesses). The AA/MSBandamp;COD may permit the acceptance of therequirement, however, under extraordinary circumstances, such as wherea procuring agency had made a decision to offer the requirement to the8(a) program before the notice was sent out and the procuring agency acknowledgesand documents that the notice was in error. An annual procurement forecastor solicitation of information for possible small business set aside willgenerally not be considered as a clear exhibition of intention to set asidea procurement for small businesses. (c) <T3>Adverse impact. </T3>SBA has made a written determination that acceptanceof the procurement for 8(a) award would have an adverse impact on othersmall business programs or on an individual small business, whether ornot the affected small business is in the 8(a) program. The adverse impactconcept is designed to protect small business concerns which are performingGovernment contracts awarded outside the 8(a) program. Adverse impact doesnot apply to ``new'' requirements. A new requirement is a requirement whichhas not been previously procured by the relevant procuring agency. Wherea requirement is new, no small business could have performed the requirementand, thus, an impact determination need not be performed. The expansionor alteration of an existing requirement shall be considered a new requirementwhere the requirement is materially expanded or modified so that the ensuingrequirement is not substantially similar to the prior requirement due tothe magnitude of the expansion or alteration. (1) SBA presumes adverse impact to exist when a small business concernhas performed a specific requirement for at least 24 months, it is currentlyperforming the requirement or finished such performance within 30 daysof the procuring agency's offer of the requirement for the 8(a) program,and the estimated dollar value of the offered 8(a) award is 25 percentor more of its most recent annual gross sales (including those of its affiliates).(2) SBA may determine adverse impact to exist upon an adequate showingbased on circumstances other than those set forth in the presumption ofparagraph (c)(1) of this section.(d) <T3>Release for non-8(a) competition. </T3>In limited instances, SBA maydetermine that a sole source 8(a) contract being performed by a ProgramParticipant whose Program Term will expire prior to contract completionor by a former Program Participant whose Program Term has expired withinone year may be released to the procuring agency to be completed outsidethe 8(a) program. If such a determination is made, SBA will reject theprocuring agency's offer of the requirement for award through the 8(a)program. In such a case, SBA would recommend that the requirement be procuredas a small business set aside or, where appropriate, through a small disadvantagedbusiness competition authorized by Pub. L. 99-661. (1) In making such a determination, SBA will balance the importance ofthe contract for the (former) Participant's stability and business developmentneeds against the needs of other Program Participants qualified to performthe requirement in order to develop in accord with their business plan.Such a determination will include consideration of whether the releaseof the requirement to competition would seriously reduce the pool of similartypes of contracts to be fulfilled through the 8(a) program. (2) A written request for the release of a contract must be made to SBAby the applicable (former) Participant prior to SBA's acceptance of therequirement for the 8(a) program. SBA will not release a requirement absentsuch a request. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.310</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Approval of lower tier subcontractors. </ITAG>(a) SBA's approval must be obtained prior to a Participant's subcontractingof the performance of an 8(a) contract to another concern. (b) SBA will not approve any subcontracting arrangement where: (1) The performance of work requirements set forth in andSection; 124.314would not be met; (2) The proposed subcontractor has been suspended, debarred, or determinedto be ineligible by any Federal agency; (3) SBA determines that the proposed subcontractor would control the performanceof the requirement; (4) SBA determines that the proposed subcontracting relationship is notan arms length agreement; or (5) SBA determines that the proposed subcontracting arrangement is an attemptto circumvent SBA's size regulations. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.311</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">8(a) competition. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Competitive thresholds. </T3>A contract opportunity offered to the8(a) program for award shall be awarded on the basis of competition restrictedto eligible program participants if: (1) There is a reasonable expectation that at least two eligible ProgramParticipants will submit offers and that award can be made at a fair marketprice, and (2) The anticipated award price of the contract, including options, willexceed $5,000,000 for contracts assigned manufacturing standard industrialclassification (SIC) codes and $3,000,000 for all other contracts.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Example. </T4>If the anticipated award price for a professional servicesrequirement is determined to be $2.7 million and it is accepted as a solesource 8(a) requirement on that basis, a sole source award will be valideven if the contract price arrived at after negotiation is $3.1 million.</ITAG>(b) <T3>Effective date of thresholds. </T3>The thresholds specified in paragraph(a) of this section shall not apply to any 8(a) requirement that has beenaccepted for the 8(a) program prior to October 1, 1989, where a proposalcontaining price has been submitted to the procuring agency. (c) <T3>Exemption from competitive thresholds for 8(a) concerns owned by Indiantribes. </T3>SBA may award an 8(a) subcontract on a non-competitive basisto an 8(a) concern owned and controlled by an economically disadvantagedIndian tribe, as defined in andSection; 124.100(m), even if such contractexceeds the competitive thresholds set forth in paragraph (a) of this section.<T3>See </T3>generally, andSection; 124.112. (d) <T3>Competition below thresholds. </T3>The AA/MSBandamp;COD may, on a nondelegablebasis, approve a request from an agency for a competitive 8(a) award evenif the anticipated award price is not expected to exceed the dollar amountsspecified in paragraph (a) of this section. Such approvals will be grantedon a limited basis. (1) This authority will be used primarily in areas where technical competitionsare appropriate or when a large number of responsible 8(a) contractorsexists. (2) In determining whether to approve a request to compete an 8(a) contractbelow the applicable threshold amount, the AA/MSBandamp;COD shall considerwhether the requesting agency has made and will continue to make availablea significant number of its contracts to the 8(a) program on a noncompetitivebasis. (3) The AA/MSBandamp;COD shall deny a request to compete a contract havinga dollar figure below the applicable threshold amount where the requirementwas previously offered to the 8(a) program on a noncompetitive basis ifhe/she concludes that the request is based on the inability of the contractingagency and the Participant selected to perform the contract to reach anagreement on price or some other material term or condition. (e) <T3>Sole source above thresholds. </T3>Where a contract opportunity exceedsthe applicable threshold dollar figure and there is not a reasonable expectationthat at least two eligible Program Participants will submit offers at afair price, SBA may accept the requirement for a sole source 8(a) awardif SBA determines that an eligible Participant in the 8(a) portfolio iscapable of performing the requirement at a fair price. (f) <T3>Procedures for competition. </T3>(1) Competitions among eligible 8(a)Participants shall be conducted by the procuring agencies in accordancewith the Federal Acquisition Regulation (FAR). Such competitions shallbe representative of competitions which are the normal practice in therelevant industries. Competitions need not stress price as the dominantfactor, but may be based primarily on technical evaluations or other non-pricerelated factors. Competition criteria, whether price or otherwise, mustreceive prior SBA approval. In any event, selection of a particular ProgramParticipant by the procuring agency shall be based on specific evaluationcriteria set forth in the solicitation. (2) All solicitations for competitive 8(a) requirements shall include theappropriate SIC code for the requirement. (3) The procuring agency shall evaluate offers pursuant to the evaluationcriteria in the solicitation and the applicable FAR provisions. (4) In a sealed bid procurement, the procuring agency shall identify thelow bidder to SBA. In a negotiated procurement, the procuring agency shallidentify all offerors. (5) The SBA will determine whether any firm identified is eligible foraward of the contract, including whether it has the SIC code for the requirementin its approved business plan, whether it is small under the SIC code forthe requirement, and whether it has exceeded its approved business supportlevel by more than 25 percent if the firm is in the developmental stage(or will exceed such level if it is awarded the contract at issue) or whetherit has achieved its competitive business mix targets under andSection; 124.312if the firm is in the transitional stage.(6) If the low bidder in a sealed bid procurement is determined to be ineligibleby SBA, the procuring agency shall identify the next low bidder. This processmay need to be repeated until SBA determines that an identified Participantis eligible for award. (7) In a negotiated procurement, the procuring agency will evaluate theoffers of those firms determined by SBA to be eligible for award pursuantto paragraph (f)(5) of this section and will conduct discussions and/ornegotiations with those firms deemed appropriate. (8) After negotiations and/or discussions occur in a negotiated procurement,award will be made to the Participant selected by the procuring agency.(9) Award shall be made through the normal 8(a) award procedures (i.e.,a prime contract between the procuring agency and SBA and a subcontractbetween SBA and the selected 8(a) concern). (g) <T3>Protest restrictions. </T3>The eligibility of a Participant for a competitive8(a) award may not be challenged by another Participant or any other partyto SBA or to any other administrative forum as part of a bid or other contractprotest. Anyone with information concerning the eligibility of a Participantto continue participation in the 8(a) program may submit such informationto SBA for in accordance with andSection; 124.111(c). (h) <T3>Restricted competition. </T3>(1) <T3>Competition within stages of program participation. </T3>SBA may accepta requirement to be awarded through a competition limited to 8(a) concernsin the developmental stage of program participation or limited to concernsin the transitional stage of program participation, or may accept a requirementto be competed among firms both in the developmental and transitional stagesof program participation. (2) <T3>SIC code requirements. </T3>Only those Participants that have in theirapproved business plan the SIC Code identified in the solicitation maysubmit offers for the requirement. A Participant will be deemed ineligiblefor award by SBA if it submits an offer for a requirement for which itdoes not have an approved SIC Code. (3) <T3>Local buy competitions. </T3>Where a competitive 8(a) contract opportunityis a local buy requirement, the appropriate Assistant Regional Administratorfor Minority Small Business and Capital Ownership Development (ARA/MSBandamp;COD)will determine, based on his/her knowledge of the 8(a) portfolio, whetherthe competition should be limited only to those program Participants locatedwithin the geographical boundaries of one or more district offices or theentire region. Only those Participants located within the appropriate geographicalboundaries are eligible to submit offers. If SBA determines, however, thatthere is not a reasonable expectation that at least two Participants withinsuch region will submit offers, SBA may authorize the procuring agencyto accept offers from eligible Program Participants in one or more otherspecified regions. Without such authorization, Participants located outsidethe relevant SBA regional boundaries which submit offers shall be consideredineligible. In appropriate instances, a competition may be limited to eligibleProgram Participants in adjacent SBA district offices which are in differentSBA regional offices where the ARA/MSBandamp;COD in the two relevant regionsso agree. (4) <T3>National buy competitions. </T3>Where a competitive 8(a) contract opportunityis a national buy requirement, all eligible Program Participants may submitoffers. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.312 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Competitive business mix. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>To ensure that 8(a) firms do not develop an unreasonablereliance on 8(a) contracts and to ease the transition of such firms intothe competitive marketplace after exiting the 8(a) program, Program Participantsmust make maximum efforts to obtain business outside the 8(a) program.(b) <T3>Non-8(a) business activity targets and support levels during developmentalstage_</T3>(1) <T3>Attainment of targeted levels. </T3>During the  developmental stageof Program Participation, an 8(a) concern must make substantial and sustainedefforts to attain the targeted dollar levels of non-8(a) revenue establishedin its business plan.(2) <T3>Maintenance of existing business base. </T3>An on-going business concernwhich enters the 8(a) program must make maximum efforts to maintain itsexisting business base and use the 8(a) program as a resource to strengthenthe firm after its 8(a) certification. (3) <T3>Marketing strategy to attain targeted levels.</T3> Every Program Participantmust engage in a reasonable marketing strategy that will maximize its potentialto achieve the targeted levels of non-8(a) revenue established in its businessplan. (4) <T3>Establishing support levels.</T3> SBA shall establish 8(a) and non-8(a)support levels by considering the firm's sales forecast and supportingdata in its business plan, the firm's demonstrated capacity and capabilitylevel, current level of non-8(a) contracts on hand and the availabilityof 8(a) support. The aggregate dollar amount of 8(a) support provided toa Program Participant for any year of program participation during thedevelopmental stage may not exceed the applicable 8(a) support level approvedby SBA as reflected in the concern's business plan by more than 25 percent.(5) <T3>Increasing support levels. </T3>An 8(a) concern in the developmentalstage of program participation may request an increase in its approved8(a) support level once during a program year other than at the date ofits annual review. Such request must be made in writing and must be madewithin 15 calendar days (either before or after) of the six month dateof its preceding annual review (e.g., if a firm's annual review occurson June 23, the firm may request an increase in its approved 8(a) supportlevel between December 8 and January 7_15 calendar days before and afterDecember 23). A revision to a Participant's business plan may not, however,be based solely on the identification of an 8(a) contract in excess ofthe Program Participant's approved 8(a) support level. A Participant mustdemonstrate that it has increased its capacity and capability to the pointthat its currently approved 8(a) support level is inappropriate. The Participant'sincreased capacity and capability must be greater than the increased levelof 8(a) support requested so that the Participant is still able to increaseits non-8(a) revenue if the request is approved. Any increase in a Participant'sapproved 8(a) support level other than as part of the annual review processmust be approved in writing by the appropriate Regional Administrator orhis/her designee. (6) <T3>Measuring 8(a) support. </T3>In determining whether a Participant hasreached its 8(a) support level during the program year, the base year valueof all contracts awarded during the year shall be added to the value ofall options and other modifications which changed the dollar value of thecontract executed during that year.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Example:</T4> During a specific program year, Program Participant Xreceives three 8(a) contracts as follows: (1) $1,000,000 contract_$400,000base year, and two $300,000 options; (2) $500,000 contract_$250,000 baseyear, and one $250,000 option; and (3) $100,000 contract with no options.In addition, two options on 8(a) contracts awarded in a previous programyear, each worth $200,000, are exercised in the program year under consideration.The 8(a) contract support received during that program year is $1,150,000.</ITAG>(7) <T3>Reporting and verification of business activity. </T3>Once admittedto the 8(a) program, the Program Participant must provide SBA with quarterlyand annual financial statements within 90 calendar days (180 calendar daysfor audited statements) from the end of each quarter. The statements shallreport revenue as non-8(a) and 8(a) revenue as appropriate. Also, within30 calendar days from the end of the program year, the Program Participantshall provide SBA with an annual report of all non-8(a) contracts, optionsand modifications affecting price executed during the program year. (c) <T3>Required non-8(a) business activity targets during transitional stage</T3>_(1)<T3>General.</T3> During the transitional stage of the program, the ProgramParticipant shall be required to achieve certain targets of non-8(a) contractrevenue. Such targets shall be referred to as non-8(a) business activitytargets and shall be expressed as a percentage of total revenue. The targetsshall reflect a reasonably consistent increase in non-8(a) revenue. Participantsapproved for participation on or after November 15, 1988 and Participantswith more than five years remaining in the program as of August 15, 1989shall be subject to the non-8(a) business activity targets set forth inparagraph (c)(4) of this section. Participants with five years or lessremaining in the program as of August 15, 1989 shall be subject to themodified non-8(a) business activity targets set forth in paragraph (c)(5)of this section. (2) <T3>Establishing support levels.</T3> During the transitional stage ofthe program, SBA shall establish 8(a) and non-8(a) support levels for eachProgram Participant. The aggregate dollar amount of 8(a) support providedto a Program Participant during the transitional stage may not exceed theestablished 8(a) support level for the applicable program year. The 8(a)support level shall be established so as to ensure that the 8(a) firm meetsthe non-8(a) business activity targets or the modified non-8(a) businessactivity targets set forth in paragraphs (c)(4) and (c)(5) of this section.In establishing the 8(a) support level, SBA will consider the following:(i) The 8(a) and non-8(a) sales forecast and support data contained inthe Program Participant's business plan; (ii) Current 8(a) and non-8(a) contracts on hand; (iii) Historical 8(a) and non-8(a) revenue and the current level of 8(a)and non-8(a) revenue; (iv) The Program Participant's demonstrated capacity and capability levelwhich may include current levels of 8(a) and non-8(a) revenue, current8(a) and non-8(a) contracts on hand, working capital, access to credit,production capacity, projected increase in non-8(a) revenue, and managementand technical capability; (v) The applicable non-8(a) business activity target for the applicabletransitional year. (3) <T3>Increasing support levels. </T3>An 8(a) concern in the transitionalstage of program participation may request an increase in its approved8(a) support level once during a program year other than at the date ofits annual review. Such request must be in writing and must be made within15 calendar day before or after the six month date of its preceding annualreview (e.g., if a firm's annual review occurs on June 23, the firm mayrequest an increase in its approved 8(a) support level between December8 and January 7_15 calendar days before and after December 23). A revisionto a Participant's business plan may not, however, be based solely on theidentification of an 8(a) contract in excess of the Program Participant'sapproved 8(a) support level. A Participant must demonstrate that it hasincreased its capacity and capability to the point that its currently approved8(a) support level is inappropriate and that an increase in its approvedsupport level will not conflict with the applicable non-8(a) business activitytargets set forth in paragraphs (c)(4) and (c)(5) of this section. (4) <T3>Non-8(a) business activity targets. </T3>During the transitional stageof program participation, firms approved for program participation on orafter the enactment of Pub. L. 100-656 (November 15, 1988) and currentProgram Participants that have more than five years remaining in the programas of August 15, 1989 shall be subject to the following non-8(a) businessactivity targets during each year of program participation in the transitionalstage:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>Program participant's year in the transitional stage</H1><H1>Non-8(a) business activity targets (non-8(a) revenue as a percentageof total revenue)</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">1 <D>15-25 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2 <D>25-35 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3 <D>40-45 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4 <D>50-55 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5 <D>65-75</D></ITAG></ITAG> (5) <T3>Modified non-8(a) business activity targets. </T3>During the transitionalstage of program participation, firms that have five years or less remainingin the program as of August 15, 1989 shall be subject to modified non-8(a)business activity targets. (i) A firm with three to five years remaining in the program as of August15, 1989 shall be subject to the following non-8(a) business activity targets:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s10,10</C> <H1>Program participant's year in the transitional stage</H1><H1>Modified non-8(a) business activity targets (non-8(a) revenue as apercentage of total revenue)</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">1 <D>10-20 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2 <D>20-30 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3 <D>35-40 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4 <D>45-50 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5 <D>60-65</D></ITAG></ITAG> (ii) A firm with two years or less remaining in the program as of August15, 1989 shall make substantial and sustained efforts to attain the targeteddollar levels of non-8(a) sales approved in its business plan. (6) <T3>Failure to meet required non-8(a) business activity target. </T3>Firmsthat fail to achieve the minimum percentage non-8(a) business activitytarget in any year of the transitional stage will be subject to the remedialmeasures, as set forth in paragraph (c)(12) of this section. (7) <T3>Attainment of targeted levels. </T3>The Program Participant must makemaximum efforts to maintain and increase its targeted level of non 8(a)revenue during the transitional stage. (8) <T3>Marketing strategy to attain targeted levels. </T3>The Program Participantmust engage in a reasonable marketing strategy that will maximize its potentialto achieve the targeted levels of non-8(a) revenue established in the businessplan. (9) <T3>Measuring 8(a) support.</T3> In determining whether a Participant hasreached its 8(a) support level during the program year, the base year valueof all contracts awarded during the year shall be added to the value ofall options and other modifications executed during that year. (<T3>See </T3>Example in paragraph (b)(6) of this section). (10) <T3>Reporting and verification of business activity.</T3> Program Participantsduring the transitional stage shall provide SBA with quarterly and annualfinancial statements with a breakdown of 8(a) and non-8(a) revenue within90 calendar days (180 calendar days for audited statements) from the closeof the reporting period. The Program Participant shall also provide SBAwith quarterly and annual reports of all non-8(a) contracts, options andmodifications affecting price executed during the program year (and anyother information as required by SBA) within thirty days from the end ofthe reporting period. At the end of each year of participation in the transitionalstage, the BOS assigned to work with the Participant shall review the Participant'stotal revenues to determine whether the Participant's non-8(a) revenueshave met the targets established pursuant to paragraphs (c)(4) and (c)(5)of this section. (11) <T3>Certification of compliance. </T3>Before the receipt of any 8(a) contractduring the transitional stage of the program, a Program Participant mustcertify that it is in compliance with the non-8(a) business activity targetsestablished in its business plan as approved by SBA or that it is in compliancewith such remedial measures ordered by SBA if such remedial measures allowthe continued award of 8(a) contracts. (12) <T3>Remedial measures for failure to achieve competitive business activitytargets. </T3>SBA is authorized to take appropriate remedial measures withrespect to a Program Participant which has failed to attain the minimumrequired business activity targets as established in paragraphs (c)(4)and (c)(5) of this section. If appropriate, remedial measures will be orderedwhen a Program Participant fails to achieve the minimum percentage of thenon-8(a) business activity target at the end of any transitional year.These remedial actions include, but are not limited to: (i) Reducing a Participant's approved level of 8(a) support; (ii) Reducing, or eliminating, sole source 8(a) contracts; (iii) Restricting the award of any new competitive and/or sole source 8(a)contracts; (iv) Conditioning the award of future sole source 8(a) contracts on theParticipant's taking affirmative steps to expand the dollar volume of itscompetitive business activity, such as changes in marketing or financingstrategies; (v) Requiring the Program Participant to obtain management and technicalassistance or to obtain counseling and/or attend seminars relating to managementassistance, business development, financing, marketing, or proposal preparation.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.313</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Certification of SBA's competency. </ITAG>(a) SBA will certify that it is competent to perform the requirement, asprovided by section 8(a)(1)(A) of the Small Business Act, based on itsdetermination that the 8(a) concern with which it intends to subcontractis responsible to perform the requirement. If SBA determines that the concernlacks the capability, competency, capacity, credit, integrity, or tenacityand perseverance to perform on a specific 8(a) subcontract, the subcontractwill not be awarded to such concern. A Program Participant which has notsubmitted required financial statements to SBA will be deemed not responsibleto receive 8(a) subcontracts. In addition, SBA will also certify that an8(a) concern is eligible under the Walsh-Healey Public Contracts Act, 41U.S.C. 35(a), for each individual 8(a) subcontract. (b) SBA's determination not to award a Program Participant a specific 8(a)subcontract because the concern lacks an element of responsibility, oris ineligible under the Walsh-Healey Public Contracts Act, does not constitutea denial of total 8(a) program participation for the purposes of section8(a)(9) of the Small Business Act. (c) A Participant that is determined by SBA not to be responsible to performa sole source or competitive 8(a) contract may not seek the issuance ofa Certificate of Competency pursuant to andSection; 125.5 of this title.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.314</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Performance of work by the 8(a) concern. </ITAG>(a) To assure the accomplishment of the purposes of the 8(a) program, each8(a) subcontractor must perform work equivalent to the following percentages:(1) <T3>Services (except construction). </T3>In the case of an 8(a) contractfor professional and/or non-professional services (except construction),at least 50 percent of the cost of contract performance incurred for laborshall be expended for employees of the 8(a) concern. (2) <T3>Supplies (other than procurement from a regular dealer in such supplies).</T3>In the case of an 8(a) contract for supplies, an 8(a) concern thatseeks to perform the requirement as a manufacturer shall perform work forat least 50 percent of the cost of manufacturing the supplies, not includingthe cost of materials. This requirement does not apply to 8(a) concernsthat seek to perform 8(a) supply contracts as regular dealers in such supplies.(3) <T3>General construction.</T3> The concern shall perform at least 15 percentof the cost of the contract, not including the cost of materials, withits own employees.(4) <T3>Construction by special trade contractors. </T3>The concern shall performat least 25 percent of the cost of the contract, not including the costof materials, with its own employees. (b) The Program Participant must certify in its bid or proposal that itwill perform the required percentage of work with its own employees. Failureof the concern to provide such a statement will result in the firm beingconsidered ineligible for award. (c) For purposes of determining whether a Program Participant will performthe required percentage of the contract, the work to be performed by asubsidiary(ies) of the Participant or a concern(s) otherwise affiliatedwith the Participant is not counted as being performed by the Participant.(d) <T3>Indefinite quantity contracts. </T3>(1) In order to ensure that therequired percentage of an indefinite quantity 8(a) award is performed bythe Program Participant, at any point in time the Program Participant musthave performed the required percentage of the total value of the contractto that date. For a service or supply contract, this does not mean thatthe Program Participant must perform 50 percent of each task order withits own work force. But, rather, the Participant is required to perform50 percent of the combined total of all task orders to date. The RegionalAdministrator or his/her delegatee may waive this requirement where a largeamount of subcontracting is essential in the early stages of performancebefore the work to be done by the Participant can be performed, providedthat there are written assurances from the Participant and the procurringagency that the contract will ultimately comply with the requirements ofthis section.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Example: </T4>If a Program Participant performed 90 percent of a $100,000task order on an indefinite quantity service contract with its own workforce, it would only have to perform 10 percent of a second task orderfor $100,000 because the concern would still have performed 50 percentof the combined total value of the contract to date ($100,000 out of $200,000).</ITAG>(2) Where there is a guaranteed minimum condition in an indefinite quantity8(a) award, the required performance of work percentage need not be meton the first task order. In such a case, however, the percentage of workto be subcontracted to other concerns by the Program Participant on thefirst task order may not exceed 50 percent of the total guaranteed minimumdollar value to be provided by the contract. If the first task order exceeds50 percent of the guaranteed minimum amount, the Participant may subcontractno more than 50 percent of the guaranteed amount. Once the guaranteed minimumamount is met, the general rule for indefinite quantity contracts set forthin paragraph (1) of this section applies.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Example: </T4>Where a contract guarantees a minimum of $100,000 inprofessional services and the first task order is for $60,000 in such services,it would be acceptable for the Program Participant to perform less than$30,000 (i.e., 50 percent of $60,000). The Program Participant could bepermitted to perform only $10,000 of that first task order. In such a case,the entire remainder of the guaranteed minimum ($40,000), however, wouldhave to be performed by the Program Participant so that the Participantwould have ultimately performed $50,000 (i.e., 50 percent of the guaranteedminimum, i.e. ($100,000). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.315 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fair market price for 8(a) awards. </ITAG>(a) A ``fair market price'' for an 8(a) contract shall be determined bythe agency offering the procurement requirement to SBA in accordance withparagraphs (a)(1) and (a)(2) of this section. (1) The estimate of a current fair market price for a new procurement requirement,or a requirement that does not have a satisfactory procurement history,shall be derived from a price or cost analysis. Such analysis may takeinto account prevailing market conditions, commercial prices for similarproducts or services, or data obtained from any other agency. Such analysismust also consider any cost or pricing data that is timely submitted bythe SBA. (2) The estimate of a current fair market price for a procurement requirementthat has a satisfactory procurement history shall be based on recent awardprices adjusted to insure comparability. Such adjustments shall take intoaccount differences in quantities, performance times, plans, specifications,transportation costs, packaging and packing costs, labor and material costs,overhead costs, and any other additional costs which may be deemed appropriate.(b) Upon the request of SBA, an agency offering a procurement requirementfor potential award through the 8(a) program shall submit to SBA a writtenstatement detailing the method used by the agency to estimate the currentfair market price for such contract. Such statement shall be submittedwithin 10 business days. The procuring agency must identify the information,studies, analyses, and other data it used in making its estimate. The procuringagency's estimate of fair market price and any supporting data may notbe disclosed to any potential contractor or subcontractor, other than SBA.(c) The concern selected to perform the 8(a) contract may request SBA toprotest the procuring agency's estimate of current fair market price tothe Secretary of the Department or head of the agency in accordance withandSection; 124.320(b). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.316 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Contract administration. </ITAG>(a) SBA may delegate, by the use of special clauses in the prime contractand subcontract, certain responsibilities for administering an 8(a) subcontractto the procuring agency.(b) SBA may delegate to the procuring agency all subcontract administrationfunctions except the following: the exercise of options; the exercise ofnovation agreements (48 CFR 42.302(a)(25)); the exercise of any modificationissued pursuant to the ``Changes,'' ``Differing Site Conditions,'' ``PriceReduction,'' ``Default-Damages for Delay-Time Extensions'' and ``Suspensionof Work'' clauses (48 CFR Part 43); payments to contractors (48 CFR Part32); termination of the subcontract (48 CFR Part 49 and andSection; 124.319of this part); and consent to the placement of subcontracts (48 CFR 42.302(51)).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.317</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Performance of contracts by original concern. </ITAG>(a) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (b) of this section, a contract(including options) awarded pursuant to section 8(a) of the Small BusinessAct shall be performed by the concern that initially received such contract.If the owner or owners upon whom eligibility was based relinquishes ownershipor control of such concern, or enters into any agreement to relinquishsuch ownership or control, such contract or option shall be terminatedfor the convenience of the Government, except that no repurchase costsor other damages shall be assessed against such concern due solely to theprovisions of this paragraph. This provision applies whether the concernthat initially received 8(a) certification remains a separate legal entityafter a transfer of ownership or whether it merges into/with another businessconcern.  (b) The Administrator may, as a matter of discretion and on a nondelegablebasis, waive the requirements of paragraph (a) of this section if requestedto do so prior to the actual relinquishment of ownership and control ifany of the following conditions exist: (1) When it is necessary for the owner(s) of the concern to surrender partialcontrol of such concern on a temporary basis in order to obtain equityfinancing; (2) The head of the procuring agency for which the contract is being performedcertifies that termination of the contract would severely impair attainmentof the agency's program objectives or missions; (3) Ownership and control of the concern that is performing the contractwill pass to another Program Participant, but only if the acquiring firmwould otherwise be eligible to receive the award directly as an 8(a) contract;(4) The individuals upon whom eligibility was based are no longer ableto exercise control of the concern due to incapacity or death; and (5) When, in order to raise equity capital, it is necessary for the disadvantagedowner(s) of the concern to relinquish ownership of a majority of the votingstock of such concern, but only if_ (i) Such concern has exited the 8(a) program; (ii) The disadvantaged owner(s) will maintain ownership of the largestsingle outstanding block of voting stock (including stock held by affiliatedparties); and  (iii) The disadvantaged owner(s) will maintain control of the daily businessoperations of the concern. (c) A concern performing an 8(a) contract must notify the SBA in writingimmediately upon entering an agreement (either oral or written) to transferall or part of its stock or other ownership interest to any other party.Such an agreement could include an oral agreement to enter into a transactionto transfer interests in the future. (d) Denial of a waiver request may be appealed to SBA's Office of Hearingsand Appeals in accordance with andSection; 124.210 and Part 134 of the Title.(e) For the purposes of determining ownership and control of a concernunder these regulations, any potential ownership interests (such as optionsor warrants) held by investment companies licensed under the Small BusinessInvestment Act of 1958 shall not be treated as ownership interests untilexercised. (f) An 8(a) concern may not transfer the performance of an 8(a) contractto another concern. Such a transfer may be grounds for termination of theconcern from the 8(a) program. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.318</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Exercise of options and modifications.  </ITAG>(a) <T3>Unpriced options.</T3> The exercise of an unpriced option is consideredto be a new contracting action. As such, if a concern has exited the 8(a)program or is no longer small under the size standard corresponding tothe SIC Code for the requirement, negotiations to price the option cannotbe entered into and the option cannot be exercised. If, however, the concernis still a Program Participant and is still a small business under thesize standard corresponding to the SIC Code for the requirement, negotiationsto price the option may be entered into and, if a fair and reasonable priceis negotiated, the option may be exercised. SBA's concurrence in the exerciseof options is required pursuant to andSection; 124.316. (b) <T3>Priced options.</T3> A priced option to an 8(a) contract award maybe exercised whether the concern that received the award has exited the8(a) program and whether the concern is no longer small under the sizestandard corresponding to the SIC Code for the requirement. (c) <T3>Modifications beyond the scope.</T3> A modification beyond the scopeof the initial 8(a) contract award is considered to be a new contractingaction. As such, if a concern has exited the 8(a) program or is no longersmall under the size standard corresponding to the SIC Code for the requirement,the modification cannot be exercised. If, however, the concern is stilla Program Participant and is still a small business under the size standardcorresponding to the SIC Code for the  requirement, the modification maybe made since the authority exists to enter into a new 8(a) contract tofulfill the requirement. SBA's concurrence in the exercise of modificationsis required pursuant to andSection; 124.316. (d) <T3>Modifications within the scope.</T3> A modification within the scopeof the initial 8(a) contract award may be exercised whether the concernthat received the award has exited the 8(a) program and whether the concernis no longer small under the size standard corresponding to the SIC Codefor the requirement. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.319 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Contract termination. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Termination for default.</T3> A decision to terminate a specific 8(a)contract for default is made by the procuring agency contracting officerin cooperation with SBA. The contracting officer will advise SBA in writingin advance of his/her intent to terminate the 8(a) contract for default.SBA may provide to the 8(a) concern any program benefits reasonably availablein order to assist in preventing termination for default of the contract.SBA will advise the contracting officer of this effort. If, despite theefforts of the SBA, the procuring agency contracting officer believes groundsfor termination continue to exist, he/she may terminate the 8(a) contractfor default, after consulting with SBA. Such terminations shall be processedin accordance with the FAR, 48 CFR. SBA will have no liability for terminationcosts or reprocurement costs. (b) <T3>Termination for Convenience. </T3>(1) In cooperation with SBA, theprocuring agency contracting officer may terminate an 8(a) contract forconvenience any time it is determined to be in the best interest of thegovernment to do so. (2) Pursuant to andSection; 124.317(a) a contract shall be terminated forconvenience if the owner or owners upon whom eligibility was based relinquishownership or control of such concern, or enter into any agreement to relinquishsuch ownership or control, unless a waiver is granted pursuant to andSection;124.317. Such terminations shall be processed in accordance with the FAR,48 CFR. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.320</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Disputes and appeals. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Contract disputes generally. </T3>(1) Except as provided in paragraphs(a)(2) and (a)(3) of this section, for purposes of the Disputes Clauseof a specific 8(a) contract, the contracting officer is that of the procuringagency. A dispute arising between an 8(a) subcontractor and the procuringagency contracting officer will be decided unilaterally by the procuringagency contracting officer. The 8(a) subcontractor has the right to appealthe decision of the procuring agency contracting officer under the ContractDisputes Act of 1978. (2) For disputes arising out of advance payments or business developmentexpense funds, the contracting officer is that of SBA. (3) For disputes arising out of construction contracts where SBA has waivedbonding pursuant to andSection; 124.305, the contracting officer is thatas agreed between SBA and the procuring agency. (4) Decisions by contracting officers (either of SBA or a procuring agency)may be appealed under the Contract Disputes Act of 1978. (b) <T3>SBA appeals of nonselection or terms and conditions.  </T3>(1) TheAdministrator of SBA may appeal the following matters to the head of theprocuring agency: (i) The decision not to make a particular procurement requirement availablefor award under the 8(a) program; or (ii) The terms and conditions of a particular contract to be awarded underthe 8(a) program. (2) The SBA must notify the contracting officer of the Administrator'sintent to appeal an adverse determination within 5 business days of theSBA's receipt of such determination. The SBA Administrator must file awritten request to reconsider the adverse decision with the head of theprocuring agency (appeal) within 15 business days of the SBA's notificationof intent to appeal. (3) Upon receipt of the notice of intent to appeal, the procuring agencyshall suspend further action regarding the procurement until the head ofthe procuring agency issues a written decision on the appeal, unless thehead of the procuring agency makes a written determination that urgentand compelling circumstances which significantly affect interests of theUnited States will not permit waiting for a reconsideration of the adversedecision. (4) If the Administrator's appeal is denied, the procuring agency headshall so notify the SBA, specifying the reasons for the denial. This informationshall be made a part of the contract file for the requirement. (c) An 8(a) Participant selected by the SBA to perform or negotiate an8(a) contract may request the SBA to protest the procuring agency's estimateof the fair market price for such contract pursuant to paragraph (b) ofthis section. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.321</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Joint venture agreements. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Prerequisites for joint venture agreement. </T3>An 8(a) concern mayenter into a joint venture agreement, as defined in andSection; 124.100(n),with another small business concern, whether or not an 8(a) Participant,for the purpose of performing a specific 8(a) contract. A joint ventureagreement is permissible only when the 8(a) concern lacks the necessarycapacity to perform the contract on its own, and when the agreement isfair and equitable and will be of substantial benefit to the 8(a) concern.(b) <T3>Size limitations. </T3>Except for certain Program Participants ownedand controlled by Indian tribes, an 8(a) concern entering into a jointventure agreement with another concern is considered to be affiliated forsize purposes with the other concern with respect to performance of the8(a) subcontract. As such, the annual receipts or employees of the otherconcern are included in determining the size of the selected 8(a) concern.The combined annual receipts or employees of the concerns entering intothe joint venture must meet the size standard for the SIC code industrydesignated for the contract. <T3>See</T3> paragraph (f)(1) of this section for joint ventures controlledby tribally-owned concerns. (c) <T3>Contents of joint venture agreements. </T3>The following provisionsshall be included in all joint venture agreements: (1) A provision setting forth the purpose of the joint venture. (2) A provision designating the parties to the joint venture as co-managers.(3) A provision stating that not less than 51 percent of the revenues earnedby the joint venture shall be distributed to the 8(a) concern. (4) A provision providing for the establishment and administration of aspecial bank account in the name of the joint venture. This account shallrequire the signature of all Participants or designees for withdrawal purposes.All payments due the joint venture for performance on an 8(a) subcontractshall be deposited in the special account from which all expenses incurredunder the subcontract shall be paid. (5) An itemized description of all major equipment, facilities, and otherresources to be furnished by each Participant to the joint venture, witha detailed schedule of cost or value of each. (6) A provision specifying the responsibilities of the parties with regardto contract performance and negotiation of any subcontracts. (d) <T3>Other requirements. </T3>Joint venture agreements are subject to thefollowing additional requirements: (1) The joint venture agreement must be approved in advance of contractaward by the AA/MSBandamp;COD or his/her designee. (2) An employee of the 8(a) concern must be the designated project managerresponsible for contract performance. (3) Accounting and other administrative records relating to the joint ventureshall be kept in the office of the 8(a) concern, unless approval to keepthem elsewhere is granted by the Regional Administrator or his/her designeeupon written request. (4) Quarterly financial statements showing cumulative contract receiptsand expenditures (including salaries of the joint venture's principals)shall be submitted to SBA not later than 45 days after each operating quarter.(5) A project-end profit and loss statement shall be submitted no laterthan 90 days after completion of the contract including a statement offinal profit distribution.(6) The 8(a) concern shall perform with its own labor force the percentageof the total value of the 8(a) contract set forth in andSection; 124.315.(e) <T3>Inspection of records. </T3>The SBA shall have the authority to inspectthe records of the joint venture without notice at any time deemed necessary.(f) <T3>Joint ventures with concerns owned by Indian tribes._</T3>(1) <T3>Exemption from size limitations. </T3>The size limitations set forthin paragraph (b) of this section will not be applied to joint venturesentered into by an 8(a) concern owned and controlled by an economicallydisadvantaged Indian tribe, as defined in andSection; 124.100(h), if theconcern: (i) Owns and controls 51 percent or more of the joint venture; (ii) Is located on the reservation of or land owned by the tribe; (iii) Performs most of its activities on such reservation or tribally ownedland; and (iv) Employs members of such tribe for at least 50 percent of its totalworkforce. (2) <T3>Identification of requirements. </T3>Requirements suitable for jointventures with tribally owned concerns must be identified by SBA and/orthe tribally owned concern. Large business concerns may not be involvedin identifying such requirements. (3) <T3>Limitations. </T3>An 8(a) concern as a party to a joint venture mayreceive the exception set forth in paragraph (f)(1) of this section onno more than two contracts. (4) <T3>Sunset. </T3>This paragraph shall cease to be effective after September30, 1991. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.401 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Advance payments. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>(1) Advance payments are disbursements of cash made bySBA to an 8(a) concern prior to the completion of performance of a specific8(a) subcontract and are based on anticipated performance on the part ofthe 8(a) concern under a particular 8(a) subcontract. Advance paymentsare made for the purpose of assisting the 8(a) concern to meet financialrequirements pertinent to the performance of an 8(a) subcontract. Advancepayments will be considered only after all other forms of financing havebeen considered by SBA and are determined to be either unavailable or unacceptableto support performance of the 8(a) subcontract. (2) The gross amount of advance payments will be determined by SBA at thetime the request for such payments is approved. In no event shall the totalamount of advance payments exceed 90 percent of the outstanding unpaidproceeds of the 8(a) subcontract to which the advance payments relate.In the case of requirements and indefinite quantity type contracts, advancepayments will be authorized only when a guaranteed minimum value is establishedin the 8(a) subcontract, and the advance payments shall not exceed 90 percentof that guaranteed minimum. SBA must approve in writing any subsequentchange in the gross amount of advance payments. (3) All advance payments, whether disbursed by letter of credit or otherwise,and all 8(a) subcontract proceeds shall be deposited into a Special BankAccount established exclusively for that purpose pursuant to the AdvancePayment clause of the 8(a) subcontract. Under no circumstances may advancepayment funds be deposited in certificates of deposit or other securities.The procuring agency shall pay all 8(a) subcontract proceeds directly intothe Special Bank Account until notified by SBA in writing that the advancepayments have been fully liquidated. SBA will not authorize any withdrawalsfrom the Special Bank Account that are inconsistent with the liquidationschedule established by the 8(a) subcontract under which the advance paymentswere made. (4) Advance payments shall be liquidated from proceeds derived from theperformance of the specific 8(a) subcontract to which they pertain or fromother revenues of the business (except other advance payments). 8(a) subcontractproceeds shall be applied first to liquidate outstanding advance payments.Repayment must occur according to the liquidation schedule establishedby the 8(a) subcontract under which the advance payments were made. (5) The special bank account may not be used as a revolving line of credit.The cumulative total amount of advance payments disbursed may not exceedthe amount authorized by the Regional Administrator or his/her designee.(b) <T3>Requirements and conditions. </T3>(1) Advance payments may be approvedfor an 8(a) concern only when all of the following conditions are foundby SBA to exist: (i) An 8(a) concern does not have adequate working capital to perform aspecific 8(a) subcontract. (ii) Adequate and timely private financing is not available on reasonableterms to provide necessary capital. (iii) Progress payments based on costs at customary rates will not satisfythe working capital requirements of the 8(a) concern to perform the 8(a)subcontract. (iv) When applicable, loan guarantees for defense production are not available.(v) Progress payments based on costs with unusual terms will not satisfythe working capital requirements of the 8(a) concern to perform the 8(a)subcontract. (vi) The 8(a) concern has established or agrees to establish and maintainfinancial records and controls which will provide for complete accountabilityand required reporting of advance payment funds. These records must bemade available upon request for review and copying by SBA and other appropriateFederal officials. (vii) The 8(a) concern has no unliquidated advance payments outstandingon another 8(a) subcontract which is completed, terminated or in default,unless such unliquidated advance payments are due only to the contractingagency's delay in making final payment to the 8(a) concern after it hassuccessfully completed the 8(a) subcontract. (2) Advance payments shall not be made to an 8(a) concern in any case inwhich the concern has assigned its right to receive any payment under thespecific 8(a) subcontract to any person or entity. (3) SBA shall not charge interest on advance payments disbursed pursuantto these regulations, except that SBA may charge interest if the 8(a) concernis declared to be in default either with respect to performance or liquidationof the advance payments. In such event, interest will accrue from the dateof default and shall be assessed at such rate as established by the Secretaryof the Treasury pursuant to Pub. L. 92-41. (4) Under no circumstances may a liquidation schedule be waived; however,the cognizant Regional Administrator or his/her designee may extend a liquidationschedule in appropriate cases. (c) <T3>Application and approval procedure. </T3>The following procedures applyto the approval of advance payments: (1) The 8(a) concern must submit a written request for advance paymentsto the cognizant SBA Regional Administrator or his/her designee. Such requestmust include such detailed documentation as SBA may specify to supportthe 8(a) concern's need for such funds and proof that working capital financingcannot be found from financing institutions at reasonable terms.(2) The 8(a) concern must identify a commercial bank which is a memberof the Federal Reserve System in which it will establish a Special BankAccount for the deposit of advance payments and all progress payments madeto it by the procuring agency for its performance of the 8(a) subcontract.This special account shall be a non-interest bearing demand deposit account.(3) The 8(a) concern must, as required by IRS regulations, select a FederalDepository into which the Federal withholding and FICA payment will bemade. (4) Upon review of all of the circumstances, the Regional Administratoror his/her designee shall decide whether to approve or deny a request foradvance payments, and, if approval is granted, shall designate the amountthereof and the terms and conditions upon which such advance payments maybe made. The Regional Administrator's or his/her designee's Finding, Determinationand Authorization for Advance Payments shall be in writing, and shall,at a minimum, state that the 8(a) concern has given adequate security,that the advance payments will not exceed the unpaid contract price, and,based on written findings, that making the advance payments either is inthe public interest or facilitates the national defense. The Finding, Determinationand Authorization for Advance Payments shall identify what security shallbe required, including but not limited to a lien against the property contractedfor, the balance of the Special Bank Account, and any property acquiredfor the performance of the 8(a) subcontract. (d) <T3>Post-approval procedures. </T3>The Contracting Officer shall be responsiblefor assuring that advance payments are implemented consistent with theFinding, Determination and Authorization for Advance Payments issued bythe Regional Administrator or his/her designee. Before any advance paymentsare disbursed, the following actions must occur: (1) The 8(a) concern must execute a note evidencing the full amount ofthe advance payments and a security agreement and personal guarantee byone or more of the principals of the 8(a) concern as collateral for theadvance payments. (2)(i) The 8(a) concern and the SBA shall execute a modification to the8(a) subcontract adding an Advance Payment clause prior to the disbursementof any advance payments. The clause shall state the amount of the advancepayments, a liquidation schedule and all other terms and conditions togovern the advance payments, consistent with the Finding, Determinationand Authorization for Advance Payments issued by the Regional Administratoror his/her designee. (ii) The Contracting Officer, when other contract terms reducing the quantity,price or term of performance of the 8(a) prime contract and subcontractare modified by the procuring agency, shall initiate action to modify theAdvance Payment clause and, if appropriate, the letter of credit as necessary,including, but not limited to, reduction of the total amount of advancepayments authorized or the amount of the letter of credit and/or restructuringthe liquidation schedule, to ensure that at no time during the performanceof the 8(a) subcontract does the unliquidated advance payments balanceexceed 90 percent of the unpaid value of the 8(a) subcontract. (3) The 8(a) concern, SBA and the bank in which the Special Bank Accounthas been established will enter into a Special Bank Account Agreement priorto disbursement of any funds, which agreement shall specify the respectiverights and responsibilities of the parties. The Agreement shall grant toSBA the unilateral right to withdraw any funds in the Special Bank Accountto the extent necessary to liquidate any unliquidated advance payments.(i) The cognizant SBA Regional Administrator shall designate at least twoSBA employees to serve as countersignatories on the Special Bank Account.Withdrawals from the account will be made only upon the authorized signaturesof a representative of the 8(a) concern and one of the designated SBA employees,as identified on the signature card for the Special Bank Account. Underno circumstances shall the requirement for an SBA employee countersignaturebe waived. (ii) At the time that SBA disburses advance payment funds into the SpecialBank Account, SBA shall obtain the most superior lien possible upon theSpecial Bank Account, any property contracted for, supplies, material andother property acquired with the advance payment funds, and upon any othersecurity required by the Finding, Determination and Authorization for AdvancePayments.(4) Prior to the disbursement of an advance payment, SBA shall modify theprime contract with the procuring agency in the following respects: (i) Reassign contract administration authority to the extent necessaryto administer the Advance Payment clause of the 8(a) subcontract to SBA'sContracting Officer. (ii) Direct payment of all contract proceeds into the Special Bank Accountuntil SBA issues written notice that the advance payments have been fullyliquidated. (iii) Require prompt notice of any adverse developments in contract performance,changes in the Government requirement, or of any other condition that mayaffect progress payments. (iv) Require that copies of all payment vouchers issued by the procuringagency's disbursing office be sent to the Contracting Officer. (e) <T3>Procedures for use of advance payment funds. </T3>(1) Except for repaymentto SBA in appropriate circumstances, advance payment funds may be usedby an 8(a) concern only for the purchase of materials, payment of labor,payment for equipment expenses, general and administrative expenses andoverhead, and payment of progress payments to the subcontractors of the8(a) concern necessary for the performance of the specific 8(a) subcontractfor which the advance payments were authorized. 8(a) concerns shall followa two-step process to gain access to advance payment funds. The first stepis the disbursement of the advance payment funds from SBA, either directlyor by way of letter of credit into the Special Bank Account. The secondstep is the withdrawal of funds from the Special Bank Account by checkto pay particular contract expenses. (2) <T3>Disbursement of advance payment funds by SBA. </T3>(i) SBA shall disburseadvance payments by way of a letter of credit where the Agency anticipatesthat all of the following conditions exist: (A) Its relationship with the particular 8(a) concern will last for a yearor more. (B) The cumulative disbursements to that 8(a) concern will total at least$120,000 annually. (C) The 8(a) concern has submitted a schedule of its projected monthlyadvance requirements for 8(a) subcontract disbursements and SBA has reviewedit and found it to be reasonable. (D) The 8(a) concern has established or agrees to establish and maintainfinancial records and controls which will provide for complete accountabilityand required reporting of program funds. These records must be made availableupon request for review and audit by SBA and the General Accounting Office.(ii) <T3>Procedures for disbursements by letter of credit. </T3>The proceduresfor the utilization of the letter of credit method of payment shall bein accordance with 48 CFR 32.406. Where disbursement is by the letter ofcredit method, an 8(a) concern shall draw down funds against its letterof credit for deposit into the Special Bank Account only as needed andin such amounts necessary for its immediate cash needs under the 8(a) subcontractfor which the advance payments were authorized. Such immediate cash needsshall be documented by the 8(a) concern and verified by SBA prior to drawdown.The amount of each drawdown against the letter of credit shall be for theminimum amount needed to satisfy immediate cash needs, taking into accountother financial resources available to the 8(a) concern, including progresspayments not required for the liquidation of disbursed advance payments.(iii) In all instances not covered by paragraph (e)(2)(i) of this section,SBA shall disburse advance payments by Treasury check or electronic fundstransfer. In such cases, the Contracting Officer shall request SBA's Officeof Financial Operations, Denver, Colorado, to disburse the authorized amountof the advance payments into the Special Bank Account. (3) <T3>Procedures for withdrawal of funds from the Special Bank Account. </T3>Allpayments to the 8(a) concern under the 8(a) subcontract for which advancepayments were authorized, together with all disbursements of such advancepayments, shall be paid into the Special Bank Account. (i) <T3>Liquidation of disbursed advance payments. </T3>The funds in the SpecialBank Account shall be applied by SBA first to liquidate the balance ofdisbursed advance payments, in accordance with the liquidation schedulein the Advance Payment clause of the 8(a) subcontract. Withdrawals forliquidation of disbursed advance payments shall be made in accordance withthe procedures contained in the Advance Payment clause of the 8(a) subcontract.(ii) <T3>Payment of 8(a) subcontract expenses. </T3>Any amounts in the SpecialBank Account not required to liquidate disbursed advance payments shallnext be applied to pay allowable and allocable costs incurred in the performanceof the 8(a) subcontract for which the advance payments were authorized.To obtain withdrawals from the Special Bank Account for the payment ofsuch costs, the 8(a) concern shall request issuance of checks for the paymentof expenses to the Contracting Officer, supported by the documentationdescribed below. Such requests shall be made sufficiently in advance ofthe due date for such obligations to permit the review of the request bySBA and countersignature by the designated SBA countersignatories. TheContracting Officer or his/her designee will review the documentation presentedand either recommend approval or disapproval to the Assistant RegionalAdministrator for Minority Small Business and Capital Ownership Development(ARA/MSBandamp;COD). If the ARA/MSBandamp;COD authorizes payment, the designatedSBA countersigning agent(s) will countersign the check withdrawing fundsfrom the Special Bank Account. The 8(a) concern shall support each requestfor a withdrawal from the Special Bank Account by submitting to the ContractingOfficer or his/her designee, to the extent applicable, the following: (A) The original vendor invoice or original payroll record;(B) A certified statement, dated and signed by the concern's authorizedcertifying official, attesting to the truth and accuracy of the vendorinvoice, and/or the payroll records for the requested withdrawal, includingrecords of direct payroll expenditures as well as labor overhead; (C) A certification by the 8(a) concern that all Federal taxes and FICApayments are current, or a copy of any agreement with the Internal RevenueService (IRS) providing for payment of delinquent taxes; and (D) Documentation of overhead and general and administrative rates, usingprojected indirect costs applied to a valid base, which have been properlyallocated to direct material, labor, or other direct costs. (E) Where the requested withdrawal is for payroll expenses, the 8(a) concernmust prepare a check for Federal taxes in the name of the tax collectingagency, or the Federal Depository selected by the 8(a) concern into whichits Federal withholding and FICA payments are made, to be signed by SBAand the 8(a) concern concurrent with the check for the submitted payroll.If the amount of a check payable to IRS or to the Federal Depository isless than 25 percent of the gross payroll for the Period, the 8(a) concern'sauthorized certifying official shall prepare a statement certifying thatthe amount designated as payable to IRS or to the Federal Depository istrue and correct. There shall be no change of Federal Depository withoutobtaining the prior written consent of SBA. (iii) <T3>Release of residual funds after liquidation of the advance paymentsand payment of 8(a) subcontract expenses.</T3> Any funds remaining in theSpecial Bank Account after the 8(a) subcontract has been successfully completedor terminated and after the advance payments have been fully liquidatedand all allowable and allocable 8(a) subcontract performance costs havebeen paid shall be disbursed to the 8(a) concern. Upon receipt of the finalprogress payment, the Contracting Officer shall expeditiously close theSpecial Bank Account, executing a check withdrawing the remaining balanceof the Account payable to the 8(a) concern. (f) <T3>Cancellation.</T3> (1) SBA may determine that advance payments shouldbe cancelled under appropriate circumstances, including but not limitedto the following: (i) The terms and conditions of the Advance Payment clause have not beenadhered to by an 8(a) concern. (ii) The 8(a) concern is not in compliance with its 8(a) ParticipationAgreement. (iii) The 8(a) concern has been suspended pursuant to andSection; 124.115or has been terminated by administrative action under section 8(a)(9) ofthe Small Business Act, 15 U.S.C. 637(a)(9). (2) In the event of cancellation of advance payments to an 8(a) concern,all previous advance payments made to that 8(a) concern shall become dueand payable to SBA prior to the receipt of final contract payment.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.402</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Business development expense. </ITAG>(a) Any Business Development Expense (BDE) funds received by a ProgramParticipant prior to October 1, 1989 must. be used exclusively for thepurposes stated in the BDE approval. Use of such funds for any other purposemay be good cause for termination from the 8(a) program pursuant to andSection;124.209. (b) Any Program Participant which received BDE funds prior to October 1,1989 shall maintain records to substantiate the uses for which the BDEfunds have been expended. (c) In the event of default on an 8(a) contract to which BDE funds relate,the Participant shall be liable for repayment of the full amount of theBDE to SBA.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.501</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Development assistance program. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> Section 7(j)(1) of the Small Business Act provides forfinancial assistance to public or private organizations to pay all or partof the cost of projects designed to provide technical or management assistanceto individuals or enterprises eligible for assistance under sections 7(a)(11),7(j)(10), and 8(a) of the Small Business Act. The AA/MSB-COD is responsiblefor coordinating and formulating policies relating to the disseminationof this assistance to small business concerns eligible for assistance undersections 7(a)(11), 7(j)(10) and 8(a) of the Small Business Act. (b) <T3>Services.</T3> (1) Section 7(j)(1-2) of the Small Business Act empowersthe SBA to provide through public and private organizations the managementand technical assistance enumerated below to those individuals or concernswho meet the eligibility criteria contained in sections 7(a)(1) and 8(a)of the Small Business Act. (2) The SBA shall give preference to projects which promote the ownership,participation in ownership, or management of small businesses owned bylow-income individuals and small businesses eligible to participate inthe section 8(a) program. (3) This assistance may include any or all of the following: (i) Planning and research, including feasibility studies and market research;(ii) The identification and development of new business opportunities;(iii) The furnishing of centralized services with regard to public servicesand Federal Government programs including programs authorized under sections7(a)(11), 7(j)(10) and 8(a) of the Small Business Act; (iv) The establishment and strengthening of business service agencies,including trade associations and cooperatives; (v) The furnishing of business counseling, management training, and legaland other related services, with special emphasis on the development ofmanagement training programs using the resources of the business community,including the development of management training opportunities in existingbusiness, and with emphasis in all cases upon providing management trainingof sufficient scope and duration to develop entrepreneurial and managerialself-sufficiency on the part of the individuals served.(4) Sections 7(j)(3) and 7(j)(9) of the Small Business Act authorize SBAto:(i) Encourage the placement of subcontracts by businesses with small businessconcerns located in areas of high concentration of unemployed or low-incomeindividuals, with small businesses owned by low-income individuals, andwith small businesses eligible to receive contracts pursuant to section8(a) of this Act. SBA may provide incentives and assistance to such businessesthat will aid in the training and upgrading of potential subcontractorsor other small business concerns eligible for assistance under sections7(a)(11), 7)(j), and 8(a) of the Small Business Act, and (ii) Coordinate and cooperate with the heads of other Federal departmentsand agencies, to insure that contracts, subcontracts, and deposits madeby the Federal Government or with programs aided with Federal funds areplaced in such a way as to further the purposes of sections 7(a)(11), 7(j),and 8(a) of the Small Business Act. (c) <T3>Eligibility.</T3> (1) Eligibility for the assistance enumerated underandSection; 124.501(b) above shall include, but not be limited to: (i) Businesses which qualify as small within the meaning of size standardsprescribed in 13 CFR Part 121, and which are located in urban or ruralareas with a high proportion of unemployed or low-income individuals, orwhich are owned by such low-income individuals; and (ii) Businesses eligible to receive contracts pursuant to section 8(a)of the Small Business Act. (d) <T3>Delivery of services.</T3> (1) The financial assistance authorizedfor projects under paragraph (b) of this section includes assistance advancedby grant, cooperative agreement, or contract. (2) To the extent feasible, services available under paragraph (b) of thissection shall be provided in a location which is easily accessible to theindividuals and small business concerns served. (e) <T3>Coordination and cooperation with other government agencies.</T3> (1)The AA/MSB-COD may utilize the resources of other agencies and departmentswhenever practicable which can directly or indirectly support or augmentthe purposes of sections 7(a)(11), 7(j) and 8(a) of the Small BusinessAct. (2) The AA/MSB-COD shall enter into agreements with Federal agencies anddepartments to further effective sections 7(a)(11), 7(j) and 8(a) of theSmall Business Act. (3) The AA/MSB-COD shall encourage the placement of deposits made by theFederal Government, or by programs aided with Federal funds, in such away as to further the purposes of section 7(a)(11), 7(j) and 8(a) of theSmall Business Act. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.502</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Small Business and Capital Ownership Development program. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> Section 7(j)(10) of the Small Business Act establishesa Small Business and Capital Ownership Development program which shallprovide additional assistance exclusively for small business concerns eligibleto receive contracts pursuant to section 8(a) of the Small Business Act.The management of the Capital Ownership Development program is vested inthe AA/MSB-COD who is responsible for the oversight of the program andactivities set forth in this part of these regulations. The developmentassistance described below shall be provided exclusively to those smallbusiness concerns eligible to receive contracts pursuant to section 8(a)of the Small Business Act. Such small business concerns shall be participantsin the Small Business Capital Ownership Development program. This programshall: (1) Assist small business concerns participating in the program to developcomprehensive business plans with specific business targets, objects, andgoals; (2) Provide for such other nonfinancial services as deemed necessary forthe establishment, preservation, and growth of small business concernsparticipating in the program, including but not limited to: (i) Loan packaging, (ii) Financial counseling, (iii) Accounting and bookkeeping assistance, (iv) Marketing assistance, and (v) Management assistance; (3) Assist small business concerns participating in the program to obtainequity and debt financing; (4) Establish regular performance monitoring and reporting systems forsmall business concerns participating in the program to assure compliancewith their business plans; (5) Analyze and report the causes of success and failure of small businessconcerns participating in the program; and (6) Provide assistance necessary to help small business concerns participatingin the program to procure surety bonds. Such assistance shall include,but not be limited to: (i) The preparation of surety bond participation forms; (ii) Special management and technical assistance designed to meet the specificneeds of small business concerns participating in the program and whichhave received or are applying to receive a surety bond, and (iii) Preparation of all forms necessary to receive a surety bond guaranteefrom the SBA pursuant to Title IV, Part B of the Small Business InvestmentAct of 1958.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.601 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Miscellaneous reporting requirements. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Capability statements. </T3>Each 8(a) concern shall annually prepareand submit to the SBA a capability statement. Such statement shall brieflydescribe the concerns various contract performance capabilities and shallcontain the name and telephone number of the BOS assigned the concern.SBA will submit the capability statements to the appropriate procuringagencies for the purpose of matching requirements with appropriate 8(a)concerns. (b) <T3>Participant reports on parties assisting it and fees. </T3>(1) Each8(a) Program Participant shall submit semi-annually a written report toits assigned BOS to include the following information: (i) A listing of any agents, representatives, attorneys, accountants, consultantsand other parties (other than employees) receiving fees, commissions, orcompensation of any kind to assist such Participant in obtaining a Federalcontract; (ii) The amount of compensation received by any person listed under paragraph(b)(1)(i) of this section during the relevant reporting period along witha description of the activities performed for such compensation. (2) The BOS will review the report and forward it to the AA/MSBandamp;COD.Any report that raises a suspicion of improper activity shall be referredimmediately to the SBA Inspector General. (3) The failure to submit a report pursuant to the requirements of thissection shall be considered good cause for the initiation of a terminationproceeding pursuant to andSection; 124.209. (c) <T3>Reporting requirements after exiting the 8(a) program. </T3>Former8(a) Program Participants shall provide such information as SBA may requestconcerning such former Participant's continued business operations, contractportfolio and financial condition for a period of three years followingthe date on which the concern exits the program. Failure to provide suchinformation when requested may result in the nonexercise of options oncontracts awarded through the 8(a) program.<ITAG tagnum="21">Date: March 19, 1989.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">James Abdnor, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-6500 Filed 3-22-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 8025-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>